,url,article,client
0,https://hudsonhardwood.com,"Hudson Hardwood Floors
Specializing in hardwood floor refinishing, restoration, and installation of wood floors and stairs in the Greater Philadelphia Area.
For over 20 years Hudson Hardwood Floors has used our expertise on commercial and residential hardwood floor projects. We are known for reliable service, expert craftsmanship, and dustless sanding that has earned us 5 star reviews from our clients. Whether you need hardwood floor refinishing or a hardwood floor installation, we leave your floors looking and feeling like new.
We can repair your old, worn out, and damaged wood flooring, restoring them to its original beauty. Or add warmth and classic good looks to your space with new hardwood flooring. Hudson Hardwood serves the Mainline, Philadelphia, Montgomery, Bucks, Chester County, & More!
Hardwood Floor Services
Why Choose Us?
Testimonials
At Hudson Hardwood we pride ourselves on providing clients with the highest quality products at the highest level of service. When their floors are finished, we want our clients to say “Wow!” Visit the Testimonials page to see what past clients have said about their experiences with Hudson Hardwood.
Would highly recommend!!!
I hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to sand down and refinish the hardwood floors at my house. They look beautiful!! Additionally, Joe was very communicative and the work was completed as scheduled. Would highly recommend!!
Pain-free remodel
Our floors look great! Joe was easy to get a hold of every step of the way which made for a pain-free remodel!
Excellent communication, fast and great work
Great communication at every phase
Joe got everything done on time and done right. Great communication at every phase of the project. Very happy with the result.
Diligent, friendly, and professional
Hudson Hardwood company has a Great service. Diligent, friendly and Professional. There was no damage or scratches on the floor. They cleaned up and asked for feedback in person. I highly recommend Hudson Hardwood company. Thay are really amazing 💪🏼!!
Work was completed as scheduled
I hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to sand down and refinish the hardwood floors at my house. They look beautiful!! Additionally, Joe was very communicative and the work was completed as scheduled. Would highly recommend!!
Hudson Hardwood is Responsive
Very responsive and was able to fit us in quickly before we moved into our new home. The floors look amazing! Very happy with the job and quality of work.
Responsive and Punctual
Hudson’s Hardware was responsive and punctual. They worked on a flexible timeline and helped us choose the right finish for our floors. They also kept us updated and were professional at every step of the process. I highly recommend them.
Floors look Beautiful
Joe was very responsive to my need for fast service. The floors look beautiful. I got daily texts and pictures from Joe to keep me up to date which I really appreciated.
Great to work with.
Joe and his team were great to work with! Joe is detail-oriented and communicates with you throughout the process. Best decision we made was to call Hudson Hardwood.
Easy to Work With
Joe was extremely easy to work with. He was professional and followed through on our contract. I ended up hiring him twice because I completed the installation over several months one floor at a time. Highly recommend him.
Excellent communication, fast and great work, and fantastic customer service
Great Work
Joe was extremely accommodating with my short deadline to move in. He was in constant communication about the progress of the floors and the end result was beautiful.
Amazing job
Joe did an amazing job with the floors at my new home. The floors hadn't been touched in over 40 years and he brought out their original charm. Highly recommended!!
Workmanship is fantastic
First of all - Joe is the most responsive contractor that I’ve ever worked with. His workmanship is fantastic. His service is top shelf. I highly recommend them.
Five Stars
Outstanding Work
Joe did an amazing job with the floors at my new home. The floors hadn't been touched in over 40 years and he brought out their original charm. Highly recommended!!
High quality workmanship and outstanding service
Great job at a fair price
Great job at a fair price
Absolute master of his craft!
Absolute master of his craft! I Would recommend them to anyone.
Five Stars
Very happy
Joe did a great job rehabbing my stairs. He had a great vision, and it was well executed. Everything was done ontime and professionally. Very happy with my new stairs!
Best decision
Joe and his team were great to work with! Joe is detail-oriented and communicates with you throughout the process. Best decision we made was to call Hudson Hardwood.
Best decision we made
Joe and his team were great to work with! Joe is detail-oriented and communicates with you throughout the process. Best decision we made was to call Hudson Hardwood.
Really responsive, informative and sensitive to our unique needs
Highly recommend
Joe was extremely easy to work with. He was professional and followed through on our contract. I ended up hiring him twice because I completed the installation over several months one floor at a time. Highly recommend him to anyone.
Professional Service
Highly professional service, excellent product. I understand why they are so busy. Was worth the wait.
Reasonably priced
Hudson Hardwood Floors is the best! Refinished my 100 year old pine floors to perfection. Joe Hudson is so responsive and easy to deal with. Reasonably priced. I highly recommend them.
My floors are gorgeous
I'm very happy with my decision to use Hudson Hardwood Floors. He was reliable, fair priced, finished on time and my floors are gorgeous.
Customer service was top-notch
Joe was very attentive during the scheduling process and his customer service was top-notch. His interest in and love for old hardwood floors was evident from the first call. Also, he answered every text within minutes of sending. Thanks Joe.
Amazing job on our floors
Thank you Joe for doing an amazing job on our floors! The repairs and the new finish look great. We highly recommend Hudson Hardwood Floors
Five Stars
Job turned out beautifully
Joe put new hardwood floors in my home. Job turned out beautifully. Very pleased with the time frame and Joe's professionalism. Thank you.
Better than expected
Joe was very quick in his return phone calls and started our floors right away. The floors turned out better than expected. Thank you !
Project Gallery
Browse our before and after photos of the many hardwood floor projects we’ve completed. From clients who needed a cleaning and recoating (buff and coat), hardwood floor refinishing, wood floor sanding, old hardwood floor restoration, to those who were installing wood floors. See the amazing transformation hardwood floors can make in a home, office, or commercial building.
Hardwood Blog
While the thought of buying hardwood floors may seem daunting, they are a beautiful addition to any home and an investment in that home’s future. With a little knowledge, you’ll be ready to move forward with getting the floors of your dreams! For tips and tricks about how to clean and care for your hardwood floors, to articles about the latest trends and styles in hardwood floors – you’ll find it all on the Hudson Hardwood blog.
Considering Buying Hardwood Floors?
With the many options available today it’s smart to do some homework first before you purchase hardwood floors. There are many varieties and styles available, the basics being solid or engineered planks. Solid planks come from a single piece of wood while engineered are comprised of several planks laminated or glued together.
Long strip, Exotic, Hand Scraped, and Distressed are terms used to describe the plank origin and the finish on the planks. Planks can come finished or unfinished. Unfinished planks allow them to be finished once they are installed, giving a more customized look.
Depending on the type of floor they are going over, hardwood floors can be installed in several ways. The most common is by nails or staples. Other options include glue, adhesive-less, and floating.
Hardwood Floors Throughout the Home
Care and Cleaning of Hardwood Floors
Some people are hesitant to purchase hardwood floors because they’re afraid of the time and effort it will take to maintain them. Rest assured, hardwood floors are extremely durable. While scratches and stains can happen, there are ways to take care of them to keep your floors looking great for years.
Hudson Hardwood recommends no harsh chemicals or cleaners. Over time these can build up and make your floors look bad. Occasionally, vinegar can help clean hardwood floors, but only in moderation.
Scratches can also occur from moving furniture or other of life’s unforeseen happenings. Not to worry though, with a few short steps you can repair a scratch on your own. Visit our blog to see detailed instructions on “Hardwood Floor Scratch Repair.”
It is, of course, a good idea to have your hardwood floors professionally cleaned and re-coated when they do eventually start to show signs of wear and tear. Hudson Hardware can help with this. Learn more on our Cleaning and Recoating page.
National Wood Flooring Association Membership
Hardwood Floors Today
Many of the areas we service date back to the 1800 and 1900s when hardwood floors were common in larger estates. Flooring has changed a lot since then, but hardwood floors remain top-of-the-line in home decor. Today’s technology and products gives us more hardwood flooring options than ever before to achieve the looks our customers want.
Traditional hardwood floors are made up of one plank size and then a consistent stain throughout. Today, consumers can choose from gray or bleached hardwood floors. Styles and patterns are even seeing a comeback including herringbone. Some customers are modernizing the look of their floors by laying planks at an angle rather than horizontally.
A few adventurous homeowners are even experimenting with the latest trend of mixing plank sizes. This unexpected style can add interest and depth to any room.",hudsonhardwood
1,https://hudsonhardwood.com/about-us/,"Hudson Hardwood Floors specializes in refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors & stairs. We are dedicated to bringing warmth, and appeal to residential, and commercial spaces, with the classic beauty of wood flooring.
For over 20+ years Hudson Hardwood has been serving the Mainline, Philadelphia, Montgomery, Bucks, Delaware, & Chester Counties. We are a fully insured, family owned business, with an A+ Better Business Bureau rating.
Certified by the NWFA since 2008. Our employees are expert craftsmen that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.
See why so many clients trust Hudson Hardwood.",hudsonhardwood
2,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/,"Hudson Hardwood Floors is proud to serve the following areas in Pennsylvania:
- Ardmore, PA
- Bala Cynwyd, PA
- Berwyn, PA
- Blue Bell, PA
- Broommall, PA
- Bryn Mawr, PA
- Bucks County, PA
- Chadds Ford, PA
- Chestnut Hill, PA
- Chester County, PA
- Collegeville, PA
- Devon, PA
- Doylestown, PA
- Flourtown, PA
- Fort Washington, PA
- Gladwyne, PA
- Haverford, PA
- Havertown, PA
- Jenkintown, PA
- Kennet Square, PA
- King of Prussia, PA
- Lansdale, PA
- Liberties, PA
- Lower Gwynedd, PA
- Lower Merion, PA
- Main Line, PA
- Malvern, PA
- Manayunk, PA
- Media, PA
- Mount Airy, PA
- Montgomery County, PA
- Narberth, PA
- New Hope, PA
- Newtown Square, PA
- Old City, PA
- Paoli, PA
- Philadelphia, PA
- Phoenixville, PA
- Plymouth Meeting, PA
- Queen Village, PA
- Rittenhouse, PA
- Society Hill, PA
- Skippack, PA
- Swarthmore, PA
- Upper Dublin, PA
- Villanova, PA
- Washington Square, PA
- Wayne, PA
- West Chester, PA
- Wynnewood, PA
- Wyndmoor, PA",hudsonhardwood
3,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/berwyn-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Top-Notch Hardwood Flooring Services in Berwyn, PA
Berwyn, PA, is a great town with friendly people. Hudson Hardwood Flooring has provided top-notch flooring services in the area for more than 20 years. We’re a local company that takes pride in our work and loves to see our neighbors happy with their new floors.
We offer various services, from hardwood floor refinishing to hardwood floor installation. Our team of experts can handle any type of hardwood flooring project, big, or small.
So if you’re looking for wood floor refinishing, installing new floors, or just need some repairs done, Hudson Hardwood is the company for you!
Flooring Services We Provide:
Hardwood Floor Refinishing:
If you need wood floor refinishing in Berwyn, PA, don’t hesitate to contact a reliable company like Hudson Hardwood, when your hardwood floors start showing their age, we can refinish them and make them look new again. Also, if you have hardwood floors damaged or scratched, we can sand them down and refinish them to restore their original beauty.
Hardwood Floor Installation:
We work with top-quality hardwood floors and suppliers to achieve your desired service. We offer free consultations to help you choose the perfect type of hardwood flooring for your home or business, and then we will take care of the installation process.
Hardwood Floor Repair:
If your hardwood floors are damaged, we can repair them for you. We’ve many years of experience repairing all types of hardwood floors, so we know how to fix them quickly and efficiently.
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood?
- We are a local, family-owned business.
- We have over 20 years of experience.
- We use the latest techniques and equipment.
- We offer a wide range of services.
- We are always professional and courteous.
- We offer competitive pricing.
The Different Projects We’ve Worked On:
Schools
We’ve installed hardwood floors in schools all over the area. We know how to manage and handle large projects, and we always work quickly and efficiently so that there’s minimal disruption to the school schedule.
Businesses
We’ve installed hardwood floors in businesses of all sizes. We have the experience and expertise to handle any business, from a small mom-and-pop shop to a large corporate office.
Restaurants
We’ve installed hardwood floors in restaurants of all types. We know that a good floor can make a restaurant look great, and we always take care to install the floor as fast as possible so that there’s no disruption to the business.
Get The Best Flooring Services In Berwyn, PA At Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood offers hardwood floor installation in Berwyn, PA, and other flooring services to commercial and residential properties.
We have years of experience and a team of experts who can handle any flooring project, big, or small. Our quality workmanship and attention to detail have made us the go-to company for hardwood flooring in the area.
Do you need hardwood floor refinishing in Berwyn, PA? Our staff can improve the look of your house or company by providing beauty and durability to classic hardwood floorings. Call us now.",hudsonhardwood
4,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/blue-bell-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Blue Bell, PA Hardwood Flooring Services
Blue Bell is a place full of history that played important roles in key events of American history. At Hudson Hardwood, we’re proud to serve this community with top-notch hardwood flooring. If you need hardwood floor refinishing in Blue Bell, PA, contact Hudson Hardwood.
Blue Bell History
Blue Bell, PA, is located in Whit pain Township in Montgomery County, 15 miles from Philadelphia. The town was originally known as Pigeontown, a name given after the passenger pigeons who used to gather there in large flocks. In 1840 the town was renamed after the Blue Bell Inn, a building still used today.
The Blue Bell Inn, originally called the White House, was built in 1743. It served as a stop for hunters and travelers. Today the Blue Bell Inn is still operating as a fine restaurant and gathering place for the community. It is said that Washington frequented the Blue Bell Inn.
Hudson Hardwood in Blue Bell
Hudson Hardwood has a team of expert craftsmen with experience bringing old hardwood floors back to life. Our services include refinishing, installing, and restoring hardwood floors. We can also simply clean and recoat floors to give them a quick and easy update. If you need wood floor refinishing in Blue Bell, PA, Hudson Hardwood is the place to go.
Hear what owner Joe Hudson had to say about a recent project he completed in Blue Bell:
“The client was looking to get rid of the extra-large beveled edges of his pre-finished factory floors,” said Hudson. “Hudson Hardwood eliminated the edges, giving a better-looking finish. With the edges removed, dirt and grime can no longer collect there. At the same time, we changed the color and sheen to something more appealing to the designer’s eye.”
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood?
- Our team is reliable
- We’re experts in providing all the hardwood flooring services you need.
- We’ll get the job done on time
- We’ll do the job with the least amount of interruption to your home or business.
- Dustless sanding for minimal mess
- Environmentally friendly products
Get The Best Hardwood Floors In Blue Bell, PA
Hudson Hardwood is the best choice for Blue Bell, PA hardwood flooring. We have a long history of serving this community and offer top-of-the-line services. Our floors are built to last and will add value to your home or business. If you ever need hardwood floor installation in Blue Bell, PA, contact Hudson Hardwood.",hudsonhardwood
5,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/broomall-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"We all know that feeling when you get home, and it smells like fresh wood? Well, that’s the smell of an old-fashioned hardwood floor. It has a unique scent that can’t be replicated in any other material, and that provides you with a high level of satisfaction.
At Hudson Hardwood, we’re dedicated to providing Broomall citizens with the best hardwood floors there are. We offer various hardwood flooring services in Broomall, PA, including refinishing, cleaning and coating, and installing residential and commercial flooring. We strive to provide you with beautiful floors in your own home. With our excellent customer service and attention to detail, we will ensure you are satisfied with your floor!
Get To Know Our Services
For over 20+ years, Hudson Hardwood has provided the best hardwood flooring services in Broomall, PA, at affordable prices. Our team of professionals is dedicated to providing you with a hardwood flooring solution that works for your lifestyle and budget, exceeding all expectations in quality and craftsmanship. Some of the services we provide are:
- Refinishing: With our refinishing service, you may restore your hardwood flooring to its original beauty or give them a fresh new look. Refinishing your wood floor is affordable and saves you from installing a completely new hardwood floor. It’s also great since you get to upgrade your floor finish to a superior one that will better protect your floor.
- Cleaning & Recoating: Cleaning and recoating is a service that you enjoy if you have a tighter budget or if your floor doesn’t need too much maintenance. For a fraction of the cost it takes to refinish your hardwood floors, you can schedule a cleaning and recoating to remove temporary coatings that cloud and haze wood flooring. Clouding and hazing on hardwood are caused by mop and glow and murphy oil soap, which only professionals can remove.
- Installation: At Hudson Hardwood, we’ve been given the title of the most trustworthy commercial and residential flooring business. We’ve demonstrated our trustworthiness and skill in every job we’ve done. Because we pay close attention to details, we pay attention to our customers’ needs and expectations to ensure they are completely satisfied with the finished product.
Things You Might Find Interesting About Broomall, PA
Broomall is one of the finest places to live in Pennsylvania. The majority of residents in Broomall own their houses, giving the area a rural feel. Broomall is known for its excellent public school system, safe residential areas, and peaceful environment. You can find coffee shops and parks pretty much everywhere in Broomall.
Even though Broomall offers many amenities and conveniences in everyday life, it lacks high-quality hardwood flooring services. But since we, Hudson Hardwood, offer our great service, this problem has been fixed! So, if you’re looking for high-quality hardwood flooring services in Broomall, PA, that will give your home an elegant look and feel at a reasonable price, then reach out to us or get a free quote on our website.
Hudson Hardwood offers refinishing, installation, and restoration of hardwood floors. We can also do a simple cleaning and recoating to help maintain your hardwood floors.",hudsonhardwood
6,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/bryn-mawr-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services In Bryn Mawr, PA
Bryn Mawr is a beautiful community located in Pennsylvania. It’s the place that our team at Hudson Hardwood calls home. At Hudson Hardwood, we offer a wide range of services, including installation and restoration. We also provide hardwood floor refinishing in Bryn Mawr, PA.
Life In Bryn Mawr
Residents of Bryn Mawr enjoy Chanticleer, a thirty-acre estate that boasts beautiful formal gardens, a produce garden, and more. Bryn Mawr College is a women’s liberal arts college that began as a Quaker institution in 1885. Today approximately 1,700 women attend college at Bryn Mawr College. Bryn Mawr is home to the Bryn Mawr Film Institute.
Today, Bryn Mawr’s population is approximately 3,700, with a median income of $65,000. Since Bryn Mawr spans several townships, it is part of several school districts. This includes Lower Merion School District, Radnor Township School District, and the School District of Haverford Township. Additional schools located in the town are The French International School of Philadelphia, The Baldwin School, the Shipley School, and Sacred Heart Academy Bryn Mawr.
Over 20 Years Of Experience
What is important to look for in a hardwood flooring company? One important factor is experience. At Hudson Hardwood, we have over 20 years of experience in the industry, so you can be sure we know what we are doing. Another factor to consider is the quality of the products they offer.
At Hudson Hardwood, we use only the highest-quality materials in their work, so you can be sure your floors will last for many years. You should also consider the company’s customer service. Hudson Hardwood offers a wide range of services, like wood floor refinishing in Bryn Mawr, PA.
Proud To Serve Bryn Mawr
Hudson Hardwood is proud to serve the wonderful community of Bryn Mawr, PA. We have been providing quality services for over 20 years. We look forward to continuing to do so for many years to come. Bryn Mawr residents know that their floors are in good hands with us.
If you are looking for a hardwood flooring company that can provide you with the best service and products, Hudson Hardwood is the right choice. We offer hardwood floor installation in Bryn Mawr, PA. Get the hardwood flooring of your dreams with us.",hudsonhardwood
7,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/chadds-ford-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Chadds Ford, PA
Chadds Ford is a township located in Delaware County, Pennsylvania. Before 1996, Chadds Ford was known as Birmingham Township, but the name was changed to distinguish it from Birmingham Township in neighboring Chester County.
Chadds Ford was home to N.C. Wyeth, his son Andrew, and grandson Jamie. N.C. was a prominent artist and illustrator.
Chadds Ford was the location of the Battle of Brandywine, and today, visitors can go to the Brandywine River Museum, which houses much of N.C. Wyeth’s works.
History of Chadds Ford
Chadds Ford played a role in the American Revolutionary War with the Battle of Brandywine. Places listed on the National Register of Historic Places include Chad House, Chadds Ford Historic District, William Painter Farm, and Gilpin Homestead.
Notable Places in Chadds Ford
Residents and visitors to Chadds Ford can enjoy the Brandywine Wildflower and Native Plant Gardens, Christian C. Sanderson Museum, Chaddsford Winery, and William Painter Farm.
Education in Chadds Ford
Students in Chadds Ford attend Unionville-Chadds Ford School District (UCFSD). The district spans parts of Chester County and Delaware County. Schools in the district include
- Unionville High School
- Charles F. Patton Middle School
- Unionville Elementary School
- Hillendale Elementary School
- Pocopson Elementary School
- Chadds Ford Elementary School
Famous People from Chadds Ford
One of the most famous people in Chadds Ford was N.C. Wyeth, an American artist and illustrator, best known for his work with Scribner Classics, specifically Treasure Island. Wyeth moved to the area from Maine to study under Howard Pyle.
N.C. Wyeth’s son, Andrew, and his grandson James were both artists in Chadds Ford who portrayed the people, landscape, and animals, of the area in their art.
Chadds Ford Today
The population of Chadds Ford is approximately 3,700, with a median home income of $73,550 and an average property value of $113,750.
Hardwood Flooring in Chadds Ford
Chadds Ford is a historic area with beautiful old homes and a well-established community. From historic homes to brand new construction, residents understand and appreciate the beauty and durability that hardwood floors bring. Hardwood floors are a beautiful addition that almost always increases the value of a home. Hudson Hardwood uses our years of experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Chadds Ford neighborhoods.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood is reliable, and we finish within budget and on time. Our services include all aspects of hardwood floor cleaning, repair, and installation, including hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. A dustless sanding technique we use significantly reduces the mess caused by traditional sanding inside your home. You’ll be amazed by how little disruption will occur while we refinish and restore your hardwood floors.
Our Projects
Please take a moment to look through our past projects and see for yourself the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our customers’ homes. We can do the same for your hardwood floors!
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
If you live in Chadds Ford and are thinking of refinishing hardwood floors or installing new hardwood floors, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. We’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
8,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/chester-county-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Chester County, PA
Are you tired of constantly looking at old and dingy floors in your home? Well, it is time to consider getting some new hardwood flooring. There are many different ways to go about this sort of project, but the best way is to contact Hudson Hardwood in Chester County, PA. We’ll give you the best hardwood floor refinishing in Chester County, PA.
Proud To Serve Chester, PA
Chester County is home to parts of Valley Forge National Historical Park. The Park played an important role in the American Revolution and is where George Washington stayed with his troops. The Brandywine Battlefield also took place in Chester County. Valley Forge Park is a national protected area.
Hardwood Flooring in Chester County
Chester County is a historic area with beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods mixed with a boom in construction and new houses. From older homes to the latest construction, residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home.
High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase the value of a home. You can trust Hudson Hardwood’s experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Chester County homes. We can ensure you’ll get the best hardwood floor installation in Chester County, PA.
Hudson Hardwood
We take pride in being reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget. Hudson Hardwood’s services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We utilize a dustless sanding technique that significantly reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home. Without significant disruptions to your daily schedule, we can refinish and restore your hardwood floors.
When you look at our projects, you’ll see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our customers. We’re a great asset to raise the curb appeal of your home. We’d be happy to do the same for your hardwood floors!
Get A Hudson Hardwood Free Quote
If you are thinking of getting wood floor refinishing in Chester County, PA or installing new hardwood floors, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. When it comes to dealing with floors, we’re the best. If you are ready to upgrade your home’s interior, give us a call today. We’ll help get started creating something beautiful for your Chester County home!",hudsonhardwood
9,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/chester-springs-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Chester Springs, PA Hardwood Flooring Services
At Hudson Hardwood, we’re your go-to if you look for reputable and reliable hardwood floor contractors in Chester Springs, PA. We have been in business for over two decades. Be it for commercial or residential flooring services, you won’t find anyone more qualified than us! Talk with our experts to see why we are the right fit for your project.
Hardwood Flooring In Chester Springs, PA
What does it take to install a wood floor? It takes the right tools, materials, and a lot of know-how. If you’re looking for someone who can help, we’re the ones to call! At Hudson Hardwood, we specialize in residential and commercial flooring solutions; we have provided homeowners and businesses with the best hardwood floor installation in Chester Springs, PA.
It doesn’t matter what type of flooring work you’re planning; our skilled flooring professionals will get it done! Our services range from restoring your floors to their original prime state, refurbishing old stairs by giving them a brand-new look, cleaning and recoating your floors, or installing a new one. You can count on us for hardwood floor refinishing in Chester Springs, PA.
Why Choose Us
We’re different from most companies out there. We offer both residential and commercial flooring services at reasonable rates. You will not find better value for our quality than ours! We believe that the customer should be treated like royalty. Our experts ensure that everything is in place and working properly.
Our work speaks for itself, our clients leave satisfied and happy and return later on. What makes us different from other professionals is our experience, skills, customer service, and approach. Look no further; we will exceed your expectations! Improve your home with our services like flooring installation or wood floor refinishing in Chester Springs, PA.
Chester Springs #1 Flooring Contractor
At Hudson Hardwood, we are known for our expertise in commercial and residential hardwood floor projects. We are the best choice when you need hardwood floor contractors in Chester Springs, PA. We can repair your worn-out and damaged wood flooring or we can add a tint of style and warmth to your space with brand-new hardwood flooring.",hudsonhardwood
10,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/chestnut-hill-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Chestnut Hill, PA
With over 20 years of experience, at Hudson Hardwood, we’re proud to serve Chestnut Hill, PA, with the best hardwood flooring services. Our contractors are experts and will deliver the best results for your home or business. Our hardwood flooring solutions will give your property the right touch, whether a historical or modern building. Discover more about our hardwood flooring services!
Discover Hudson Hardwood In Chestnut Hill
With so many historic and upscale homes in Chestnut Hill, residents of the area have high expectations for maintaining and decorating their homes. Hudson Hardwood’s team has helped Chestnut Hill residents restore the former splendor of their homes’ old floors. We also bring the beauty and durability of hardwood floors to new construction. Our hardwood floor refinishing in Chestnut Hill, PA, is the most reliable you can find in the area.
Customers can be sure Hudson Hardwood has a solution to best fit any situation. We’re known for being reliable, and we complete projects without major interruptions to your life and your schedule. With our dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products, clients can rest assured they’ll receive the best possible results. Since 2008, we’ve been NWFA certified, so we’re up to standard with the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.
Our Many Services Will Help You Out
At Hudson Hardwood, we’re the hardwood experts. We don’t limit ourselves to simple installation and refinishing services. Our goal is to surpass your expectations. A hardwood floor is a wonderful addition to any building. Still, many people have different tastes and preferences regarding hardwood floors. At Hudson Hardwood, we can satisfy them all.
We offer a variety of hardwood and coating options to cover any possible preference you may have for your hardwood floor. We can make it happen from clear and bright colors to opaque and dark tones. If you already have a hardwood floor that you want to restore or modify, we can help! You can rely on us for hardwood flooring refinishing in Chestnut Hill, PA.
Get Our Hardwood Flooring Solutions
Chestnut Hill is full of diverse buildings, and a hardwood floor is a great way to stand out. You can trust that our team of contractors at Hudson Hardwood will deliver you the most excellent flooring services. It doesn’t matter if it’s for a home or business; at Hudson Hardwood, we’re ready to help you out.",hudsonhardwood
11,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/collegeville-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"With its many historic and brand-new upscale homes in Collegeville, residents of the area expect only the best when decorating their homes. Hudson Hardwood’s team has helped people in Collegeville restore the former splendor of their homes’ old hardwood floors. Hudson Hardwood has also brought the beauty and durability of hardwood floors to new construction.
Hudson Hardwood offers The Best Hardwood Flooring Services in Collegeville
Hudson Hardwood’s services include completing work on hardwood floors in all different conditions. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our customers can be confident that Hudson Hardwood has a solution to fit any situation best. We are very reliable, and projects are finished to your complete satisfaction without significant interruptions to your life and schedule. Our dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products make each job as clean as possible for your home and the environment.
Our Projects
View before and after pictures of past projects we’ve completed in the area and read what our customers have to say about their experience with Hudson Hardwood.
Free Quotes
Things You Might Find Interesting About Collegeville History
Collegeville, PA is a town located in the Philadelphia suburbs in Montgomery County. Collegeville is bordered by Perkiomen Creek. The Perkiomen Bridge was built in 1799, and soon after, the town was named Perkiomen Bridge. After that, it became known as Freeland, before residents finally settled on Collegeville. The name came from the Pennsylvania Female College, which was located in the area until it closed in 1880.
In 1860 Ursinus College opened and is still in operation today. The Perkiomen Bridge and the Perkiomen Hotel are still standing and are both on the National Register of Historic Places. The Perkiomen Hotel recently received a grant to be renovated after falling into disrepair.
Recreation & Retail in Collegeville
Collegeville is home to many parks and recreation areas, including Community Park, Hunsberger Woods, Perkiomen Trail, and Waterworks Park. The town’s main street is undergoing revitalization. The Providence Town Center, a large, open-air shopping and dining destination, has added world-class retail for Collegeville residents and the surrounding area. The Town Center includes shops, grocery stores, restaurants, a Movie Tavern, gyms, and more.
Notable People from Collegeville
Famous people who called Collegeville home are Horace Ashenfelter, a 1952 steeplechase Olympian, and The Bloodhound Gang, a rock band popular in the 1990s. Author J.D. Salinger, whose most famous work was Catcher in The Rye, attended Ursinus in 1938.
Collegeville Today
Collegeville’s population today is just over 5,200. The area quickly grew when major businesses like Pfizer, Dow Chemical, and GlaxoSmithKline, built headquarters in the area.
Collegeville students are served by the Perkiomen Valley School District and Holy Cross Regional Catholic School. Ursinus College today serves approximately 1,500 students.
The United Church of Christ has its Pennsylvania Southeast Conference headquarters in Collegeville in a place called Church House.
The average income of people living in Collegeville is $110,000, and the median home value is $325,000. Collegeville is a very young town with an average age of residents between 22 and 40. This is most likely due to the influx of people from around the world coming to work at the large pharmaceutical companies in the area.",hudsonhardwood
12,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/devon-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Devon, PA
Devon residents expect only the best for their homes with their high home values and above-average annual income. The beauty and durability of hardwood floors offer a timeless finish to older homes or a fresh, sophisticated look for new construction.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood’s services include completing work on hardwood floors of all types. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Customers can be confident that Hudson Hardwood will be reliable and finish projects on time and within budget. We pride ourselves on doing so with minimal disruption to your daily schedule and life. With a dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products, each job is done efficiently and is friendly to the environment.
Hudson Hardwood Floors & Projects
View before and after pictures of past projects we’ve completed in the area and read what our customers have to say about their experience with Hudson Hardwood.
Free Quotes
Do you live in Devon and have a hardwood floor project? Contact us today for Free Quote. This is your opportunity to get the hardwood floor installation, hardwood floor refinishing, or hardwood floor repair you were looking for!
Fun Facts About Devon, PA
Devon, PA is a town on Philadelphia’s Main Line located in Easttown Township, Chester County. Devon grew along with the railroad, where people began to settle in the 1800s. While railroads brought them to Devon, residents used horses as their daily mode of transportation back then. From this tradition, the Devon Horse Show was born in 1896. Today, the Horse Show is the oldest and largest event of its kind in the United States and is one of the most prestigious equestrian events. It is held each year in late May and lasts for ten days.
In 1919 The Devon County Fair was added to the festivities of the Devon Horse Show. The County Fair includes rides, food, vendors, and more. With the help of hundreds of local volunteers, proceeds from these events benefit Bryn Mawr Hospital. Competitors come from around the world to enjoy Devon’s local traditions.
Funds raised from these events have resulted in over $16 million in donations to Bryn Mawr Hospital, allowing it to remain a best-in-class hospital. Most recently, the Devon Horse Show and County Fair volunteers pledged $2 million towards building a brand-new pavilion with cutting edge operating rooms, intensive care units, and a labor and delivery unit.
As the largest contributor to Bryn Mawr Hospital, the Horse Show and Fair are an integral part of life in Devon.
Parks and Recreation in Devon
Devon is home to Hilltop Park, where residents can enjoy outside recreation, trails, and athletic fields. The nearby Jenkins Arboretum is an agricultural and educational center for the community.
Life in Devon Today
Today, the population of Devon is just under 2,000. With an annual median income of nearly $200,000 and an average property value of $600,000, it is a wealthy town. With access to Septa through the Devon Train Station, residents enjoy a quick average commute of just 22 minute",hudsonhardwood
13,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/doylestown-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Doylestown, PA
Serving in Doylestown, PA, at Hudson Hardwood, we’re proud to offer our hardwood services to refurbish your home or business. Our hardwood installation in Doylestown, PA, is great to raise your home value. We also offer hardwood floor refinishing in Doylestown, PA, to restore historic floors in our wonderful community.
Proud To Serve Doylestown
Doylestown, PA, is a town located in Bucks County and is known as the county seat. Doylestown is conveniently located to many other major towns in the area, including Trenton, New Jersey, Easton, PA, and Center City, Philadelphia. Today, Doylestown’s population today is approximately 8,200.
With an average income of $74,000, it proves to be an affluent area to live in. A few of the destinations born of this time include The Mercer Museum, the National Shrine of Our Lady of Czestochowa, and the Moravian Pottery and Tile Words. The County Theater was also rebuilt and restored, and Doylestown is home to restaurants and nightlife.
Hardwood Flooring in Doylestown
Being home to many country estates for wealthy city dwellers, Doylestown residents are accustomed to the highest quality finishes in their homes. Many of the older homes have original hardwood floors that residents want to update and restore. Other homeowners are looking for more modern, updated hardwood flooring options using the latest styles and trends.
At Hudson Hardwood, we are proud to offer our hardwood flooring services to the residents of Doylestown. We have a wide variety of hardwood options available for installation or refinishing. We also offer custom staining to get the perfect color for your home. With our services, you can keep your home or business up to standard or improve it with an installation service.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood has over 20 years of experience with all types of hardwood floor projects. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our reliability is second to none when it comes to finishing projects. With dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products, work is done with minimal impact on your home and the environment.
If you have a hardwood floor project, like hardwood floor installation or wood floor refinishing in Doylestown, PA, contact Hudson Hardwood today for Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
14,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/experience-quality-service-hudson-hardwood/,"Hardwood floors are a great addition to your home, but many don’t know how to deal with them. Whether getting a new one or refinishing a historical one, at Hudson Hardwood, we can save you a headache. We’re the Philadelphia pros in hardwood flooring. We’ll ensure you enjoy the best results for your home or business in no time.
We’re The Contractor You Can Rely On
At Hudson Hardwood, we’re an experienced hardwood flooring company that offers various services to make your hardwood flooring project successful. Our team also moves furniture so we can easily work on your space. We ensure livable conditions throughout the project so that you can still enjoy your home or office while we work.
Our dustless sanding process ensures your home or office is livable during the entire project. We also offer overnight services so you can return to your routine quickly. If you’re looking for a reliable, experienced hardwood flooring company, look no further than Hudson Hardwood.
Discover The Services We Offer
Hardwood Floor Installation In Philadelphia, PA
We can help whether you need new wood installed or want to replace existing wood floors with something more modern. Our experienced team will find the perfect solution for any space.
Hardwood Floor Refinishing In Philadelphia, PA
Refinishing is one of the most cost-effective ways to bring life back into dulled surfaces. We use high-quality products and advanced techniques to restore wood floors to their former glory.
Hardwood Floor Cleaning & Recoating In Philadelphia, PA
Our buff and coat services remove dirt and debris from wood floors while refreshing them with a protective coating. This helps keep your floors looking like new for longer! We also offer hardwood floor maintenance in Philadelphia.
Hardwood Floor Restoration In Philadelphia
If your wood floors need major repairs, our restoration services can help bring them back to life! We use state-of-the-art techniques and materials to ensure that they look like they did when they were first installed.
Rely On The Best Hardwood Flooring Solutions In Philadelphia, PA
At Hudson Hardwood, we pride ourselves on providing top-notch customer service every step of the way—from consultation through completion! As one customer put it: “I hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to sand down and refinish the hardwood floors at my house. They look beautiful!! Additionally, Joe was very communicative, and the work was completed as scheduled. Would highly recommend it!!”
We strive for excellence in every job we take on so that you are satisfied with the result! Contact us today to learn more about what Hudson Hardwoods offers!",hudsonhardwood
15,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/exton-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"The flooring industry is more than choosing a pretty and practical floor for your place. A good contractor will let you know everything about hardwood flooring and consider your needs while guiding you through the process of choosing the ideal flooring for your home or business.
If you happen to be looking for hardwood floor contractors in Exton, PA, Hudson Hardwood’s team is set and ready to answer your request. We know the industry; let us show it to you from our perspective.
Where Can Hardwood Flooring Be Applied?
Hudson Hardwood has been in the industry for over two decades; this trajectory leaves us with enough experience and knowledge to install or renovate almost every space that requires hardwood flooring.
But if you are unsure whether it is the right fit for your home or business, here are some places we have worked in with hardwood flooring, besides their appliances in restaurants, hotels, and offices:
Breweries: Hardwood flooring gives a refined look and will help you improve the aesthetics of your establishment. You can choose from different textures, finishes, and styles to create the perfect ambiance in your brewery.
Hardwood floors are also resistant against spills that occur throughout the day due to beer pints or kitchen clean-ups.
Homes: Hardwood flooring gives your home a beautiful touch of sophistication and elegance that you’ll never get tired of admiring each day.
Hardwood floors give the room a natural and warm look with their low-gloss finish and make your home look modern because of how they bring out the tones in walls, furniture, and kitchen appliances.
Schools: Hardwood flooring in a school can be used in different spaces; they are great for sports classrooms because they’re easy to clean and withstand heavy activity. Hardwood floors make classrooms more comfortable because of their warmth, which helps create an ideal learning environment.
Gymnasium and Racquet Ball Courts: Hardwood floors make for the perfect gym floor because they’re comfortable standing on and offer a non-slip surface ideal for sports activities. Hardwood floors are tough but easy to maintain because they can be washed or cleaned regularly.
Hudson Hardwood: Fulfilling Your Flooring Needs
Hudson Hardwood proudly stands out in the flooring solutions industry with the most experienced hardwood floor contractors in Exton, PA, and proven efficiency. We provide quality and outstanding results with our refinishing, cleaning and recoating, installation, and stair services.
If you happen to have any doubt regarding our services, we can answer all your questions. Don’t hesitate to reach out to us at any time, and if you want a quote, request it!",hudsonhardwood
16,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/flourtown-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Flourtown, PA
Flourtown History
Flourtown, PA is an area of Springfield Township in Montgomery County. Flourtown borders several area towns like Chestnut Hill and Oreland.
Flourtown was founded in 1743 and is named after a flouring mill. Farmers in the area came to Flourtown to have their wheat ground. When that occupation fell to the wayside, Flourtown’s leading commercial enterprise became antique sales.
The Flourtown Fire Company served Flourtown and the surrounding communities starting in 1919. Interestingly, in 1992 the Klingon Language Institute was founded in Flourtown. The Institute promotes the study of the Klingon language and culture as showcased in the television show Star Trek.
Flourtown is home to the Black Horse Inn, which is listed on the National Register of Historic Places.
Built in 1744, this historic restaurant and Inn was also known as Sampson & the Lion. It is said that the Inn was often frequented by George Washington during the Revolutionary War.
The Inn also has a reputation for being haunted. There are stories of sounds being heard and images seen at the Inn that make it a destination for those interested in the supernatural.
Education in Flourtown
Public schools in Flourtown are part of The School District of Philadelphia. Schools serving Flourtown include Springfield Middle School and Springfield Township High School.
Private and religious schools in the area are Holy Martyrs School, Phil-Mont Christian Academy, and La Salle College High School.
Parks, Recreation, and Area Attractions
Residents of Flourtown enjoy many nearby parks that offer outdoor recreation. Fort Washington State Park is 493 acres filled with dogwood trees, trails, picnic tables, and excellent bird watching from the Observation Deck.
The Morris Arboretum in Chestnut Hill is a short distance from Flourtown. The Flourtown Farmers Market is open Thursdays through Saturdays. Flourtown Country Club offers golf, a pool, and a beautiful wedding venue.
Flourtown Today
Today the population of Flourtown is approximately 4,300. The average household income is around $106,000, and residents pay on average $342,000 for their homes. With its proximity to both the city of Philadelphia, and many major suburban centers, Flourtown is a great location.
Hardwood Flooring in Flourtown
Flourtown residents expect the highest quality finishes in their homes. Many older homes in Flourtown have original hardwood floors that residents want to update and restore. Some homeowners prefer modern hardwood floors showcasing the latest styles and trends.
Hudson Hardwood
Whether you prefer traditional or modern hardwood floors, Hudson Hardwood can help. We have over 20 years’ experience with all types of hardwood floor projects. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Hudson Hardwood completes projects on time and within budget, with reliability that is second to none. With dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products, work is done with minimal impact on your home and the environment.
Hudson Hardwood Projects
Please look at before and after photos of hardwood floor projects we’ve completed in the area. Hear what our customers say about their experiences with Hudson Hardwood.
Ready to Get Started?
Hudson Hardwood is ready to give you a quote for your hardwood flooring project. Contact us today for f.",hudsonhardwood
17,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/fort-washington-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Fort Washington, PA
History of Fort Washington
Fort Washington, PA is located in Montgomery County and was originally settled by German immigrants. A man named Philip Engard immigrated to the area in 1728 and purchased 100 acres of land. At one time, the town was named Engardtown before being changed to Fort Washington. Engard’s home still stands today.
During the Revolutionary War, George Washington and his troops stayed in Fort Washington in an area that today is Fort Washington State Park. The troops were there in 1777, just before going to Valley Forge.
A sad event in Fort Washington’s history is the Great Train Wreck of 1856. Two North Pennsylvania Railroad trains crashed into each other. It is believed that nearly 60 passengers were killed instantly and many more as a result of injuries. Some of a group of children traveling for a church picnic were among those who lost their lives.
Notable Fort Washington Landmarks
Today, Fort Washington is home to the Fort Washington Office Park. This 536-acre complex includes over 60 buildings and is home to major businesses in the area. These include AccuWeather, Aetna, and Honeywell. The Office Park is also home to a Temple University suburban campus.
A division of Johnson & Johnson has its corporate headquarters in Fort Washington. The McNeil Consumer and Specialty Pharmaceuticals, marketers of Tylenol, are based in a 110-acre complex on Camp Hill Road.
Residents enjoy Fort Washington State Park, which offers nearly 500 acres for hiking and picnics with the Wissahickon Creek running through it. Other historical locations in Fort Washington include Clifton House, Hope Lodge, and The Highlands Mansion & Garden.
Education
Students in Fort Washington attend schools in Upper Dublin School District or Colonial School District, depending on their area. Fort Washington Elementary School and Upper Dublin High School are in Fort Washington.
Private schools serving the area are Germantown Academy, The Paul Green School of Rock Music, and Open Door Christian Academy.
Fort Washington Today
Fort Washington’s population today is approximately 5,700. The median household salary is $109,000, and the median property value is $420,000.
Hardwood Flooring in Fort Washington
People who live in Fort Washington are accustomed to high-quality finishes in their homes. From older homes undergoing restorations, to brand new construction, hardwood floors of all types offer a beautiful and durable flooring solution. For traditional stains and finishes to the latest trends and styles, Hudson Hardwood has the experience to finish the job.
Hudson Hardwood
Whether you prefer traditional or modern hardwood floors, Hudson Hardwood can help. With more than 20 years’ experience, we perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Hudson Hardwood uses a dustless sanding technique that prevents dust from getting all over your home. We use the most environmentally friendly products. All of this adds up to fewer interruptions to your home and your daily schedule.
Hudson Hardwood Projects
Browse the before and after photos of the many hardwood floor projects we’ve completed in the area. Read reviews from past customers.",hudsonhardwood
18,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/gladwyne-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Gladwyne, PA
Gladwyne History
Gladwyne, PA, was known as Merion Square until 1891. It is part of a cluster of towns to the west of Philadelphia known as the Main Line. Early on the town preserved open space and to this day this has allowed it to retain its rural charm. Banker James Crosby Brown built a 185-acre estate in Gladwyne. The estate was later divided into lots of three to 17 acres. This, along with the preserved open space, set precedents in Gladwyne that have limited the sub-division and over-development that some other towns in the area have experienced.
When I-76 (the Schuylkill Expressway) was built in the 1960s it made Gladwyne even more desirable since it was close to the highway, and also close to King of Prussia, which was quickly becoming a business hub.
Gladwyne Today
Today Gladwyne is home to four churches and a synagogue. There are two schools, a fire company, parks, businesses, and retail shops. A few notable locations include the historic Guard House Inn and the Merion Cricket Club. Gladwyne is also close to the Philadelphia Country Club and is home to a private tennis club called The Courts.
Schools in Gladwyne include Gladwyne Elementary School and Gladwyne Montessori. Students attend middle school and high school in surrounding towns such as Penn Valley and Bryn Mawr. Gladwyne is also close to many private schools include Jack M. Barrack Hebrew Academy, Shipley School, Baldwin School, and more.
With a population of just over 4,000, Gladwyne has an average household income of $325,000. In 2018 Gladwyne was voted 6th richest zip code in the U.S.
Gladwyne Points of Interest
Gladwyne is home to many historical and natural places of interest.
- The 1690 House is the oldest structure in Lower Merion Township.
- The Bridlewild Trail extends 22 miles through the area and is available for residents and horses to enjoy.
- Rolling Hill Park is 102 acres along Mill Creek that boasts historic ruins.
- The Henry Foundation for Botanical Research, a botanical garden, is also in Gladwyne.
Hudson Hardwood in Gladwyne
Many homes in Gladwyne date back to the 1800s and early 1900s. It is a wealthy area and customers expect nothing but the best. Because of this Hudson Hardwood’s team of expert craftsmen is often asked if we can bring old floors back to their original beauty to help preserve the character of the home.
Our services include everything from
You can be sure Hudson Hardwood has a solution that will best fit your situation. We pride ourselves on being reliable and we complete projects with minimal disruption to clients’ everyday lives and schedules. We use dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products to give clients the best results possible while restoring their hardwood floors to their original splendor.
You can view other projects we’ve completed in the area and read what our customers have to say about their experience with Hudson Hardwood.
Get a Free Quote Today!",hudsonhardwood
19,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/hardwood-flooring-queen-village-pa/,"If you’re lucky enough to live in or own a property in Queen Village, PA, you know that this charming neighborhood is full of beautiful Colonial houses, innovative dining, and shopping spots. At Hudson Hardwood, we’re the hardwood contractors you can rely on. We can not only install new hardwood floors but refinish and perform hardwood floor restoration as well.
If you’re looking for expert hardwood flooring services, look no further than Hudson Hardwood.
Proud To Serve Queen Village
Queen Village in Philadelphia, PA, is just one of the many areas that Hudson Hardwood is proud to serve. We’re experts in hardwood flooring and have a long history of working on projects in this beautiful neighborhood. Many of the houses and buildings in Queen Village date back to the 1800s and 1900s, so we know a thing or two about antique floors!
This historic area of Philadelphia is a beautiful place to live, work, and raise a family. And at Hudson Hardwood, we’re committed to helping you keep your hardwood floors looking their best. Whether you need a new installation or an existing floor refinished, we’re here to help. At Hudson Hardwood we’re also experts in hardwood floor restoration.
New Wood Floors or Restoring the Old? We’ll Help You Decide
Whether you’re looking for new hardwood floors or want to restore your existing ones, Hudson Hardwood is here to help. We use the latest techniques and products to ensure that your floors look their best. And if you’re unsure what you want, we can help you figure it out. We’ll work with you to find the perfect solution for your home or business.
Our Refinishing Services Will Protect Your Floors
If you already have hardwood floors, you know how much work it is to keep them looking their best. But with our refinishing services, you can protect your investment and keep your floors looking new. We use the latest products and techniques to refinish your floors and offer buffing and recoating services to keep them looking their best.
Contact Us Today
Contact Hudson Hardwood today if you’re in Queen Village Philadelphia looking for hardwood floor installation. We’ll be happy to answer your questions and schedule a free consultation. We look forward to hearing from you! Get a free quote from us today.",hudsonhardwood
20,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/hardwood-flooring-services-in-philadelphia-pa/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Philadelphia, PA
Hardwood floorings are a great investment for a home or business. Not only do they add beauty and value to a property, but they also last for many years with proper care. If you need hardwood flooring services in Philadelphia, PA, contact the experts at Hudson Hardwood.
Philadelphia, A Place Full Of History
Philadelphia is a place full of history and art. Many historic buildings have beautiful hardwood floors, some that are historic themselves. This rich legacy inspires Hudson Hardwood to give the best hardwood flooring services to serve our community better. Discover our services here.
Hardwood Floor Refinishing In Philadelphia, PA
Refinishing is a laborious process for those not familiarized with it. It’s best to leave it to professionals that offer wood floor refinishing services. This will help ensure the best results and avoid accidents that could hurt you or permanently damage your floors. In Philadelphia, the best option is Hudson Hardwood.
Hudson Hardwood offers hardwood floor refinishing services, so your feet will keep looking great! We’re experts in hardwood flooring, refinishing, and maintenance! Don’t worry about deep sanding or having to refinish yourself; with us, you’ll get the best results.
Hardwood Floor Installation In Philadelphia, PA
Installing hardwood floors can be a daunting task, but it can be a breeze with the help of Hudson Hardwood! We have a wide variety of wood flooring to choose from and years of experience in installation.
When you’re looking for hardwood floor installation in Philadelphia, PA, there’s no better company to call than Hudson Hardwood. We’ll take care of everything for you, from getting the right wood flooring to installing it perfectly in your home or office.
Areas We Serve In Philadelphia, PA
- Rittenhouse Square, Philadelphia hardwood floor restoration
- Washington Square, Philadelphia hardwood floor restoration
- Society Hill, Philadelphia hardwood floor restoration
- Queen Village, Philadelphia hardwood floor restoration
- AND MORE!
Get The Best Hardwood Flooring Services
Philadelphia is a place full of historic places, and hardwood flooring is a great part of this legacy. Hudson Hardwood is proud to offer the best hardwood flooring services in Philadelphia! We have a wide variety of wood types and styles to choose from, so you’re sure to get the best hardwood flooring installation and wood floor refinishing in Philadelphia, PA. Contact us for flooring in Philadelphia!",hudsonhardwood
21,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/haverford-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Outstanding Hardwood Flooring Services in Haverford, Philadelphia
Hardwood Flooring in Haverford
Having hardwood flooring in your home creates an ambiance of elegance. The natural beauty and durability of hardwood flooring add refinement and stature to any room. Unlike other materials, such as carpet, which can quickly show dirt and wear, hardwood floors are easy to clean and maintain. They will last for years with proper care, adding value to your home.
With over 20 years of experience, Hudson Hardwood offers superb hardwood floor services in Haverford, Philadelphia. We are a family-owned, fully insured business ready to serve homeowners and business owners alike. Leave it to the professionals to upgrade your interior floors and see why we have 5-star ratings from our clients.
A Refined Look To Your Home or Business
There is a reason more and more people are switching to hardwood floors for their homes or business. The natural wood gives a warm and inviting feeling to any space and can be easily customized to match your existing decor. Hardwood flooring is durable and long-lasting, so you’ll enjoy it for years.
Maintaining your hardwood floors is essential for the look of your home and its overall health. A good hardwood floor service can help keep your floors looking their best and prevent long-term damage.
That is why we pride ourselves in offering our customers the best flooring services at Hudson Hardwood in Haverford, Philadelphia.
Quality Hardwood Floor Services
Hardwood floors give your space a sense of elegance and style. If you want to give your home a fresh look, consider installing hardwood floors. Not only are they attractive and durable, but they can also provide many other benefits. For example, hardwood floors can improve air quality, make your home soundproof, and even increase its resale value. So if you’re considering renovating your home soon, don’t forget about the potential of hardwood floors. If you search for `flooring service near me,` Hudson Hardwood has you covered.
Maintaining your hardwood floors shouldn`t be difficult if you hire the right people. It’s essential to recoat your hardwood floors every few years to protect them from everyday wear and tear. Additionally, it is essential to refinish your hardwood floors every few years to maintain their beauty and extend their lifespan.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer services such as refinishing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring your hardwood floors. We are your trusted choice for hardwood floor refinishing in Haverford, Philadelphia.
Restore Your Hardwood Floors With A Reliable Business
Our family-owned and insured business is reliable for restoring your hardwood floors. Our products are environmentally friendly, and we use dust-free equipment on our projects. Speak to our professionals if you need a timely, budget-friendly, and reliable service. If you are searching for `Haverford hardwood floor installation,` you have come to the right place. We will ensure all projects are done on time so you can enjoy your new floors. Our experts are standing by to answer all your questions. Trust the professionals on your next residential or commercial flooring project.",hudsonhardwood
22,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/havertown-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Havertown, PA
About Havertown, PA
Havertown, PA is a suburb community located about 10 miles west of Philadelphia. It is part of Haverford Township and Delaware County. The land was originally developed by William Penn as part of the Welsh Tract. In 1681 Welsh Quakers purchased the land from Penn and named it after Haverfordwest in the UK.
Historic sites
Havertown is home to many historical sites dating back to the Revolutionary War. The Grange Estate saw visitors like George Washington and General Lafayette. Nitre Hall was a supplier of gunpowder in the War of 1812, supplying over 800,000 pounds.
It is believed that Leedom Hall was the home of William Howell, who founded Haverford Mills in 1688. Lawrence Cabin and the Federal School are other Havertown locations that are on the National Register of Historic Places.
Havertown was home to Swell Bubble Gum from 1947 – 2004. The site was demolished and later became home to the YMCA.
Parks and Recreation in Havertown
Residents of Havertown enjoy an abundance of parks, playing fields, and recreation facilities. These include Llanerch Park, Karakung Field, The Grange Field, and Haverford Reserve. Other recreational facilities in the area are the Haverford Township Free Library and the Haverford Township Skatium for ice skating and sports.
In 2011 the Haverford Music Festival began and has been going strong ever since. The all-day event is family-oriented and aims to celebrate the community. The Festival takes place in the Oakmont Business District and attracts thousands of attendees. Over 30 bands entertain the crowds on three stages.
Education in Havertown
Havertown students attend schools in the School District of Haverford Township. The district is made up of a high school, a middle school, and five elementary schools. Students wishing to attend Catholic school can go to Cardinal John Foley Regional School.
Havertown Today
The median household income in Havertown is $107,000. Its population is just under 36,000. With its close proximity to Philadelphia and relatively low crime rates, Havertown is considered a great place to live.
Hardwood Flooring in Havertown
Like most of our customers, Havertown residents want the highest quality finishes in their homes. They come to Hudson Hardwood for our craftsmanship and our professionalism. With over 20 years’ experience, we have seen it all. From old or damaged floors that need to be refinished to brand new installations, our team has a hardwood floor solution that’s right for your budget.
Hudson Hardwood
Whether you want a traditional or a modern hardwood floor finish, Hudson Hardwood can help. We have experience with all types of hardwood floor projects. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our projects are completed on your timelines and within your budget, with reliability that is second to none.
Our dustless sanding technique minimizes the mess and disruption to your home throughout the project. And, we use environmentally friendly products which are more earth-friendly.
Hudson Hardwood Projects
We invite you to take a moment to look through past projects and hear what our customers say about their experiences with Hudson Hardwood.
Start Today!
Hudson Hardwood is waiting to hear from you, and we’re ready to help with your next hardwood floor project! Contact us today for Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
23,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/jenkintown-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Reliable Hardwood Flooring Services in Jenkintown, PA
At Hudson Hardwood, we have been providing top-notch hardwood flooring services for over 20 years. Our experienced team of flooring experts has the experience and knowledge necessary to complete any project with precision and quality. We are passionate about our work and strive to create a beautiful environment in every home or business we service.
Hudson Hardwood Floor specializes in refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors and stairs. We are passionate about bringing a touch of timeless elegance to residential and commercial spaces through beautiful wood flooring. We are experts in hardwood floor refinishing in Jenkintown, PA! Contact our artisans for your hardwood flooring services.
Why You Should Choose Us
Hudson Hardwood Floors has provided exemplary hardwood flooring services to residential and commercial properties throughout Mainline Philadelphia, Montgomery, Bucks, Delaware & Chester Counties for two decades.
Our team offers services in refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors and stairs.
We offer:
- Daily job updates and reliable services
- Optional furniture moving
- Livable conditions during renovation processes
- Flexibility as we work around your family’s schedule
- Environmental friendly products
- Using dustless sanding equipment to keep all of our projects as soon as possible
- Green rated finishes
- Your Jenkintown hardwood floor installation gets done on schedule
- Certification by the National Wood Flooring Association (NWFA) since 2008
- All of our employees follow NWFA guidelines
- Overnight services for our customer’s convenience
Contact Your Hardwood Flooring Services from the Best Contractors in Philadelphia, PA!
Are you searching for hardwood floor refinishing in Jenkintown? or Jenkintown hardwood floor installation? Good news, the search is over! At Hudson Hardwood, we are proud to be a leader in the hardwood flooring industry. With more than twenty years of experience and expertise in providing residential and commercial properties with quality service, customers can trust our team to deliver lasting results. Our commitment to excellence and customer satisfaction has earned us certification from the National Wood Flooring Association (NWFA)
Jenkintown hardwood floor installation won’t be your google search anymore! Contact us and let our professional contractors help you get the perfect hardwood floors for your home or business!",hudsonhardwood
24,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/kennet-square-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Top Notch Hardwood Flooring Services in Kennett Square, PA
Hardwood floors have a timeless beauty that can transform any home. From traditional to modern, hardwood’s natural grain and color will add sophistication to any room in your house. At Hudson Hardwood, we are passionate about providing high-quality hardwood flooring services so you can get the look of your dreams.
We are happy to serve Kennett Square, PA, and the surrounding area with our hardwood flooring services. With 20 years of expertise in the industry, we have the expertise necessary to bring your vision to life. Whether you are looking for a hardwood installation or hardwood floor refinishing in Kennett Square, we will work with you to customize your home’s style and color. Contact us, and don’t risk your chance to work with our expert artisans in your hardwood flooring services.
What Makes Us Unique
Hudson Hardwood offers services in refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors and stairs.
At Hudson Hardwood, we proudly assess your floor’s needs to give you the best results. Whether restoring or installing a brand-new surface, our team is passionate about infusing warmth and charm into any room with timeless hardwood floors.
Our Founder
Joe Judson, founder and owner of Hudson Hardwood is a master craftsman with over 20 years of experience in the hardwood flooring industry. He is dedicated to providing quality services and strives to ensure that each client receives personalized attention from start to finish. Joe’s passion for hardwood floors reflects his precision and skill in his work.
Invest In Your House By Working With Hudson Hardwood
If your online searches are hardwood floor refinishing in Kennet Square or Kennet Square hardwood floor installation, the search is finally over! At Hudson Hardwood, we are committed to providing top-notch hardwood flooring services that will transform your home. Through our experienced team, personalized attention, and quality craftsmanship, we guarantee a beautiful outcome that will last for years. Contact us if you need hardwood floor services in Kennett Square and the surrounding area.
We want to make your dream home a reality!
Kennet Square hardwood floor installation won’t be your online search anymore!",hudsonhardwood
25,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/king-of-prussia-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Top Quality Hardwood Flooring Services in King of Prussia, PA
Hudson Hardwood is the go-to source for all your hardwood flooring services in Prussia, PA. For 20+ years, we have been assisting homeowners and business owners with their hardwood floor installations and refinishing projects. Our experienced team of certified technicians is committed to providing the highest quality service in King of Prussia.
Hudson Hardwood provides services refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors and stairs. We have worked on various projects, from single-family homes to large commercial installations. Whether installing new hardwood floors or repairing existing ones, Hudson Hardwood has the experience and skills to get the job done correctly.
Choose us for your hardwood flooring services!
Why do Businesses and Homeowners Benefit From Hardwood Flooring
Hardwood flooring adds a classic touch to any home or office space and is far easier to maintain than many other types of flooring. In addition, hardwood floors add value to your property and are easy to clean, making them a great investment for your home or business.
Why You Should Choose Us
When you choose Hudson Hardwood for your hardwood flooring needs, you can be assured that we will deliver the highest quality artistry. We pay attention to detail and strive to ensure that each project gets done perfectly. With over two decades of experience, our team has the expertise and knowledge to handle any size project.
We Are Different Because:
- We give daily updates to our clients
- Use environmentally friendly products
- Adjust to your schedule
- Team of technicians with more than 20 years of experience
- We will move your furniture for you
- We are certified by National Wood Flooring Association (NWFA)
Create Your Dream Home By Working With Us
Are you tired of searching online for hardwood floor refinishing in Prussia or Prussia hardwood floor installation? Your search is over! Hudson Hardwood is the answer to creating your dream home.
At Hudson Hardwood, we are committed to providing quality hardwood flooring services that will last for years. We understand that each project is unique, so our team of experienced professionals goes the extra mile to ensure your satisfaction.
If you need hardwood floor services, don’t wait! Contact Hudson Hardwood today to get started on your project. Hardwood floor refinishing in Prussia and Prussia hardwood floor installation wont be your online searches anymore!",hudsonhardwood
26,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/lansdale-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Highest Quality Hardwood Flooring Services in Lansdale, PA
Hudson Hardwood is a trusted provider of hardwood flooring services in Lansdale, PA. With more than 20 years of experience in the industry, they offer comprehensive residential and commercial application solutions. Our team of professionals will ensure every project gets done with precision and quality. Hudson Hardwood covers you whether you need new hardwood floor installation or refinishing.
For residents of Lansdale looking to refinish or install a hardwood floor, reach out to Hudson Hardwood now and receive a no-cost quote. We’re here for you and want to become your Landsdale hardwood floor installation choice!
The Services We Offer
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer various hardwood flooring services in Lansdale, PA. Our team of highly trained professionals has the expertise to provide sanding and refinishing for existing hardwood floors. We offer services in refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors and stairs.
What Makes Us Different
- We offer reliable services by giving you daily updates
- We use environmentally friendly products
- We will move all your furniture for you
- We have been certified by the National Wood Flooring Association (NWFA) since 2008
- We ensure superior air quality and virtually annihilate floor renovation dust by up to 95%.
- We adapt to your family’s busy schedule
- We have 20+ years of experience in the industry
- We work on schedule and follow all NWFA guidelines
Make A Long Lasting Investment By Working With US
Are you searching for Landsdale hardwood floor installation or hardwood floor refinishing in Landsdale? Your search is over. Hudson Hardwood is the premier provider of hardwood flooring services in Lansdale, PA. Our team of professionals is highly trained and certified by the National Wood Flooring Association to ensure every project gets done with precision and quality. Hudson Hardwood has you covered, from new hardwood floor installation and refinishing to cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors. Contact us now to receive a no-cost quote and start making a long-lasting investment in your home today!
Your online search for hardwood floor refinishing in Landsdale is over! Choose us for your hardwood flooring services.",hudsonhardwood
27,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/liberties-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Liberties, Philadelphia, PA
Hudson Hardwood is proud to offer hardwood floor restoration in Northern Liberties, serving businesses and homeowners looking for the best hardwood flooring solutions. With our services, you’ll preserve your hardwood floors or get a new one, perfect for your home. Boost your curb appeal today with Hudson Hardwood!
Serving Northern Liberties With Dedication
Northern Liberties is a beautiful city in northern Philadelphia. It’s full of history and art, making it an attractive place for people to come and live or visit. Likewise, Northern Liberties is full of historic buildings with gorgeous features like hardwood floors. Historic hardwood floors are a point of pride in many houses for their craftsmanship and quality.
At Hudson Hardwood, we understand the importance of servicing Northern Liberties with dedication. Residents of Northern Liberties need hardwood flooring services that can solve any issue, refinishing or installing a new hardwood floor to match the historical style. Whatever your need is, at Northern Liberties, you can always call on Hudson Hardwood.
Care For Your Hardwood Floors
Our contractors at Hudson Hardwood are the best of the best. We understand that a hardwood floor is a sturdy yet elegant and graceful aspect of a home. Hardwood floors will last more than a lifetime with proper care. That’s why we strive to offer the best services, using only the best materials for your hardwood floors. Here are some of our services:
- Hardwood Floor Installation: If you need to match a historical style or take advantage of hardwood floors’ timeless elegance, you can rely on Hudson Hardwood. We have the best hardwood floors for your home or business.
- Hardwood Floor Refinishing: Hardwood Floors can last for generations, but you must take proper care of them. Hardwood floor refinishing will bring new life to your hardwood floors, making them look as good as new!
Get Our Hardwood Floor Services
Hudson Hardwood is the place to go if you’re looking for hardwood floor restoration in Northern Liberties. We offer top-notch hardwood flooring solutions for houses and businesses in Northern Liberties. Whether you need a hardwood floor installation or a hardwood floor refinishing, you can count on Hudson Hardwood to get the job done right.",hudsonhardwood
28,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/lower-gwynedd-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Lower Gwynedd, PA
History of Lower Gwynedd, PA
Lower Gwynedd, Pennsylvania, is a small city located in Montgomery County. The Township is made up of four villages – Spring House, Penllyn, Gwynedd, and Gwynedd Valley. Lower Gwynedd’s postal address is Ambler, but it is a separate entity.
Lower Gwynedd was founded in 1698 by William Penn Welsh Quakers. In 1891 it was separated into Upper Gwynedd and Lower Gwynedd. It is counted among one of the oldest townships in the county. Located just minutes from Philadelphia and with a beautiful community based on tradition and culture, Lower Gwynedd is a highly sought-after area.
Historic sites
Given its history, it’s not surprising that Lower Gwynedd is home to some of the oldest buildings in the area. Gwynedd Hall is a historic home first built in 1824 and then rebuilt in 1852. It is located on Meetinghouse Road.
The Jacob Kastner Loghouse dates back to the early 1700s and is located on Norristown Road in Spring House.
Parks and Recreation in Lower Gwynedd
There are many parks in Lower Gwynedd where residents can enjoy trails, ponds, pavilions, sports fields, and more. Some of the smaller parks in the area include Dager Road Trail, the John C. Parry Bird Sanctuary, and Oxford Park.
The larger parks include Penllyn Woods, a 77-acre park with sports fields, trails, pavilions, and a pond. Pen Ambler Park boasts walking trails, an amphitheater, and a playground.
A large community day called Pike Fest happens each September. Over 150 vendors come together with amusements, music, food, and a 5K run for everyone to enjoy.
Education in Lower Gwynedd
Schools in Lower Gwynedd are often rated among the best in Pennsylvania, making the area very attractive to families with school-aged children. Schools serving Lower Gwynedd include Wissahickon Senior High School, Wissahickon Middle School. Elementary schools are Stony Creek Elementary, Blue Bell Elementary School, Maple Glen Elementary, Lower Gwynedd Elementary, and Shady Grove Elementary.
Lower Gwynedd Today
The population of Lower Gwynedd today is just around 11,500, with a median household income of $102,000.
Hardwood Flooring in Lower Gwynedd
Hudson Hardwood knows that Lower Gwynedd residents want only the highest quality finishes in their homes. They come to Hudson Hardwood for our craftsmanship and our professionalism. With over 20 years of experience, hardwood floors are all we do. From damaged floors that need refinishing to brand new installations, Hudson Hardwood has the hardwood floor solution that’s right for you.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood’s experience includes both traditional and modern hardwood floor styles. We have experience with all types of hardwood floor projects. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. All projects are completed on our clients’ timelines, within budget.
We utilize a dustless sanding technique to minimize mess and disruption to your home throughout the project. Our environmentally friendly products are easy on the environment.
Hudson Hardwood Projects
Please take a moment to browse our past projects and read testimonials from past clients. Our best recommendations come from our clients!
Start Today!
Hudson Hardwood is ready and waiting to help with your hardwood floor project. Please contact us today, and we’ll be happy to provide you with a free quote.",hudsonhardwood
29,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/lower-merion-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Lower Merion, PA
Hudson Hardwood installs and refinishes hardwood flooring to residential and commercial properties located in Lower Merion, PA. Whether your wood floors need an update or you want to install something brand new, our team of expert craftsmen can elevate the appearance of any home or business through the beauty of classic hardwood flooring.
Our professional hardwood flooring services include:
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood?
Our team provides reliable services to the residents and companies of Lower Merion, PA. We make sure we get the job done right and on schedule, so there is minimal disruption to your home or business. Plus, you can trust our expert craftsmen to maintain good indoor air quality while working on your project through our dustless sanding and our environmentally friendly products.
We offer:
- Reliable service and daily job updates
- Our hardwood flooring experts get your project done right, and on schedule.
- Furniture moving
- We offer the optional service of moving your furniture.
- Livable conditions during renovation
- We work around your family’s schedule, so you can stay in place.
- Dustless sanding
- We will leave your property as clean as possible. Cleaning and re-coating is no mess/dust situation.
- Environmentally friendly products
- Low VOC, green rated finishes available.
- 20+ years experience
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
30,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/main-line-pa-hardwood-floor-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services on the Main Line, PA
At Hudson Hardwood, we’re proud to offer professional hardwood flooring services to the Main Line community. We understand the importance of having beautiful, functional floors in your home. We’re dedicated to providing our customers with the best possible service. We offer the best hardwood floor installation in Main Line, PA.
Proud To Serve The Main Line
The Main Line is an area of the Philadelphia suburbs formed around the Pennsylvania Railroad’s Main Line train route when it first connected the towns in the 19th century. Originally centered around Villanova, Gladwyne, and Radnor, today, the Main Line’s core communities are Overbrook, Merion, Narberth, Wynnewood, Ardmore, Haverford, and Bryn Mawr.
Wealthy Philadelphians began to build large estates along the route. Today, the average home price ranges between half a million to $1.5 million. The area draws students from across the country to attend the many distinguished universities and colleges on the Main Line, including Villanova University, Eastern University, and Saint Joseph’s University.
You Can Rely On Us For Your Flooring Needs
Hudson Hardwood owner, Joe Hudson, describes a recent hardwood floor refinishing project in Main Line, PA, which he completed in the Gladwyne section of the Main Line.
“A lovely Australian couple just moved into the country. They were looking to get their Brazilian cherry floors and stairs refinished,” said Hudson. “They did not like the red tint that Brazilian cherry wood comes with. We did two coats of true black stain and three coats of a very low matte finish for a more natural look. They couldn’t have been happier.”
At Hudson Hardwood, we install and refinish hardwood flooring for residential and commercial properties in Main Line, PA. Whether your wood floors need an update or you want to install something brand new, our team of expert craftsmen can elevate the appearance of any home or business through the beauty of classic hardwood flooring.
Our Services
We offer reliable service and daily job updates, the optional service of moving your furniture, environmentally friendly products, dustless sanding, and 20+ years of experience. Our professional hardwood flooring services include:
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood?
Our team provides reliable services to the residents and companies of the Main Line, PA. We ensure we get the job done right and on schedule, so there is minimal disruption to your home or business. You can trust our expert craftsmen to maintain good indoor air quality while working on your project through our dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products.
If you’re looking for a hardwood floor installation or wood floor refinishing in Main Line, PA, contact Hudson Hardwood. Get a free quote today!",hudsonhardwood
31,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/malvern-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Malvern, PA
At Hudson Hardwood we’re ready to help out Malvern residents with all their hardwood flooring needs. Malvern is a wonderful place filled with beautiful buildings. Our hardwood services are ideal to help out improve and maintain your house. We offer both hardwood floor refinishing in Malvern, PA and hardwood floor installation in Malvern, PA.
History Of Malvern
Malvern was settled in the 1770s by Welsh immigrants who purchased the land from William Penn. There are several places in Malvern on the National Register of Historic Places, including where the Battle of Paoli took place. Today, The population of Malvern is approximately 3,500, with a median household income of $93,000. Median property values are $375,000.
Since 1869 Malvern has held a Memorial Day parade and ties for the oldest Memorial Day parade in the country. A Victorian Christmas is held on the first Friday and Saturday of December. Malvern is home to Duffy’s Cut, a stretch of the railroad line. Here we have the Swiss Pines, an arboretum, and a Japanese garden for visitors to enjoy.
Hardwood Flooring In Malvern Today
Malvern is a historic area with beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods. From older homes to newer construction, residents understand and appreciate the beauty and durability that hardwood floors bring. High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase the value of a home.
At Hudson Hardwood, we have the experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Malvern neighborhoods. Hudson Hardwood is reliable, and we finish within budget and on time. Our services include all aspects of hardwood floor cleaning, repair, and installation.
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
If you are a resident of Malvern who is thinking of refinishing hardwood floors or installing new hardwood floors, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. We offer hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We use a dustless sanding technique that significantly reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home.
You’ll be amazed by how little disruption will occur when we refinish and restore your hardwood floors. If you ever need flooring installation or wood floor refinishing in Malvern, PA, Hudson Hardwood is your place to go. We’ll gladly provide you with a free quote for your home or business. Contact us today!",hudsonhardwood
32,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/manayunk-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Manayunk, PA
History of Manayunk
Manayunk is a neighborhood along the banks of the Schuylkill River in the northwest part of Philadelphia that is known for its hilly streets and bike races. Surrounding areas include Roxborough and Wissahickon. The U.S. almost built the first canal in Manayunk, but they canceled the project due to budget problems.
The name Manayunk comes from the language of the Lenape Indians who originally inhabited the area. Their word for river, Manaiung, meaning “place to drink,” was later transformed to Manayunk.
With an influx of Polish, Irish, and German immigrants, Manayunk became home to many Catholic churches that today give much of its character. Just a few of these churches include St. John the Baptist, St. Lucy’s, St. Mary’s, and St. Josaphat’s. In 1924 the Josie D Heard AME church was established to serve its growing African American population.
Cultural in Manayunk
Residents of Manayunk enjoy thriving retail and cultural areas along Main Street, where there are shops, art galleries, restaurants, and more. Since 1989 Manayunk has hosted the Manayunk Arts Festival, a large outdoor festival held each June. Year-round artists can convene at the Manayunk-Roxborough Art Center.
Due to its hills, Manayunk became the site of many bike races. It was once part of the Philadelphia International Championship, one of the longest races in the U.S., with nearly 200 kilometers in one day. Many famous cyclists competed in the Philadelphia International Championship, including Lance Armstrong, who won the race in 1993.
Over the years, the races have changed names as sponsors changed. Eventually, the race was called the Manayunk Bike Race and entailed a 12.3 mile course, including the “Manayunk Wall,” a steep and challenging incline at Levering Street and Lyceum Avenue.
Education in Manayunk
The School District of Philadelphia serves Manayunk. Public schools include Cook-Wissahickon School (K-8), Dobson Elementary School (K-8), and Roxborough High School. Students in K-8 may also attend the Green Woods Charter School.
Manayunk Today
Today, the population of Manayunk is around 5,550. Many residents have updated older row homes, and demand for real estate in the area is high. The average median home price is $417,000.
Hardwood Flooring in Manayunk
Residents of Manayunk look to Hudson Hardwood to install only the highest quality finishes in their homes. Our craftsmanship and professionalism help homeowners restore their hardwood floors to their original splendor or install completely new, more modern, styles. With more than 20 years of experience, hardwood floors are all we do. From damaged floors that need refinishing to brand new installations, Hudson Hardwood has the hardwood floor solution that’s right for you.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood knows that every project is different. Our experience includes both traditional and modern hardwood floor styles. Our hardwood flooring services include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. All projects are completed on our clients’ timelines, within budget.
Call us today to learn more about how our dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products can help you get the floors of your dreams. We aim to minimize mess and disruption to your schedule and your home throughout the project.
Hudson Hardwood Projects
We invite you to browse our past projects and read what our customers have to say about their experience with Hudson Hardwood. They weren’t disappointed, and you won’t be either.
Start Today!
The team at Hudson Hardwood is eager to help with your hardwood floor project. Give us a call today, and we’ll provide you with a free quote. It’s that easy!",hudsonhardwood
33,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/media-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"With its variety of history mixed with forward-thinking policies, Media is home to people who want the best furnishings in their home. Owners of historic homes are often looking to maintain the original charm of their home, so we offer hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor restoration services. For clients with newer, more modern tastes, this might mean an entirely new hardwood floor installation.
Hudson Hardwood: Hardwood Flooring in Media, PA
Hudson Hardwood’s services include completing work on hardwood floors of all types. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Hudson Hardwood is reliable, and we’ll finish projects on time and within budget. Having your hardwood floors refinished shouldn’t mean you have to leave your house for days or completely disrupt your schedule. We work hard to finish the job with minimal disruption to your daily schedule and life. You’ll be amazed how our dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products get the job done efficiently.
Our Projects
We invite you to see the fantastic transformations some of our past clients have achieved on our Projects page. You can also peruse through the many 5 Star reviews Hudson Hardwood has received.
Free Quotes
Things You Might Want to Know About The History of Media
Media, PA is the county seat of Delaware County and touts itself as “Everybody’s Hometown.” Located just 13 miles outside of Philadelphia, Media has a long history of being home to wealthy Philadelphians. Today it offers residents and visitors a mix of historic and modern charm.
In 1681 Media was under the proprietorship of William Penn. The borough was later incorporated in 1850 and remained a rural area with vacation homes and hotels. Some of the well-known and popular hotels at the time included Brooke Hall, Idlewild Hotel, and The Chestnut Grove House.
Notable Locations
The Media Theater opened in 1927 and saw the first film with speaking parts, The Jazz Singer. The theater has been serving the area for many years and still exists today. In 1994 it was restored and re-named the Media Theatre for the Performing Arts.
Media is home to three historic districts. These are Courthouse Square, Lemon Street, and Providence Friends’ Meeting House District. The borough designated each in 1975.
Media is also home to many historic former residences. Just a few of these are Dr. Samuel D. Risley House, Gayley House, and Hillhurst.
Residents of Media enjoy access to many parks, nature sanctuaries, and areas where they can walk, play sports, and enjoy the outdoors. A few popular parks are Rose Tree Park, Barrall Field, and Muriel Jaisohn Memorial Park, and Nature Sanctuary.
Residents also have use of the Media-Upper Providence Free Library.
Education in Media
Families in Media send their children to school at the Rose Tree Media School District. A merger created the district in 1966. Today, it includes Media Elementary School, Springton Lake Middle School, and Penncrest High School. The Media-Upper Providence Friends School is a private school located in Media. Students can also choose to attend Catholic school at Mother of Providence Regional Catholic School.
After high school, students in the area may attend two associate-degree programs at Delaware County Community College or the Pennsylvania Institute of Technology. A three-year technical school called Williamson College of the Trades is also located in Media.
Famous People from Media
Pitcher Tug McGraw, who played for the New York Mets and the Philadelphia Phillies, hails from Media. Singer and songwriter Jim Croce, best known for his hits Time In A Bottle, and Bad, Bad, Leroy Brown, is also from Media.
Life in Media Today
The population of Media today is almost 5,500. Residents enjoy a robust downtown area with shopping, dining, and live cultural events. In 2006 Media became the first in the United States to achieve “fair trader certification” status. As such, it supports fair trade and offers fair trade products. It has done a lot to raise awareness about fair trade and continues this commitment today.",hudsonhardwood
34,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/montgomery-county-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Montgomery County, PA
Welcome to Hudson Hardwood, a business dedicated to hardwood flooring services in Montgomery County, PA. We are your local business serving the area for over 30 years. Hudson Hardwood offers a wide variety of services, including hardwood floor installation, repair, and refinishing. Get the best wood floor refinishing in Montgomery County, PA with us today!
Proud To Serve Montgomery
Montgomery County, Pennsylvania, is a geographically diverse area located northwest of Philadelphia. The terrain ranges from farms and open-lands in the north to dense suburban neighborhoods in the south. Montgomery County has been named a great place to raise a family with good school districts, shopping, and recreational areas, and lower crime rates.
Hardwood Flooring in Montgomery County
Montgomery County is a historic area with a diverse infrastructure from beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods to modern homes and businesses. Residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase the value of a home.
Such a historic place needs a good hardwood flooring contractor to cover its needs. At Hudson Hardwood, we’re proud to be that reliable option. You can trust Hudson Hardwood’s experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Montgomery County homes. We also offer hardwood floor refinishing in Montgomery County, PA.
Hardwood Flooring in Montgomery County
Montgomery County is a historic area with everything from beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods to modern homes and businesses. Residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase the value of a home. Trust Hudson Hardwood’s experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Montgomery County homes.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood is reliable, and we finish projects on time and within the budget. Our services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We employ a dustless sanding technique that significantly reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home. We can refinish and restore your hardwood floors without significant disruptions to your daily schedule.
If you look through our projects, you’ll see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our customers yourself. We’d be happy to do the same for your hardwood floors! Our standard of excellence will guide our team toward giving you the best hardwood service you need.
Get A Free Quote
If you are a resident of Montgomery County who is thinking of refinishing hardwood floors or new hardwood flooring installation in Montgomery County, PA, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. We’re experts in offering top-notch hardwood services. We also offer a wide selection of hardwood floors, including solid wood and engineered wood. We’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
35,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/mount-airy-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Mount Airy, PA
Mount Airy is a neighborhood located in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. Surrounding areas include Fairmount Park, Chestnut Hill, and the Cresheim Valley. While not officially recognized by the U.S. Postal Service with its own zip code, most of Mount Airy is taken up by the 19119 zip code.
History of Mount Airy
One of the original people to build in Mount Airy was William Allen, a Chief Justice of the Province of Philadelphia. His summer estate was built in 1750 on Germantown Avenue. His home was known as Mount Airy, which is the name later given to the neighborhood.
Development in the area boomed starting in the late 19th century with the building of two railroad lines. That time saw the construction of many of the large Victorian homes along tree-lined streets for which the town is known today.
Race Relations in Mount Airy
Mount Airy is sometimes touted as an example of how neighborhoods can successfully integrate and is often praised by civil rights groups. In the 1950s, residents banded together to accept everyone into their neighborhood. To this day, Mount Airy is commended for the racial harmony it achieved and continues to maintain. Even Oprah Winfrey cited it as such in her O Magazine.
Education in Mount Airy
Schools in Mount Airy fall under the School District of Philadelphia. Schools serving Mount Airy specifically are the Eleanor C. Elementary School, Charles W. Henry School, Henry H. Houston School, and the Anna L. Lingelbach school. High schools serving the area are Roxborough High School and Germantown High School.
Additionally, many charter schools in the area include West Oak Lane Charter School and Wissahickon Charter School.
Students may also opt for one of many private schools, including Revival Hill Christian High School, Waldorf School of Philadelphia, and Islamic Day School of Philadelphia.
After high school, students in Mount Airy can live at home and easily commute to many area colleges. Philadelphia University, LaSalle University, and Arcadia University are just a few in the area.
Mount Airy Today
In 2011 Mount Airy saw a large increase in businesses to the area. With affordable housing options and low crime, it was named one of America’s top ten best big-city neighborhoods by CNN Money.
Jewish congregations and a Hare Krishna community give Mount Airy a diverse religious community.
Residents enjoy shopping, restaurants, art galleries, and much more along Germantown Avenue. The area also boasts fitness centers and professional offices.
Notable places in Mount Airy
Mount Airy is home to the Sedgwick Theater. One of the few of its kind, the Sedgwick is a 1920s Art Deco movie theater.
The Lutheran Theological Seminary at Philadelphia is located on Germantown Avenue and serves as one of the headquarters for the Evangelical Lutheran Church in America.
Numerous Mount Airy homes are listed on the National Register of Historic Places. These include the Nugent Home for Baptists, Malvern Hall, and the Violet Oakley Studio.
Hardwood Flooring in Mount Airy
The many different races and religions in Mount Airy make it home to people with a wide variety of tastes and styles. Some residents want to refinish and restore old hardwood floors, while others search for the latest and greatest trends in the home design industry.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood’s services include completing work on hardwood floors of all kinds and all different designs. We perform refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Above all, Hudson Hardwood is reliable and will finish on time, within budget. We believe that having new hardwood floors installed shouldn’t turn your life upside down. You’ll be happy to see how our dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products get the job done!
Our Projects
Please look through the fantastic transformations we have achieved for our clients. Or read through the many five-star reviews we are proud to have received.
Free Quotes
Do you live in Mount Airy and have a hardwood floor project? Contact Hudson Hardwood today for a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
36,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/narberth-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Narberth, PA
Narberth, Pennsylvania is located in Montgomery County and is considered part of the Main Line, a group of towns outside of Philadelphia where wealthy Philadelphians built large sprawling estates. Narberth was incorporated in 1895. Narberth was different from other boroughs in that it claimed its independence from Lower Merion Township. Today, its population is just over 4,300 with a median household income of over $100,000 and an average home value of nearly $500,000.
The Narberth Train Station, conveniently located in downtown Narberth, is on the SEPTA Paoli/Thorndale Line. The railroad travels through the towns to the west of Philadelphia and was the reason the Main Line became the area it is today.
Narberth is close to the western edge of Philadelphia, and residents enjoy easy access to the amenities of Philadelphia. The town is in close proximity to many colleges and universities, including Saint Joseph’s University, Haverford College, Bryn Mawr College, Villanova University, Cabrini College, Eastern University, Rosemont College, and many more.
Downtown Narberth boasts a quaint shopping area with some businesses that have been around for a long time, including American Family Market, The Cheese Company, and Real Pizza. New businesses have joined them, and the Narberth Business Association actively promotes the area as a shopping destination for locals and tourists alike. Popular special events coordinated by the Association include the Spring Sidewalk Sale and the Narberth Dickens Festival.
Narberth’s official tree is the cherry tree, and there are plenty of them planted throughout the town. It became a destination for people from the city to visit Narberth in April and May to see the cherry trees and crabapple trees in bloom.
Narberth is part of the Lower Merion school district and the median age of its residents is just over 40 years old. Narberth is one of the few Main Line towns whose shopping and downtown district is located on the same street as the railroad station.
Notable public figures that hail from Narberth include Philadelphia Eagles founder Bert Bell, Metropolitan Opera star Margaret Harshaw, and WWII fighter ace Pug Southerland.
As many of the homes in Narberth date back to the 1800s and early 1900s, Hudson Hardwood’s team of expert craftsmen is often called upon to give old floors new life while preserving the original character of the home. With services like refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring, our team can tackle any challenge. We are reliable, work on your schedule, and complete our project with minimal interruption to your home or business. Dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products are techniques we use to give our clients the best possible results.
Free Quotes:
What We Offer:
Our services include reliability and frequent job updates. With 20+ years’ experience, we use only the highest quality, environmentally friendly products, and our dustless sanding technique minimizes the mess. We even have furniture moving services if you need help with that.
We offer:
- Reliable service and daily job updates
- Our hardwood flooring experts get your project done right, and on schedule.
- Furniture moving
- We offer the optional service of moving your furniture.
- Livable conditions during renovation
- We work around your family’s schedule, so you can stay in place.
- Dustless sanding
- We will leave your property as clean as possible. Cleaning and re-coating is no mess/dust situation.
- Environmentally friendly products
- Low VOC, green rated finishes available.
- 20+ years experience
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
37,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/new-hope-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in New Hope, PA
History of New Hope
New Hope, PA, is based in Bucks County, PA. The borough is located on the Delaware River, about 30 miles north of Philadelphia. The New Hope-Lambertville Bridge crosses the Delaware and spans from New Hope to Lambertville, New Jersey. New Hope has long served as the half-way stopping point for travelers going between Philadelphia and New York City.
Originally known as Coryell’s Ferry after the family who owned the ferry across the Delaware, New Hope was re-named in 1790. Fires had destroyed mills in the town, and their rebuilding gave new hope to the area.
During the revolutionary war, George Washington crossed the Delaware River in New Hope and destroyed the ferry so British troops would be unable to follow him. The British proceeded to shell the town.
Notable people from New Hope
Aaron Burr, the third vice president of the United States, spent time in New Hope. Author James A. Michener, who wrote South Pacific, Hawaii, and The Drifters, among many others, was born in New Hope.
Historic places in New Hope
New Hope is home to many historic buildings and homes dating back to the 1800s. These include Cintra, William Kitchen House, and Rhoads Homestead. Historic areas include the Honey Holley Watershed and New Hope Village District.
Culture and Recreation
New Hope is a busy area for tourists. With its unique shops, outdoor dining, and many cultural attractions, New Hope attracts many visitors. Often acting as a testing ground for Broadway theater shows, visitors can enjoy musicals at the Bucks County Playhouse. The Playhouse underwent an extensive renovation in 2012.
New Hope was also home to an art colony. The colony was founded by Edward Willis Redfield, and it produced popular artwork.
Since the 1950s, New Hope has been home to a large gay community. It is also a destination for motorcyclists.
Union Square, a popular tourism area, was once home to a bag production factory, Union Camp Corporation. The factory closed in the 1990s and was repurposed into Union Square.
New Hope today
The population of New Hope is just over 2,500. The average household income is approximately $87,000, and the property value median is $575,000.
Education in New Hope
New Hope is served by the New Hope-Solebury School District. The district includes New Hope-Solebury High School, Middle School, and Upper and Lower Elementary Schools.
Hardwood Flooring in New Hope
The history and culture in New Hope make it a destination for many tourists and residents like to maintain its historic charm. To this end, they tend to refinish and restore their hardwood floors rather than install new floors.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood works on all types of hardwood floors. Sometimes floors that seem too far gone can still be repaired and brought back to their original beauty. Our services include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Above all, Hudson Hardwood is reliable and will finish on time, within budget. We believe that having hardwood floors repaired and refinished shouldn’t interrupt your entire schedule. You’ll be pleased to see how our dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products get the job done!
In instances where the floors do need to be replaced, Hudson Hardwood can match traditional styles and colors.
Our Projects
We invite you to browse the amazing before and after photos of past projects. You can also read through the many five-star reviews we are proud to have received.
Free Quotes
If you live in New Hope and need to refinish or restore your hardwood floors, contact Hudson Hardwood today for Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
38,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/newtown-square-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Newtown Square, PA
History of Newtown Square
Newtown Square, PA, is located about 25 miles west of Philadelphia. The town has a long history and was originally a meeting place for Quakers living in the area. In 1711 the Newtown Square Friends Meetinghouse was built, solidifying Newtown Square as a meeting place.
In the 19th century, several mills were built in the area, including a woolen factory, a paper mill, and a sawmill. These businesses brought jobs to the site and other companies built up around them to serve the workers.
When the railroads were being built, none went to Newtown Square, so the population dropped while other towns in the area flourished. By the 20th century, though, Newtown Square had another boom when automobiles became more popular. Farms and other lands were divided, and the area became more suburban.
Historic Sites in Newtown Square
Given its history, it’s not surprising that several locations in Newtown Square are on the National Register of Historic Places. This includes the Square Tavern, Old St. David’s Church, and the Hood Octagonal School. These and other buildings from the 1700 and 1800s give the area a historic charm.
Education in Newtown Square
Newtown Square students attend schools in the Marple Newtown School District. Schools in the district are Marple Newtown High School, Paxon Hollow Middle School, Culbertson Middle School, Loomis Elementary, Russell Elementary, and Worrall Elementary.
Life in Newtown Square Today
The population of Newtown Square today is just over 13,700. Residents enjoy an abundance of green space at parks like Ridley Creek State Park. Downtown Newtown Square boasts upscale shopping at designer boutiques, fine dining, and entertainment.
The area is also known for the Aronimink Golf Club, which is prestigious enough to have hosted the PGA Championship.
Newtown Square is conveniently located near major highways and public transportation, making getting around or commuting to work an easy task.
Hardwood Flooring in Newtown Square
Much of the historic charm of Newtown Square comes from the homes and buildings dating back hundreds of years. While hardwood floors that old are most likely going to be replaced, Hudson Hardwood can match traditional styles and colors to maintain the original look.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood’s experience spans all types of hardwood floors. Whatever your hardwood floor needs, we have a service to help. Services we offer include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Hudson Hardwood has proven time and again that we are reliable and will finish on time, within your budget. It is our goal to disrupt your life and your schedule as little as possible. You’ll be amazed by our dustless sanding technique and environmentally friendly products!
Check Out Our Past Projects
We invite you to browse the amazing before and after photos of past projects. You can also read through the many five-star reviews we are proud to have received.
Ready for a Free Quote?
If you live in Newtown Square and have a hardwood floor project you need help with, contact Hudson Hardwood today for Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
39,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/old-city-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Old City, PA
History of Old City, PA
Old City, PA, is a district located in Philadelphia. Often called the birthplace of American Independence and America’s Most Historic Square Mile, the area is home to many of the most historic sites in the United States.
Old City is the area where William Penn first settled. Just a few of the many destinations in Old City include Independence Hall, the Liberty Bell, Elfreth’s Alley, Carpenters’ Hall, and the Betsy Ross House.
The district is on the National Register of Historic Places and the Philadelphia Register of Historic Places.
Notable Places in Old City
Independence Hall – Declaration of Independence and the U.S. Constitution were signed
Betsy Ross House – Where Betsy Ross sewed the first American flag
Museum of the American Revolution – A museum dedicated to telling the stories of the American Revolution
National Constitution Center – A museum dedicated to the Constitution
Penn’s Landing – an outdoor area along the Delaware River
Elfreth’s Alley – The oldest continually inhabited street in America. Built in 1702, the alley has 32 homes, all built prior to 1836.
Foreign Consulates in Old City
Several countries have chosen Old City to be the home of their U.S. consulate offices. These include Panama, Mexico, Italy, and the Dominican Republic.
Education in Old City
Students in Old City fall under the School District of Philadelphia. Students in K-8th grade attend General George A. McCall School and then go to high school at Benjamin Franklin High School.
The Mastery Charter Schools operates a campus in Old City and St. Mary Interparochial Grade School is in the area.
Life in Old City Today
Today, Old City enjoys vibrant nightlife. Residents have lovingly restored many of the row homes built in the 1800s. Upscale restaurants and bars make Old City a destination for trendy crowds who live in and visit Philadelphia.
The area boasts art galleries and boutique shopping. There are also three Ritz movie theaters specializing in art films. First Fridays are a popular attraction with shops staying open late and special events happening in art, design, and fashion.
The population of Old City is just over 16,000.
Hardwood Flooring in Old City
With its undeniable ties to American history, Old City is a place where homeowners have gone to great lengths to lovingly restore the area, while also modernizing it. Owners of historic homes are often looking to maintain the original charm of their home, so Hudson Hardwood offers hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor restoration services. For clients with newer, more modern tastes, this might mean an entirely new hardwood floor installation.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood’s services include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We are reliable, and pride ourselves on finishing projects on time and within budget. We believe that having your hardwood floors refinished shouldn’t mean that your entire life should be turned upside down. We finish the job with minimal disruption to your daily schedule and life. We use state-of-the-art dustless sanding and the latest environmentally friendly products.
Our Projects
You can see past projects we’ve completed and the amazing results we are able to achieve for our clients. You can also hear directly from our clients about their experiences with Hudson Hardwood.
Free Quotes
Do you live in Old City and have a hardwood floor project? Contact Hudson Hardwood today and we’ll be happy to provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
40,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/paoli-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Paoli is an upscale neighborhood with its high median home value where residents want only the best finishes in their homes. Hardwood floors continue to be a timeless classic, offering beauty and durability to any home. Hudson Hardwood provides hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor restoration services. For clients with newer, more modern tastes, this may mean an entirely new hardwood floor installation.
Hudson Hardwood: Life-Changing Hardwood Flooring Services in Paoli, PA
Our services include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring hardwood floors. We are always reliable, and we always finish your projects on time and within budget. When we are working on your hardwood floors, we don’t think you should have to change your entire schedule. Hudson Hardwood will finish the job with minimal disruption to your daily schedule and life. With dustless sanding and the latest environmentally friendly products, we can minimize the mess and odors.
View Past Projects
You can see past projects we’ve completed and the amazing results we can achieve for our clients. You can also hear directly from our clients about their experiences with Hudson Hardwood.
Get A Free Quote
Do you live in Paoli and need help with a hardwood floor project? Contact Hudson Hardwood today, and we’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.
History of Paoli, PA
Paoli, Pennsylvania, is located in Chester County and spans two townships – Tredyffrin and Willistown. The area began with an inn in 1769 run by Joshua Evans. Joshua’s father had bought 500 acres of land in the area from William Penn. The Inn, and later the town, was named after General Pasquale Paoli. The Inn was located near where the Paoli Post Office is located today and is about 20 miles outside of Philadelphia.
The Battle of Paoli took place on September 20, 1777. Five thousand British soldiers attacked a Patriot camp after intercepting plans from General Washington. Undercover of darkness, they successfully surprised the camp. Over 200 Continental Army soldiers were killed or injured at the battle, while the British lost less than 10.
With the Main Line of Public Works and the Pennsylvania Railroad building, Paoli continued to grow and prosper as part of Philadelphia’s Main Line.
Music in Paoli
Paoli was the original home of the famous Philadelphia Folk Festival. The first festival was held in 1962 at a fifteen-acre farm. By 1965 the festival outgrew the space, with an estimated 15,000 people in attendance. Musical acts who performed there include Judy Collins, The Paul Butterfield Blues Band, and Tom Rush, to name a few.
Musician Chubby Checker never performed at the folk festival, but he was born in Paoli in 1941.
Education in Paoli
Since it spans two townships, students in Paoli are served by different schools depending on where they live. The Tredyffrin/Easttown School District serves students in Tredyffrin Township, and the Great Valley School District serves students located in Willistown Township.
Elementary schools in the area are Beaumont, Hillside, Charlestown, K.D. Markley, Sugartown, and General Wayne. Middle schools include Great Valley, Tredyffrin/Easttown, and Valley Forge. Students attend either Conestoga High School or Great Valley High School.
Other educational institutions in Paoli include Delaware Valley Friends School and St. Norbert School.
Life in Paoli Today
The population of Paoli is approximately 5,600. The average income per household is $79,500, and $340,000 is the median home value.",hudsonhardwood
41,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/phoenixville-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Phoenixville, PA
History of Phoenixville
Phoenixville, Pennsylvania, is a town located in Chester County, approximately 30 miles northwest of Philadelphia. The area was an industrial hub in its heyday and has recently undergone a revitalization making it a destination for shopping and nightlife.
Phoenixville was settled in 1732 and was originally known as Manavon. The borough was incorporated in 1849. Over the years, Phoenixville has been home to many mills and factories. Many of these former businesses are now part of the Phoenixville Historic District. The Historic District is on the National Historic Register along with the Black Rock Bridge, the Schuylkill Navigation Canal, and the Gay Street School.
Phoenixville was home to the first nail factory, the French Creek Nail Works, which opened in 1790.
French Creek and the Schuylkill River intersect in Phoenixville, and access to these waterways contributed to much of its growth.
Notable places in Phoenixville
Phoenixville is well known as the home of the Colonial Theatre. The theatre opened in 1903 and in 1958 was a key location in the movie The Blob. To this day, the town celebrates this fame with an event called Blobfest.
Phoenixville is close to Valley Forge National Historical Park. The Park, in addition to the many river trails along the Schuylkill River, makes Phoenixville a great place to live for those who enjoy the outdoors.
Getting around Phoenixville is easy, with Routes 23, 29, and 113 running through the town. The area is served by SEPTA.
Education in Phoenixville
Phoenixville students attend the Phoenixville Area School District. The district includes three elementary schools, one middle, and one high school. There is also the Technical College High School Pickering Campus, where students can learn hands-on training in some trades.
Private schools in the area include VFKH Montessori School and the Holy Family School. Phoenixville is also home to the well-known Phoenixville Renaissance Academy. Higher education institutions in the area are the Lansdale School of Business and the Unversity of Valley Forge.
Life in Phoenixville Today
Phoenixville’s population today is nearly 17,000. Residents enjoy a thriving downtown area with shopping, dining, and events. Each year the area holds the Dogwood Festival, which includes a carnival and parade. In the summer months (pre-COVID), residents can enjoy First Fridays, where main thoroughfares are closed, and live music can be enjoyed.
With its recent revitalization, Phoenixville has received accolades from many publications citing it as one of the best neighborhoods to live in America. Today, Phoenixville has more breweries per square foot than anywhere else in America.
Hardwood Flooring in Phoenixville
With its long history, Phoenixville is a place where homeowners have gone to great lengths to restore the area while also modernizing it. As downtown has seen an influx of condos, owners of older homes are often looking to maintain the original charm of their homes. Hudson Hardwood offers hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor restoration services.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood’s services include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our service is reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget. Having your hardwood floors refinished shouldn’t mean that your entire life needs to be turned upside down. We finish the job with minimal disruption to your daily schedule and life. Our dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products help cause the least amount of disruption.
Our Projects
Please have a look at past projects we’ve completed and see the amazing results we are able to achieve for our clients. You can also read reviews from our clients about their experiences with Hudson Hardwood.
Free Quotes
Do you live in Phoenixville and have a hardwood floor project? Contact Hudson Hardwood today, and we’ll be happy to provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
42,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/plymouth-meeting-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Plymouth Meeting, PA
Plymouth Meeting lies between Plymouth and Whitemarsh Townships in Montgomery County in Pennsylvania. Just 12 miles from Philadelphia, Plymouth Meeting sees the intersection of three major highways – the Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-276), the Blue Route (I-476), and the Northeast Extension of the Pennsylvania Turnpike (I-476).
History of Plymouth Meeting
Plymouth Meeting was initially settled in 1686 by the Religious Society of Friends, also known as Quakers. The Quakers came from Devonshire, England, and the area gets its name from the English town of Plymouth. In 1708 the Quakers built the now historic Plymouth Friends Meetinghouse.
The Meetinghouse later served as a military hospital during the Revolutionary War in 1778.
The Society of Friends were some of the first in the area to condemn slavery. There were very few slaveholders in Plymouth, and by 1830, there was only one slave left. Throughout the early 1800s, families in the area assisted the Underground Railroad in helping slaves escape to freedom.
Industry in Plymouth Meeting
Early industries in the area include the Hickorytown Forge, a steel company, and Plymouth Furnace, a nail manufacturer.
Limekilns had also been a profitable business in Plymouth Meeting.
Notable places in Plymouth Meeting
Plymouth Meeting is home to many places on the National Register of Historic Places. These include the Plymouth Friends Meetinghouse, Plymouth Meeting Historic District, and the Alan West Corson Homestead.
Today Plymouth Meeting is home to the Plymouth Meeting Mall. The mall recently underwent an extensive renovation where many dining and entertainment options were added. AMC Theatres, Whole Foods, and Dave and Busters call the mall home.
Furniture store IKEA has its U.S. headquarters in Plymouth Meeting and the town is home to many other offices and industrial parks.
Education in Plymouth Meeting
Students in Plymouth Meeting attend school at the Colonial School District. The high-ranking district consistently sees excellent standardized test results.
Elementary schools in the district are Conshohocken Elementary School, Plymouth Elementary School, Ridge Park Elementary School, or Whitemarsh Elementary School. Fourth and fifth graders attend Colonial Elementary School, and Colonial Middle School serves grades 6th – 8th. Plymouth Whitemarsh High School is grades 9th – 12th.
The catholic school in the area is Holy Rosary Regional Catholic School.
Plymouth Meeting Today
Today the population of Plymouth Meeting is around 7,000. The average household income is $95,000, and the median home value is $350,000. The average age of a person living in Plymouth Meeting is 41 years old, making it a young and affluent population.
Hardwood Flooring in Plymouth Meeting
Plymouth Meeting is home to many large and beautiful homes. Homeowners want top-quality craftsmanship and finishes in their homes. For this reason, hardwood floors are a popular choice when refinishing or installing new floors.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood’s hardwood floor services include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We offer reliable service that is second to none. Our promise to you is that we will finish on time and within your budget. At Hudson Hardwood, we believe that having your hardwood floors refinished shouldn’t mean that your entire life is turned upside down. It is our goal to complete the project with minimal disruption to your schedule and daily life. Our dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products help cause the least amount of trouble.
Hudson Hardwood Projects
Please take a minute to browse Hudson Hardwood’s past hardwood floor projects and see the fantastic results we can achieve for our clients. Read reviews about the many positive experiences our customers have had.
Free Quotes
Do you live in Plymouth Meeting and need help with a hardwood floor project? Contact Hudson Hardwood today, and we’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
43,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/pottstown-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood can lose its original beauty over time. If you installed it because of its rustic appeal, seeing your floor being worn out is something you won’t want to experience. Be it a new installation, restoration, or refurbishing your old stairs, there’s one thing you must do: call the experts.
Looking for the best hardwood flooring company in Pottstown, PA? We got you.
Hudson Hardwood has been in the industry for over a decade, and we are well-known for providing the highest quality products at the highest level of service. We will make sure every work we take is finished flawlessly, whether it’s an easy or large task.
Our Services
Hudson Hardwood is a flooring company serving the greater Pottstown area; our commercial services will save you time and money while extending the longevity of your investment in hardwood. Take a look at our services to learn more:
Refinishing
Want a more affordable option than a new hardwood floor installation? Refinishing your wood floor is what should be done. It is a more cost-effective option, allowing you to have a higher quality and more durable finish.
4 Benefits:
- Repair pet stains and scratches.
- Improve your property’s value.
- It takes care of gaps and cracks.
- Fix uneven buckling.
Cleaning & Recoating
If your floor is still in prime condition, but you still want it to look brand new, cleaning and recoating is what you may need. In this process, our expert craftsmen perform a light rubbing of the top layer of your finish without touching the actual wood.
3 Benefits:
- Removes short-term finishes that cloud and haze wood floors.
- It is a cost-effective way to refresh your hardwood floors.
- Repairs fading and fine scratches on the surface of the finish only.
Installation
Hudson Hardwood team has enough experience on the field to guarantee a top-notch floor installation for your home or business. With state-of-the-art materials, we will install the floor of your dreams.
3 Benefits:
- Property Value Increase.
- Better Air Quality.
- Extended life span at a lower cost.
Stairs
When it comes to your hardwood stairs, you can go from restoring a few steps to completely replacing them. Hudson Hardwood’s team will guide you through finding the best solution that fits your budget and meets your needs.
2 Benefits:
- Updating your staircase causes minimum inconvenience.
- Wood stairs are organic and naturally appealing.
Why Choose Us?
Hudson Hardwood is your top choice when it comes to finding a hardwood flooring company in Pottstown, PA. With 20+ years of experience in the industry, we offer reliable service with eco-friendly products, dustless sanding, furniture moving, and livable conditions during the renovation.
It doesn’t matter how big or small the residential or commercial project is; we will take care of it amazingly.",hudsonhardwood
44,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/quality-hardwood-flooring-for-bala-cynwyd-pa/,"Bala Cynwyd is a proud community full of history. Homeowners here can now take advantage of the highest quality hardwood flooring. Hudson Hardwood sells and installs different types of wood flooring, providing top-notch hardwood flooring services in Bala Cynwyd, PA.
A Family-Friendly Place
Bala Cynwyd is a community with a lot of history and charm in Philadelphia. The area is part of Lower Merion, has a great suburban feel, and is the perfect home for those who want to be close to a major city but not live in one. It’s also great for those looking for family-friendly neighborhoods and historic areas with lots of old homes and charm.
If you’re a resident of this area, it would be wise to know as much as possible about the types of hardwood flooring available so you can choose the right option for your house. Fortunately, Hudson Hardwood sells high-quality hardwood flooring services in Bala Cynwyd, PA.
Raise The Value Of Your House
Hardwood flooring is a durable type of flooring, resistant to humidity and temperature changes. It will not split or warp like cheaper materials might. At Hudson Hardwood, we know that hardwood flooring adds something beyond simple beauty; it also offers boosted value to your home. When adequately maintained, it raises its resale value.
Our Hardwood Flooring Services
Do you want to give your home an extra touch of elegance? Hardwood flooring can do just that – transforming any room into a place where you will be proud to entertain guests or kick back and relax after a long day at work.
It can be tough to choose the best hardwood floor for your space with all of the options available. However, Hudson Hardwood specializes in working with homeowners like you who want to ensure they are getting precisely what they need. We want to be your go-to flooring company in Bala Cynwyd, PA.
Restoration, Maintenance, And New Floorings
At Hudson Hardwood, we are set to aid you out with all your flooring needs. Whether you require restoring an old floor or mount a brand-new hardwood flooring, we will get the job done. We can also assist you with any concerns, from installment to completing touches. Whether it’s a new setup or a repair job, we can manage it for you to ensure that your days are worry-free.
We’re the flooring company in Bala Cynwyd, PA ready to help you out.",hudsonhardwood
45,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/rittenhouse-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Rittenhouse, PA
Hudson Hardwood is the top provider of hardwood flooring solutions for Rittenhouse residents. We’re proud to offer hardwood floor restoration in Rittenhouse, PA, bringing back to top shape the beautiful hardwood floors of Rittenhouse. Whether you need restoration service, hardwood floor installation, or hardwood floor refinishing, Hudson Hardwood is the way to go.
Our Services
Hudson Hardwood installs and refinishes hardwood flooring for residential and commercial properties located in Rittenhouse, PA. Whether your wood floors need an update or you want to install something brand new, our team of expert craftsmen can help you out! We’ll elevate the appearance of any home or business through the beauty of classic hardwood flooring.
Our professional hardwood flooring services include:
- Hardwood Floor Refinishing
- Hardwood Floor Installation
- Hardwood Floor Cleaning
- Hardwood Floor Recoating
- Hardwood Floor Restoration
These services are guaranteed to keep your hardwood floors in top condition for years to come. This way, your hardwood floors can be enjoyed for generations.
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood?
At Hudson Hardwood, you’ll find a reliable team of contractors ready to help you. We have over 20 years of experience and have been certified by the NWFA since 2008. Whether it’s for your home or business, our hardwood floor services are ideal for all. Our contractors are experts in maintaining healthy indoor air quality during and after work. We only use eco-friendly products.
You can count on us for many reasons. Our services are reliable, and we always offer daily job updates. Our experts will always get the job done right and within schedule. We understand how important your time is. We can help you out move your furniture for our flooring services, and we offer livable conditions while we work.
Rittenhouse Square Philadelphia Hardwood Floor Refinishing & Restoration
Are you looking for hardwood floor restoration in Rittenhouse, PA? Hudson Hardwood is the way to go! We’re proud to offer top-notch services, including hardwood floor installation and hardwood floor refinishing. Our services boost your curb appeal and give your home or business a new image. Contact Hudson Hardwood today!
We offer:
- Reliable service and daily job updates
- Our hardwood flooring experts get your project done right, and on schedule.
- Furniture moving
- We offer the optional service of moving your furniture.
- Livable conditions during renovation
- We work around your family’s schedule, so you can stay in place.
- Dustless sanding
- We will leave your property as clean as possible. Cleaning and re-coating is no mess/dust situation.
- Environmentally friendly products
- Low VOC, green rated finishes available.
- 20+ years experience
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
46,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/skippack-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Skippack, PA
Skippack, Pennsylvania, is an area covering approximately 2.6 square miles in Skippack Township, Montgomery County. Originally settled by German immigrants who were linen weavers and farmers, the area has always historically been a shopping and entertainment destination – something that continues to this day.
Many of Skippack’s original buildings still stand, including an Inn that was previously known as Valley House and is now Justin’s Carriage House. The original general store in Skippack was long-used as an antique shop until it was torn down in 2015 after a fire destroyed most of it.
History of Skippack
Skippack Township was once known as Van Bebber’s Township, named after Matthias Van Bebber, who received the land from William Penn in 1702. Later it was known as “Skippack and Perkiomen Township,” until it was split into two separate areas – Skippack and Perkiomen Township.
Skippack enjoyed trolley service starting in 1908 on the Souderton, Skippack & Fairview Electric Railway Co. Construction all the way to Souderton was never completed. In 1925 busses replaced the trolley and in 1940 bus service came to an end. The railway was later renamed the Montgomery County Rapid Transit Company and then the Montgomery Transit Company.
The Township is home to the Indenhofen (De Haven) Farmstead, one of the oldest homes in the area, believed to have been built in 1720. The Farm was originally about 440 acres large and is listed on the National Register of Historic Places as the Warren Z. Cole House.
Education in Skippack
The Perkiomen Valley Area School District teaches students in Skippack. Students attend Skippack Elementary School and then Perkiomen Valley Middle and High Schools. The area also includes a Goddard School and the Skippack School of Music.
Things to do in Skippack
Today Skippack Village is the main attraction in Skippack Township. Its main street is packed with tourists and residents visiting unique and quaint shops, casual restaurants, art galleries, and antique shops. The Village holds many events throughout the year, including free concerts, to attract visitors.
Skippack First Fridays are held April through October and include artists and entertainment the whole family can enjoy.
Skippack Today
The population of Skippack is just over 3,775. The median household income is approximately $116,000, and $350,000 is the median property value.
Hardwood Flooring in Skippack
Skippack is an affluent, historical, and highly desirable community. Residents appreciate the warmth and long-lasting beauty that hardwood floors bring. Hardwood floors are always a great investment in the future of your home. Hudson Hardwood uses our knowledge and years of experience to restore and refinish your hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Skippack neighborhoods.
Hudson Hardwood
We are reliable, and we take great pride in finishing hardwood floor projects within budget and on time. Hudson Hardwood’s services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We utilize a dustless sanding technique that reduces the mess in your home. You’ll be surprised by how little disruption there will be to your everyday schedule while we’re refinishing your hardwood floors.
Our Projects
We invite you to browse through our past projects and see for yourself the exceptional upgrades and improvements Hudson Hardwood has achieved in customers’ homes. Let us do the same for your hardwood floors!
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
If you live in Skippack and have a hardwood floor project you need help with, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. We’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
47,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/society-hill-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Society Hill, PA
Society Hill, Philadelphia is one of the historic areas in Pennsylvania. Its residents are full of historic buildings with beautiful hardwood floors. At Hudson Hardwood, we’re ready to serve Society Hill with our top-notch hardwood flooring services. Hudson Hardwood is the place to go whether you need installation, refinishing, or restoration. Discover what sets us apart here.
We’re Proud To Serve Society Hill
Society Hill is one of the most historic residential neighborhoods in Philadelphia. The neighborhood still boasts cobblestone streets and homes dating back to the 18th and early 19th centuries. Society Hill is near Independence Hall, the Liberty Bell, and beautiful Washington Square Park
If you’re lucky enough to live in this wonderful area, you know your home is a treasure. And, if you have hardwood floors, they are likely one of your favorite features. At Hudson Hardwood, we understand how important your floors are to you. That’s why we offer the best hardwood flooring services in Society Hill.
What Sets Us Apart?
Many hardwood flooring companies are out there, so what sets Hudson Hardwood apart from the rest? Here are a few things that make us the best choice for hardwood flooring services in Society Hill, Philadelphia:
- We have over 20 years of experience.
- We use only the highest quality materials.
- We offer a wide range of services, including installation, refinishing, and restoration.
- We’re a family-owned and operated business.
- We’re dedicated to providing outstanding customer service.
Benefits Of Getting Our Hardwood Flooring Services
There are many benefits of getting hardwood flooring services in Society Hill. Residents of Society Hill, Philadelphia; should get frequent hardwood floor refinishing. Here are a few of the most notable benefits:
- You’ll increase the value of your home.
- You’ll protect your floors from wear and tear.
- You’ll extend the life of your floors.
- You’ll enjoy the beauty of your floors for years to come.
Get The Best Hardwood Flooring Services
If you’re ready to experience the benefits of hardwood flooring services in Society Hill, contact Hudson Hardwood today! We’re always happy to answer any questions you may have about our services. Hudson Hardwood is the best choice for hardwood flooring services in Society Hill. Get a free quote today!",hudsonhardwood
48,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/swarthmore-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Swarthmore, PA
History of Swarthmore, PA
Swarthmore, PA is located in Delaware County, Pennsylvania. Originally called Westdale, the town name was changed to Swarthmore after Swarthmore College was built in 1864. The growth of Swarthmore is attributed to the college and rail service, which came to the area in the 1880s.
The borough of Swarthmore was incorporated in 1893. Approximately one-third of the borough is part of the Swarthmore College campus. Streets in the area are named after other colleges, and Victorian-style homes from the 1920s are common.
Notable places from Swarthmore
Swarthmore has two locations on the National Register of Historic Places – Ogden House and Benjamin West Birthplace. Benjamin West was a painter whom the town was initially named after. Ogden House is a home dating back to 1736.
Education in Swarthmore
The Wallingford-Swarthmore School District serves students in Swarthmore. The Swarthmore-Rutledge Elementary School is located in what used to be Swarthmore High School and services grades K-5. The Strath Haven Middle School is for grades 6 – 8, and the Strath Haven High School serves grades 9 – 12.
The George Crothers Memorial School is a private school in the area, and the Notre Dame de Lourdes Catholic School is near the borough.
Swarthmore College
Swarthmore College was founded by the Religious Society of Friends, also known as Quakers. The college is a private liberal arts college spanning 425 acres. The campus is home to Scott Arboretum and is known for its beautiful scenery, hiking trails, and a creek. The Arboretum is home to over 4,000 labeled plants, and residents can visit the Arboretum at no charge.
Each year the college holds its graduation ceremonies at the Scott Outdoor Amphitheater, and graduates receive roses from the Dean Bond Rose Garden.
Today there are approximately 1,650 students enrolled at Swarthmore College.
Life in Swarthmore Today
The population of Swarthmore today is just over 6,300. The average income of residents is $109,000, and the median property value is $410,000.
Parks and Recreation in Swarthmore
Residents of Swarthmore enjoy an abundance of parks and recreational areas. Gateway Park marks the main entrance into the borough and is a permanent green space. Umoja Park boasts picnic tables, benches, and mature trees.
Thatcher Park is ideal for young children with its fenced perimeter. The park also includes a demonstration rain garden and playground equipment. Little Crum Creek is the largest park in the area and consists of a diverse habitat of plants.
In addition, there are several playing fields run by the school district, including Henderson Field, Swarthmore-Rutledge School Field, and Rutgers Avenue Field.
Hardwood Flooring in Swarthmore
Swarthmore is an affluent area where homeowners take great pride in how their homes look. As such, they can appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. Hudson Hardwood has the experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in the many beautiful homes in Swarthmore.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood offers hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our dustless sanding technique reduces the mess created by sanding in your home. We believe that having a hardwood floor project completed shouldn’t disrupt your entire life. We pride ourselves on being reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget.
Our Projects
Please take a moment to browse past projects and read reviews from our many satisfied clients about their positive experiences with Hudson Hardwood.
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
Are you a resident of Swarthmore and need help with a hardwood floor project? Contact us today, and we’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
49,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/upper-dublin-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Upper Dublin, PA
History of Upper Dublin, PA
Upper Dublin is a township located in Montgomery County, Pennsylvania. Upper Dublin Township includes parts of many communities around it, such as Abington, Ambler, Fort Washington, Maple Glen, and Willow Grove. The area was mainly farmland until after WWII, when a population boom occurred, and it became a suburban neighborhood.
William Penn granted the land to Edward Tanner, and this was originally the location of Upper Dublin and Lower Dublin. Lower Dublin eventually became part of the city of Philadelphia, and in 1701 Upper Dublin Township was established.
During the Revolutionary War, George Washington and his army stayed in Upper Dublin after the Battle of Germantown in 1777. The Battle of White Marsh took place in Upper Dublin between the British and American forces. Washington was headquartered at Emlen House, and General William Howe of Britain utilized St. Thomas’ Episcopal Church as a lookout.
Education in Upper Dublin
Students in Upper Dublin attend one of the following elementary schools – Fort Washington Elementary School, Maple Glen Elementary School, Jarrettown Elementary School, or Thomas Fitzwater Elementary School. Students go on to Sandy Run Middle School and then Upper Dublin High School.
Upper Dublin High School is a highly ranked public school placing fifth highest on the Scholastic Assessment Test (SAT).
Private schools in the area include Our Lady of Mercy Regional Catholic School, St. Anthony-St. Joseph, and St. Catherine of Siena.
Continuing education options include Temple University’s Ambler and Fort Washington campuses, and Gwynedd Mercy College, and DeVry University.
Life in Upper Dublin Today
Today, the population of Upper Dublin is approximately 26,500. Up until around the 1950s, the population was just around 6,000, but after WWII, the area saw rapid growth. It has the fourth-highest median income in Montgomery County and has easy access to major highways and transportation for fast commutes.
Parks and Recreation in Upper Dublin
Residents of Upper Dublin enjoy many parks and recreational areas. It is also home to Manufacturers Golf and Country Club and Lu Lu Country Club.
The area includes over 600 acres of parkland. Some are open spaces, while others include playgrounds, jogging trails, tennis courts, pavilions, and sports fields. There is even a park for the dogs – MonDaug Bark Park.
Hardwood Flooring in Upper Dublin
Upper Dublin is a very affluent area where homeowners take great pride in how their homes look. Residents appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. Hudson Hardwood has the experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in the many beautiful homes in Upper Dublin.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood offers hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our dustless sanding technique reduces the mess created by sanding in your home. Despite popular opinion, having sanding done in your home does not have to make the entire house a mess. We pride ourselves on being reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget.
Our Projects
We invite you to browse our past projects and see the upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our clients. Let us do the same for your hardwood floors!
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
Are you a resident of Upper Dublin and need help with a hardwood floor project? Contact us today, and we’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
50,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/villanova-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Villanova, PA
Villanova, Pennsylvania, is a suburb of Philadelphia in the heart of the area known as the Main Line. The area is an affluent group of towns that run along the railroad tracks of the Pennsylvania Railroad. The town’s residents have a median income of nearly $180,000, and the average age is just 26 years old.
Education in Villanova
Villanova is well known for being home to Villanova University, after which the town is named. The university has a robust athletics program with basketball, football, hockey, lacrosse teams, and more. The school is a private Catholic research school with both graduate and undergraduate programs. Graduate programs are offered in nursing, various certificate programs, and the Villanova University Law School.
Founded in 1842, Villanova University is the oldest Catholic university in the United States. Up until 1918, Villanova was all male. Today the campus spans over 250 acres, just 12 miles from Philadelphia. Current enrollment is near 11,000.
Resident students of Villanova attend public schools in either Radnor Township or Gladwyne. Radnor Township schools include Radnor Elementary School, Radnor Middle School, and Radnor High School. Gladwyne schools are Gladwyne Elementary School, Welsh Valley Middle School, and Harriton High School.
Students may also attend Haverford School, which is all boys, Episcopal Academy, the all-girls Agnes Irwin School, or the Country Day School of the Sacred Heart.
Bryn Mawr Hospital
Bryn Mawr Hospital serves the Villanova area. It is one of three nationally-ranked teaching hospitals. Each year the hospital is the beneficiary of the Devon Horse Show and fair. Bryn Mawr Hospital is a teaching hospital and is associated with Jefferson Medical College.
Famous People from Villanova
Many famous people hail from Villanova. These include Julius Erving (Dr. J), Will Smith (actor), and Michael Smerconish (journalist and political commentator).
Notable places in Villanova
In addition to Villanova University and Bryn Mawr Hospital, notable places in Villanova include the Appleford/Parsons-Banks Arboretum, the Arboretum Villanova, Stoneleigh: A Natural Garden, and Friends of the Willows Cottage.
Hardwood Flooring in Villanova
Villanova is an extremely affluent area where home prices can start in the high $400s and go up into the millions. Residents appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home, and they understand the high-end finishes that people expect in homes in this price range. Hudson Hardwood has the experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Villanova’s many well-cared-for homes.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood offers hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our dustless sanding technique dramatically reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home. We can restore, refinish, or install new hardwood floors without major disruptions to your everyday life. We pride ourselves on being reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget.
Our Projects
Please take a moment to browse our past projects and see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our clients. Let us do the same for your hardwood floors!
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
Are you a resident of Villanova and need help with a hardwood floor project? Contact us today, and we’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
51,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/washington-square-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA
Hardwood floors are a classic flooring option in Washington Square. At Hudson Hardwood, we’re ready to help its residents with our hardwood floor services. Be it if you need to care for a hardwood floor or if you want to install a new one, you’ll find out our services are ideal. Transform your house today with Hudson Hardwood!
We’re Proud Serve Washington Square
Washington Square is a wonderful place full of historic buildings. Its lively neighborhood has made the area renowned for its energy and friendliness. Moreover, you’ll find many classical examples of American architecture. Many of these buildings have hardwood floors, including some historical ones.
At Hudson Hardwood, we’re proud to serve Washington Square with our hardwood floor restoration in Washington Square and other services such as hardwood floor installation and hardwood floor refinishing. We have served Philadelphia residents with dedication and expertise for years, improving their homes and businesses with our services.
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood
At Hudson Hardwood, we strive to deliver the best quality services. We offer the best hardwood floor installation services that are perfect for any house or business! We only use the highest quality hardwood to ensure your floors will last a lifetime. Our hardwood floors are sure to boost your home value and curb appeal.
If you need to freshen up your hardwood floors, we can also help you out! Our hardwood refinishing services are ideal for revitalizing and caring for your hardwood floors. Our services won’t disrupt your schedule and keep a high indoor air quality. We use dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products only!
Washington Square Philadelphia Hardwood Floor Refinishing & Restoration
With Hudson Hardwood, you can boost your home value and give your house just the right touch it needs. We offer the best hardwood floor restoration in Washington Square! You can also count on us for hardwood floor installation and hardwood floor refinishing.
Our hardwood flooring solutions are efficient and ideal for any home or business. We always make sure you can enjoy all the wonderful benefits of hardwood flooring, such as its timeless elegance and durability. Find your hardwood floor solutions with Hudson Hardwood!",hudsonhardwood
52,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/wayne-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Wayne houses are true works of art, and they look better when they’re well-cared for. That’s why at Hudson Hardwood, we offer hardwood flooring services in Wayne, PA. Our professional installers can help make your next flooring project an easy process. We can assist you in choosing the right hardwood for your home and lifestyle, as we offer a variety of finishes and stains to accommodate all different tastes and budgets.
Our goal is to help Wayne residents to make their houses look fantastic and make them feel great. If you’re a Wayne resident, the next time you’re thinking about updating your home, give us a call, and we can make your floor shine bright like a diamond!
Learn About Our Services
Hardwood flooring is very versatile and attractive. It can be used in many home areas, including kitchens, bathrooms, living rooms, bedrooms, or even basements! Hardwood floors are also very classy and attractive to look at! It’s no wonder why many people choose hardwoods as their main choice for flooring!
Because of that, Hudson Hardwood provides you with hardwood flooring services in Wayne, PA, such as refinishing, cleaning and coating, and installing residential and commercial flooring that makes your property look amazing.
Refinishing
You may rejuvenate your hardwood flooring by refinishing them to their original beauty or give them a new color and luster for a refreshing new appearance. Refinishing your wood floor is considerably less expensive than installing down a new hardwood floor. It’s also an opportunity to upgrade to superior quality and a more long-lasting finish that better protects your floors.
Cleaning & Recoating
You can clean and recoat your hardwood floors for a fraction of the price and time it takes to refinish them, increasing the value of your property. It removes temporary coatings that cloud and haze wood floors. Clouding and hazing on hardwood are caused by mop and glow and murphy oil soap, which professionals can remove.
Installation
For many years, Hudson Hardwood has served as the most reliable commercial and residential flooring company. On every job we have completed, we’ve shown our trustworthiness and competence. Throughout the installation process, we consider all of our customer’s demands and desires to ensure they are satisfied and blown away by the results.
Things You Might Find Interesting About Wayne, PA
Wayne is a small town in the middle of Pennsylvania. With an affluent lifestyle and calm and quiet surroundings, it’s no secret that Wayne is a great place to live in. The downtown area has plenty of shops, restaurants, gardens, movie theaters, and trails systems to explore. The city offers an old-time feel that many people love about this part of the state.
Houses in Wayne are historic homes, the majority being built in the late 1800s and early 1900s. Homes in Wayne vary in style, but Wayne’s most remarkable house styles are country cottage, Georgian, and classic colonial. If you live in Wayne and want to add value and beauty to your home, you should consider hardwood flooring. At Hudson Hardwood, we provide you with hardwood flooring services in Wayne, PA.
With our services, your home will come back to life! If you want more information, visit our website and get a free quote today.",hudsonhardwood
53,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/west-chester-pa-hardwood-flooring-service/,"When looking for residential or commercial flooring services, you may find a sea of companies promising you the best work and materials for your projects. But how could you choose? One thing you always have to consider is the reviews and experience they have.
That being said, we want to make it easier for you; so here we are introducing ourselves.
Hudson Hardwood is the first option when homeowners or businesses need a hardwood flooring company in West Chester, PA. With plenty of years working in the industry, we have gained a good reputation among our competitors and customers. Want to get in touch with our experts directly?
Residential Hardwood Flooring Services
Hudson Hardwood’s team specializes in refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors and stairs regarding residential flooring services.
We will analyze your floor to determine which service fits your situation and budget so we can execute your project excellently.
Whether updating an existing floor or starting from scratch, Hudson Hardwood aims to bring warmth and appeal to your spaces through wood flooring’s classic beauty.
Commercial Hardwood Flooring Services
At Hudson Hardwood, we guarantee that hardwood flooring is an excellent choice for commercial establishments. Hardwood floors provide a refined touch that makes your establishment look stylish and are easy to clean.
Some of the common businesses a hardwood floor can function in are:
Offices: Hardwood flooring can make an office look more elegant. Hardwood floors are easier to maintain than other materials and can withstand heavy traffic.
Hotels: Hardwood floors are also easy to clean and maintain, making them perfect for hotel rooms. Hardwood floors can work in both small and large establishments.
Restaurants: Hardwood floors will give your restaurant a stylish and polished appearance.
Choose Reliability, Choose Us
At Hudson Hardwood, we don’t pride ourselves on our work quality without reason; our customers are encouraged to leave a review or testimonial to help us improve and know what we are doing great. By far, we let them know why choosing us is a good opportunity for them, and they let us know why we always keep them as our top priority.
We care about our clients’ needs and opinions; we hear you. If you are looking for a hardwood flooring company in West Chester, PA, Hudson Hardwood is ready to assist you.",hudsonhardwood
54,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/wyndmoor-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Wyndmoor, PA
Wyndmoor is a town located in Springfield Township, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania. The area was initially managed by William Penn, who kept Springfield Township as one of his family’s original homes in the 1680s. Wyndmoor was also home to the estate of Edward T. Stotesbury, an estate banking executive, whose 147-room mansion was not demolished until 1980 after the land was turned into a housing development.
The Wyndmoor Hose Company No. 1 was formed in 1906 and continues operations today. Over the years, the Company has grown, moved, and become a part of the community. Operated 100% by volunteers, today the Company promotes fire safety and provides fire and other emergency response with its 50+ dedicated members.
Historical Places in Wyndmoor
Wyndmoor is home to a few places on the National Register of Historic Place. The Stotesbury Club House was built in 1908 as an equestrian center, and the John Welsh House, built in 1867, was first owned by Hannah Callowhill Penn, William Penn’s second wife.
Education in Wyndmoor
Depending on where they are located, students in Wyndmoor attend schools in Springfield Township School District, Cheltenham School District, or Philadelphia School District. Wyndmoor is also home to La Salle College High School, a Catholic college prep school founded in 1858, serving approximately 1,000 students. The Regina Coeli Academy is also in Wyndmoor and is a private school serving K-8th grade.
Additionally, The Institutes for the Achievement of Human Potential is in Wyndmoor. The institute practices a sometimes-controversial form of therapy to help children with brain injuries and well children.
Things to Do
Residents of Wyndmoor enjoy many parks and recreation areas. Laurel Beech Park is 6.5 acres and features multi-purpose fields and a playground. Veterans Park is home to little league fields, and the Springfield Township Recreation Center Campus includes basketball courts, gymnasium, and kitchen facilities.
Wyndmoor Today
The average salary in Wyndmoor is $66,300 and the average household income is $130,000. Its population is approximately 5,700.
Hardwood Flooring in Wyndmoor
Wyndmoor is an affluent area with beautiful homes and neighborhoods. From quaint, older rowhomes to larger, newer homes in developments, residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. High-end finishes like hardwood floors consistently increase the value of a home. Hudson Hardwood brings the experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Wyndmoor neighborhoods.
Hudson Hardwood
We pride ourselves on being reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget. Hudson Hardwood’s services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our dustless sanding technique greatly reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home. We can restore, refinish, or install new hardwood floors without significant disruptions to your daily schedule.
Our Projects
Please take a moment to browse our past projects and see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our clients. Let us do the same for your hardwood floors!
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
Residents of Wyndmoor who are thinking of refinishing hardwood floors, or installing new hardwood floors, should contact Hudson Hardwood today. We’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
55,https://hudsonhardwood.com/areas-we-serve/wynnewood-pa-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Wynnewood, PA
Wynnewood, Pennsylvania, is an area located west of Philadelphia that spans across many counties and townships, including Haverford Township, Montgomery County, Lower Merion Township, and Delaware County. In 1961 William Penn named the area after his doctor, Dr. Thomas Wynne. Dr. Wynne also served as the first Speaker of the Pennsylvania General Assembly.
Wynnewood neighbors Lower Merion Township, one of the most affluent jurisdictions in the United States and is part of Pennsylvania’s historic and affluent Main Line.
Famous Places in Wynnewood
Wynnewood is home to Lankenau Hospital which is affiliated with Jefferson and Drexel colleges of medicine. Lankenau is consistently listed at the top of the nation’s best community hospitals. Lankenau’s campus is also where Saunders House, a rehabilitation facility, is located.
Wynnewood is home to the St. Charles Borromeo Seminary and the Palmer Theological Seminary, which began in the late 1800s and early 1900s respectively.
Wynnewood is known for having tree-lined streets and mature stone homes. Along Lancaster Avenue there are many car dealerships which make it a destination for car-buyers nearby.
Education in Wynnewood
Students in Wynnewood attend a variety of school districts depending on their grade. Elementary schools are in Lower Merion School District. Students then attend Bala Cynwyd Middle School and either Lower Merion High School or Harriton High School.
Additionally, there are many private and parochial schools in the area. These include Baldwin, Agnes Irwin, and The Haverford School. The Friends’ Central School is a K-12 Quaker school. The Jack M. Barrack Hebrew Academy and the Solomon Schechter School are both Jewish-affiliated schools.
Continuing education institutions in the area include Saint Joseph’s University, Villanova University, Rosemont College, Cabrini College, Eastern University, and Haverford College.
Finally, The Japanese Language School of Philadelphia holds its classes at the Friends Central School.
Things to Do in Wynnewood
Residents and visitors of Wynnewood can enjoy Shortridge Memorial Park. The Park is where the Indian Creek flows and the area has been revitalized and restored. The Wynnewood Civic Association and the Shortridge Association of Wynnewood are two active resident organizations.
The Wynnewood Valley Park Sensory Garden is a unique attraction for people who are visually and non-visually impaired.
Famous People from Wynnewood
NBA star Kobe Bryant lived in Wynnewood and attended Lower Merion High School. The singer and musician Joan Jett, frontwoman for the band Joan Jett and the Blackhearts, was born in Wynnewood. Singer Patti Labelle also hailed from Wynnewood.
Wynnewood Today
The population of Wynnewood is approximately 13,500 with an average household income of nearly $200,000.
Hardwood Flooring in Wynnewood
Wynnewood is an affluent area with beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods. From quaint, older homes to new construction, residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. High-end finishes like hardwood floors consistently increase the value of a home. Hudson Hardwood brings the experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Wynnewood neighborhoods.
Hudson Hardwood
We pride ourselves on being reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget. Hudson Hardwood’s services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our dustless sanding technique greatly reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home. We can restore, refinish, or install new hardwood floors without significant disruptions to your daily schedule.
Our Projects
We invite you to browse our projects and see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our customers. Let us do the same for your hardwood floors!
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
Residents of Wynnewood who are thinking of refinishing hardwood floors, or installing new hardwood floors, contact Hudson Hardwood today. We’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
56,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/,"Hardwood floors look beautiful in nearly any house and they are a long-lasting choice. Whatever condition your hardwood floors are in, it should be possible to restore them to their former glory. Worn-looking hardwood might need to be cleaned and…
When doing hardwood floor refinishing, you might have some challenges choosing between oil and water-based polyurethane materials. Both products are suitable to refinish hardwood floors, but some differences might help you decide which product is suited for your preferred hardwood…
Are you a business owner, manager, or facilities staff member in Philadelphia looking to install hardwood floors in your commercial space? If so, you've come to the right place. Hardwood floors offer numerous benefits for businesses, including durability and an…
Are you looking to revitalize your home or office space? Refinishing your hardwood floors can breathe new life into any space. In this article, Joe from Hudson Hardwood will take you through the step-by-step process of refinishing hardwood floors, from…
When refinishing hardwood floors, it is essential to understand the difference between water-based and oil-based floors. While many try to determine which is better, the truth is that it depends on your needs and overall goals. There is no hardwood…
Are you a homeowner in Philadelphia with older wood floors in need of restoration or refinishing? Look no further! In this blog post, we'll provide you with everything you need to know about restoring old, original hardwood floors in your…
Isn't Philly flooring beautiful? Are you a Philadelphia homeowner with hardwood floors? It's important to keep them looking their best. With time and wear, hardwood floors can lose their shine and appeal. But don't worry - there are ways to…
When refinishing hardwood floors, there’s a lot of work involved. But some of the work is researching to find out what type of hardwood floor finish will work best. When you do your research, the most important thing to consider…
When it comes time to replace your flooring or remove the carpeting and try something new, solid hardwood floors are a great option to consider. Solid hardwood floor, much like the name suggests, is made of solid wood from top…
One of the reasons I am such a fan of wood flooring is that it is the only renewable flooring option available on the market. I was shocked when I learned that hardwood floors have a service life of a…",hudsonhardwood
57,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/3-signs-you-need-to-refinish-your-hardwood-floors/,"Like most homeowners, you probably take great pride in your hardwood floors. Hardwood gives a lot of character and style to your home, but it requires maintenance to keep it looking its best. Over time, your floors may start to look a little worn down, dull, or scratched. If you notice this, it might be time to refinish them.
Here are 3 signs that it’s time for a fresh coat of finish:
1. Your Floors Lost Their Luster
Over time, your hardwood floors will lose their shine and become dull. If you’ve tried cleaning them, but they still look lackluster, it might be time to refinish them. Refinishing your floors is a big project, but it can make a huge difference in how your home looks and feels. Refinished floors regain their luster and help increase your home’s value.
2. You Notice Scratches And Dents
Over time, your hardwood floors will show signs of wear and tear. You might notice scratches from pet claws or high heels. Or, you might see dents from dropped items or furniture being moved around. These blemishes are expected, but they can make your floors look old and worn. Refinishing your floors will get rid of all the scratches and dents and start fresh with a new finish.
3. Your Floors Are Worn In High-Traffic Areas
High-traffic areas like hallways, living rooms, and kitchens can take a toll on your floors. You might notice that the finish is starting to wear away in these areas, or you might see damage from all the foot traffic. If your hardwood floors show signs of wear in high-traffic areas, it’s probably time to refinish them. Refinishing your floors will extend their lifespan.
Hire A Reliable Refinishing Service
Are you looking for hardwood floor refinishing services in Philadelphia? At Hudson Hardwood, we have over 20 years of experience serving Philadelphia and its surroundings with the best hardwood floor refinishing services. We have the know-how to work on a refinishing project with excellence and efficiency. Our team uses the latest equipment and techniques to make your floors look new.
We’ll be happy to answer any questions about the process and help you decide if refinishing your hardwood floors is the right choice.",hudsonhardwood
58,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/3-upgrades-you-can-do-to-make-your-room-look-bigger/,"We all want a bigger space to live in. It makes us feel more comfortable and relaxed. Many homeowners think that the only way to make their space look bigger is by adding an addition. That’s not true! There are various ways to make small changes at home that will create the illusion of an expansive and open room without going through all the trouble of building a whole new one.
So, if you feel like your room is shrinking, it might be time to do some upgrades. In this blog post, we’ll show you how to make a small bedroom seem larger and feel more spacious without breaking the bank.
Is your room feeling too small? Here’s how to fix it
Let In Natural Light
Letting natural light into you will make your room look bigger. So, when you open your windows or install a new window, your room will immediately look more spacious. This is an easy and inexpensive method to make your living area appear larger and brighter.
Use Rugs To Separate Rooms
This is a simple little living room design idea that has numerous rooms in an area. You can get creative and pick a rug that compliments your decor style. This provides a sense of division between areas by adding a visual aspect.
Create Flooring Illusions
Install wood or tile panels at the longest width of your room. Thin planks might make your room appear cramped, so use big boards instead. This technique will give the impression that your room is larger than it is.
If you’re extending a room to connect to another, install the panels where they join together. There are different flooring types and flooring materials that you can use, with different colors that can help you make your room look bigger.
Make Your Room Look Bigger With Hardwood Flooring
If you want to make your room look larger, changing your floors is a great solution. We, Hudson Hardwood, are your best choice for hardwood flooring because we have different flooring services, all of the best quality materials. We’re committed to providing you with only the finest wood floors so that they will last a lifetime. Contact us today to learn how our products can help you expand your home.",hudsonhardwood
59,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/4-tips-to-get-the-best-hardwood-flooring-installation/,"Nowadays, more property owners are turning to hardwood floors, whether it is a residential or commercial property, because of the multiple benefits that it has. One of the reasons why it is considered an exciting opportunity is because you can choose the type of wood floor and color that you want to match your existing floors or even design a new whole area.
Of course, wanting a nice floor is not enough to get it. The installation has a huge impact when it comes to results. That’s why in this article, we will share four tips you can learn to have the best hardwood flooring installation results.
Hiring a Professional Hardwood Flooring Company
Hardwood flooring is not a “DIY” project, so to ensure the best possible and the desired results, hiring a professional hardwood flooring company is the best way to start this journey.
To make sure you are choosing the right professional hardwood company to do your flooring project, you must assure they are doing the following:
- Schedule a visit to measure the area that’s going to be replaced.
- Provide a price estimate about the project based on the measurements.
- Offer to their customers the best option that fits their budget
- Assist with the hardwood flooring materials for the desired look and needs.
- Provide you with daily updated information about the progress and schedule the work as mentioned.
Also, it must be a known company because of its professionalism and experience, so check out the company’s reviews.
Choosing the right wood floor species and color
Choosing the right wood species or color shouldn’t be an easy process as some customers might want to give a specific feeling or look to their indoor spaces. Think about the appearance you want to provide to your property. This way, you can explain these ideas to the hardwood flooring installers, and they can assist you with choosing the right type of floor and color to achieve your project goals.
Removing your furniture or elements in the working space
To enable the area in which the project will take place, you will have to remove objects such as furniture to have free space for the hardwood flooring installation. When hiring a company, you should make sure of the conditions in which they work. Some companies offer furniture moving and livable conditions during the process, which is a great option.
High-quality materials
Last but not least, top-quality materials will provide a strong and durable hardwood floor lasting for decades and improve your property’s value.
Best Hardwood Flooring Services in Philadelphia
Hudson Hardwood is an experienced and certified company based in Philadelphia that provides top-quality hardwood flooring installation services for residential and commercial property owners. They offer reliable service and daily updates, livable conditions during the process, dustless sanding techniques for a clean process, and environmentally friendly materials for an environmentally conscious project.",hudsonhardwood
60,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/5-reasons-why-overnight-hardwood-floor-refinishing-is-a-smart-business-decision/,"Maintaining hardwood floors is an important part of owning a business in Philadelphia, PA. Not only are dirty or damaged floors unsightly, but they can also be dangerous. That’s why it’s important to follow through with regular floor maintenance.
When it comes time for hardwood floor refinishing services, the best option is to contact overnight contractors.
This post will talk about the 5 main reasons why overnight hardwood floor refinishing is a smart business decision. Keep reading to learn more.
What’s Overnight Hardwood Floor Refinishing?
Do you need refinishing wood floors in Philadelphia, PA? Overnight hardwood floor refinishing is a service that offers all the benefits of traditional hardwood floor refinishing services, but without disruption.
This means that your business can stay open as usual while our team of contractors works overnight refinishing your hardwood floors.
Top 5 Benefits Of Overnight Hardwood Floor Refinishing
There are many benefits to choosing overnight hardwood floor refinishing over traditional services.
Some of these benefits include:
#1 No Disruption
One of the biggest benefits of overnight hardwood floor refinishing is no disruption to your business. Contractors will work quietly and efficiently overnight so that you can continue with your day-to-day operations without any interruptions.
#2 Saves Time
When you choose to refinish wood floors during business hours, you have to close your business for a few days (or at least part of the day) so that contractors can do the work. There is no need to close your business or lose out on valuable time with overnight hardwood floor refinishing.
#3 Safer For Everyone Involved
Another benefit of overnight hardwood floor refinishing is that it is safer for everyone involved. Because the work is done outside regular business hours, there is no need for employees to take time off or cover their shifts. This also cuts the risk of injury caused by people walking through a worksite.
#4 Floors Look & Feel Like New
When you choose overnight hardwood floor refinishing, your floors will look and feel like new. Contractors use all the latest techniques and equipment to restore your floors to their original condition. This means that you’ll avoid the hassle and expense of replacing your floors altogether.
#5 Rejuvenates
Finally, one of the best benefits of refinishing hardwood floors overnight is that it rejuvenates your space. A coat of finishing can give your business a much-needed boost.
The Most Reliable Overnight Hardwood Floor Refinishing In Philadelphia, PA
Are you a business owner in Philadelphia looking for floor contractors? Look no further than Hudson Hardwood. Refinishing hardwood floors in Philadelphia, PA, is our specialty.
We understand the importance of keeping your business running smoothly, and we are committed to providing the best possible service.
We offer a wide range of hardwood floor refinishing services, including overnight hardwood floor refinishing. Get in touch with us today.",hudsonhardwood
61,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/5-reasons-why-you-should-not-diy-your-hardwood-floor-refinishing/,"Hardwood floors are a beautiful addition that can last a lifetime. Still, you’ll need to refinish your hardwood floors from time to time. Refinishing removes the old finish, giving your hardwoods a fresh look. You might be tempted to DIY your refinishing project, but this is not the best idea. Read on to learn why you should not DIY hardwood floor refinishing and what you should do instead.
5 Reasons Not To DIY Refinishing Your Floor
Hardwood floor refinishing might look easy, but it’s best to leave it to professionals. Here are 5 ways DIYing a refinishing project can hurt you.
1. It’s A Time-Consuming Project
Refinishing hardwood floors is a time-consuming job that requires patience and skill. It usually takes two or three days for an experienced professional to complete the job correctly. If you decide to do it yourself, it could take much longer than expected as you figure out how to get the job done effectively.
2. Refinishing Is Messy Work
Refinishing your hardwood floors creates dust and debris that needs to be removed from the area before you start the project and after completing it. Do-it-yourselfers often overlook this task, but cleaning up can lead to health hazards such as allergies or asthma symptoms.
3. You Need Special Tools
To refinish your hardwood floors, you’ll need special tools and equipment that aren’t easily available at most hardware stores or online retailers. Professional contractors have access to these tools, which they use daily on their projects. They know how best to utilize them to get the job done right.
4. There’s a Risk of Damaging Your Floors
You risk damaging your hardwood floor beyond repair if you don’t refinish them correctly. You can also make them look worse than before you started the project. It’s best to hire experienced contractors that know how much to sand or how thick or thin a finish coat should be.
5. It Can Be Costly To Fix Mistakes
If you make a mistake during the refinishing process, correcting them will be costly as well as time-consuming. Most repairs must be handled by professionals specializing in this type of work. DIYing your project also means you can lose your warranty. Contractors are hardwood floor refinishing and installation experts, so they can fix any issue if you hire them from the beginning.
Get A Reliable Refinishing Solution in Philadelphia, PA
Hardwood floor refinishing is a complex task that requires skill and experience—which is why it’s best left up to professionals like our team at Hudson Hardwood. We serve home and business owners in the greater Philadelphia, PA area with the expert hardwood floor installation and refinishing services tailored specifically to their homes’ needs! Don’t risk damaging your property; get our professional hardwood flooring services!",hudsonhardwood
62,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/5-things-that-damage-your-hardwood-floors/,"Your Hardwood Floors are a great addition to your home. They provide a timeless elegance that’s great for any style. They also raise your home value. Still, some things can damage your hardwood floors and alter their appearance. Discover here 5 things that can damage your hardwood floors and what you can do to prevent this.
1. Water
Water is one of the biggest enemies of hardwood floors. When water seeps into the cracks and crevices of your floor, it can cause the wood to swell and warp. In extreme cases, it can even lead to rotting. To avoid water damage, quickly wipe up any spills and never allow standing water on your floors.
2. Direct Sunlight
Sunlight can also damage hardwood floors. Ultraviolet (UV) rays from the sun can fade the color of your floor over time. Keep the blinds or curtains closed when possible to protect your floors from sun damage and use rugs in high-traffic areas. Professional hardwood services can help with this.
3. Dirt And Debris
Salt, sand, and dirt can also wear down hardwood floors. These particles can act like sandpaper, scratching and dulling the finish of your floors. To avoid this damage, sweep or vacuum regularly and place mats or rugs at all entrances to your home. If your floors end up scratched, then hardwood floor refinishing can fix this.
4. Failing To Clean Them Regularly
If you don’t clean your hardwood floors, the dirt and debris will build up over time and cause permanent damage. To avoid this, sweep or vacuum weekly and mop with a gentle cleanser monthly. Hardwood floor restoration can help with this.
5. Hiring Inexperienced Professionals
When cleaning, repairing, or refinishing hardwood floors, hiring experienced professionals is important. Inexperienced professionals can cause permanent damage to your floors by using the wrong products or techniques. Do your research before hiring anyone to work on your hardwood floors.
Get The Best Hardwood Solution in Philadelphia, PA
At Hudson Hardwood, we have the experience and expertise to clean, repair, and refinish your hardwood floors. We also offer hardwood floor installation. We use the latest products and techniques to make your floors look new. No matter the hardwood service you need, we’re ready to help you out. With over 20 years of experience, you’ll find out we’re the best.
Contact us today to schedule a free consultation.",hudsonhardwood
63,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/5-things-you-need-to-know-about-refinishing-hardwood-floors/,"If you’re like most homeowners, your hardwood floors are a precious part of your home. They add character and style and are also a major selling point. So when it’s time to refinish them, you want the job done right. Refinishing them is great for repairing stains, scratches, or any minor damage. Refinishing your hardwood floors involves sanding down the top layer of wood to reveal a new, fresh layer beneath. Then the floor is sealed and stained to your liking.
Here are 5 things to know about refinishing and how this cost-effective service can make your hardwood floors look brand new.
1. Refinishing Will Improve Your Floors’ Appearance
If your hardwood floors are starting to look a little worn, refinishing is an excellent way to renew them. Hardwood floor refinishing will remove any scuffs or scratches and restore the wood’s original luster.
2. Refinishing Will Extend Your Floor’s Lifespan
In addition to improving the looks of your floors, refinishing will also extend their lifespan. By sealing and protecting the wood, you’ll be able to enjoy your floors for years to come. Your floors will also be easier to clean and maintain; this makes refinishing a wise investment.
3. There Are Finish Options For Your Floor
There are a few different types of finishes you can choose from when refinishing your hardwood floors. You can go with a traditional polyurethane finish, or you may prefer an oil-based finish. There are also water-based finishes available, which are becoming increasingly popular.
4. Refinishing Has To Be Done Carefully
The refinishing process can be a little tricky, and you must take care not to damage the floors during it. Make sure you sand evenly and don’t apply too much pressure. Also, be cautious not to spill any of the finishes on the floor.
5. Refinishing Your Hardwood Floors Can Become A Big Job
Refinishing hardwood floors is not a small task. It’s important to be prepared for the amount of work it will take to get the job done right. If you’re not up for the challenge, you may consider hiring a professional hardwood floor contractor to do it for you.
Get Professional Hardwood Floor Refinishing Services
Restoring your wood floor isn’t something to be done as a DIY weekend project. To have exceptional and desired results, it’s a must to count on a professional company that offers hardwood refinishing services.
Are you looking for hardwood floor refinishing in Philadelphia? At Hudson Hardwood, we’re a 20-year experienced company delivering the best high-quality hardwood flooring services to residential and commercial properties serving Philadelphia and its surroundings. With our refinishing services, we’ll restore old and damaged hardwood floors and make them look brand new again. Get a free quote here!",hudsonhardwood
64,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/a-guide-to-hardwood-floors-for-philadelphia-businesses/,"Are you a business owner, manager, or facilities staff member in Philadelphia looking to install hardwood floors in your commercial space? If so, you’ve come to the right place.
Hardwood floors offer numerous benefits for businesses, including durability and an elegant appearance. However, it’s important to choose the right services when it comes to installing and maintaining these floors.
In this guide, we’ll explore the professional services offered by Hudson Hardwood for commercial hardwood floors, as well as considerations for different types of businesses, including offices, breweries, hotels, and more.
Additionally, we’ll dive into the importance of using water-based or oil-based polyurethane finishes for commercial hardwood floors, and how professional floor cleaning solutions can benefit your business.
So let’s get started on restoring and maintaining your commercial wood floors with Hudson Hardwood!
The benefits of hardwood floors for businesses
The most crucial benefit of hardwood floors for a business is their durability. Let’s delve into that benefit, and the many other benefits of hardwood flooring:
- Durability: Hardwood floors are known for their long-lasting durability, making them an ideal investment for businesses. When you restore hardwood floors, they are able to withstand high traffic without showing any signs of damage for years to come.
- Low Maintenance: Hardwood floors require minimal maintenance compared to other types of flooring. They can be easily cleaned with a mop and a mild cleaner.
- Aesthetic Appeal: Hardwood floors add a sense of elegance to any business setting. They are available in a variety of colors and finishes to match any interior design.
- Improved Air Quality: Hardwood floors are particularly beneficial for businesses that have a lot of allergies or respiratory issues because they do not trap dust, dander, and other allergens like carpets can.
- Enhanced Resale Value: Hardwood floors can add value to any business property and increase its resale value.
- Sustainability: Hardwood is a natural and renewable resource. Many businesses opt for wood from sustainable forests, making hardwood floors an eco-friendly option.
- Versatility: Hardwood floors can be used in a variety of business spaces, from offices to retail stores to restaurants. They can also be customized with different stains or finishes to match specific interior designs or branding.
Services offered by Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood Floors has been serving commercial properties throughout the Mainline, Philadelphia, Montgomery, Bucks, Delaware, & Chester Counties for over 20 years! We love what we do.
Some services and types of hardwood flooring finishes we offer:
- Refinishing: This will restore your hardwood floors to their original beauty. With hardwood resurfacing, you can also change the color and sheen for a fresh new look. For a fraction of the floor installation costs of installing new hardwood floors, you can get like-new results. Plus, it’s an opportunity to switch to a higher quality finish that lasts longer for your business and protects your floors better than floor cleaning tools can.
- Restoration: Our expert wood resurfacing and flooring restoration craftsmen sand and polish the hardwood in your commercial use business until all scrapes, scratches, gouges, & stains are removed. This old hardwood floor repair will uncover a like-new wood floor. We then coat your hardwood with the finish of your choosing, giving you an updated, fresh look.
- Cleaning and recoating: For just a fraction of the cost and time of a full refinishing of the flooring, we offer commercial floor cleaning services. Our professional wood floor cleaning techniques and cleaning tools help your original hardwood floors stay vibrant for your business. So before you rent commercial floor cleaning machines, call us!
- Installation of new flooring: Our wood floor installer team installs brand-new flooring for your business space. We consider all of your needs and desires with commercial floor installation to make sure that we install the floor of your dreams.
- Stairs: We do hardwood floor stairs, too! We can match your stairs to your existing floors or change your design giving you an updated look. Wood stairs add value to your business property. You will still have access to the stairs during your renovation.
Considerations and recommendations for flooring in different types of businesses
Whether you choose to clean, refinish, restore, or install brand-new hardwood flooring, we consider your business and its needs.
We take into consideration your schedule, budget, and expectations. We also can offer recommendations on what type of flooring is best for your business:
Offices
Most offices experience heavy foot traffic daily. Whether your company is located in an old building undergoing renovation or you’re moving into a new space that needs updating, our team will improve the look and durability of your office’s hardwood floor on budget and on schedule.
Breweries
At a brewery, you have customers coming in and out all day. Your hardwood flooring needs to be attractive, but it must also be able to withstand heavy foot traffic. We will ensure your flooring lasts for a long time.
Hotels
Hotels look incredible with hardwood floors that are luxurious and stylish. Hudson Hardwood can make your floors stand up to the wear and tear of heavy foot traffic that hotel lobbies experience day after day.
Older buildings
Older buildings are everywhere you look in Philadelphia. Hudson Hardwood can transform these older spaces into something fresh and new while keeping in mind your desires and budget constraints.
Restaurants
Much like a brewery, the food and heavy foot traffic makes it difficult for restaurants to address their flooring issues. Hudson Hardwood works with restaurants to keep the air quality clean. We will work overnight, so your restaurant can maintain your business and never lose a day!
Schools
Hudson Hardwood uses dust containment “dustless sanding”, eliminating 98.9% of airborne dust. We use water-based polyurethane finishes that are environmentally sound and dry quickly. We do these projects on days that your school is closed so that students can hit the floors running when they return.
Gymnasiums and Racquet ball courts
Gyms and courts require a highly durable finish with non-slipping properties. We take special care with painted lines and logos on the floor. Hudson Hardwood is truly a specialist in maintaining these unique wood floors. The importance of using water-based or oil-based polyurethane finishes for commercial hardwood floors
The importance of using water-based or oil-based polyurethane finishes for commercial hardwood floors
It is important to use water-based or oil-based polyurethane finishes for commercial hardwood floors because they provide a durable and protective barrier that helps to extend the life of the floor.
These finishes help to protect the surface of beautiful Philadelphia hardwood flooring from scratches, stains, and other types of damage that can occur due to heavy foot traffic and regular use.
Additionally, they can enhance the natural beauty of the wood, making it look more vibrant and appealing.
For wood floor installation, water-based finishes are typically preferred for their quick drying times, low odor, and environmental friendliness, while oil-based finishes are often chosen for their durability and longevity.
Overall, using an appropriate polyurethane finish is essential for maintaining the appearance and functionality of a commercial hardwood floor.
Keeping your business fresh
There is nothing like the look of a fresh and shining floor when you enter a place of business. It brings elegance and professionalism unlike anything else.
Hudson Hardwood can refinish, repair, replace, and offer beautiful solid wood floor installation to keep your business in shape. We offer hardwood floor cleaning services at great rates, too. Ask us to see wood floor refinishing before and after photos – they are really incredible.
And most importantly, our team accommodates your unique space and schedule so that your business can still run smoothly during the entire project. Reach out today!
Q&A
Q: I’m wondering how to restore old wood floors while not losing any business.
A: Hudson Hardwood will work around your unique business needs, offering as little disruption as possible. Hardwood floor installation can be a breeze.
Q: What is refinishing hardwood floors?
A: Refinishing involves restoring an existing hardwood floor to its original beauty.
Q: How can I find a quality wood flooring installer for my business?
A: Reach out – we are thrilled to give you a hand in sprucing up the hardwood in your business!
Q: Are professional hard floor cleaning services worth it?
A: Put simply, yes! Leave it to the pros – cleaning floors deeply is not easy.",hudsonhardwood
65,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/about-hardwood-floors/,"Hardwood is a reliable flooring for homeowners for many reasons. Not only does it add beauty to a home, but it is also durable and long-lasting. There are many different types of wood options available for floor installation by hardwood floor contractors. Let’s go through some of the amazing qualities of hardwood.
Durability
Hardwood flooring provides homeowners with an easily customized surface that can be a great addition to their homes. Woods used for hardwood flooring provide homeowners with durability because they are sturdy and will not warp or expand over time like other flooring types, such as carpeting.
Adds Beauty And Value
Wood is a beautiful floor covering that offers homeowners a vast selection of styles and colors to choose from. Installing wood floors on the main living levels of a home can be an additional selling point if you are planning on selling your home in the future and adding beauty to your daily life.
Many people prefer hardwood floors for their homes because they look better than some other types of floor covering options available today. With so many different types of wood floors from which you can choose, there’s bound to be one that will match your needs and preferences quite perfectly.
Adds Comfort & Warmth to a Home
There are many reasons why homeowners choose wood as their preferred floor covering option for interior design. Aside from the fact that wood is a beautiful option for floors, it also provides homeowners with added warmth and comfort because of its natural feel underfoot.
Wood absorbs noise well, so this type of flooring can be great if you have children or pets who may be running around inside your home during the day or night. Wood has natural insulation properties, which means that it will help keep the air inside your home at a more comfortable temperature during those hot and cold months throughout the year.
Provides an Upscale Look
Another great reason to consider hardwood flooring as your flooring of choice is that it offers people a way to create upscale-looking rooms in their homes without spending an arm and a leg on expensive materials or renovations.
Wood floors are relatively inexpensive to have installed, which means you can have them added to any room in your home without having to worry about breaking the bank for this type of renovation.
Get Hardwood Flooring For Your House
Wood is a material that has been used since ancient times, so homeowners should feel good about installing hardwood floors throughout their homes. There are many different types of wood available which means there’s one out there that will suit your interior design needs and preferences perfectly!
Wood offers homeowners so many great qualities that you really can’t go wrong when it comes to this type of flooring option. A great place for getting hardwood flooring is Hudson Hardwood, a flooring company that provides hardwood flooring services. Get in touch today to receive a quote.",hudsonhardwood
66,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/art-of-sanding-hardwood-floors/,"Wooden floors give a warm and inviting feeling to any home. Not only are they timeless and full of character, but they are also surprisingly durable. Still, taking certain steps to ensure their longevity is crucial. Sanding hardwood floors is an integral part of this process as it helps restore the wood’s original luster while strengthening the floor beneath.
Let us guide you through all the basics so you can achieve your desired results.
What Is Sanding?
Sanding is used to smooth out rough surfaces, remove imperfections, and prepare a surface for staining or finishing. This can range from light sanding to remove minor scratches or blemishes to heavy-duty sanding that strips away existing coatings. No matter what kind of project you are working on, getting the surface right is essential for achieving a beautiful result.
Types of Sandpaper
Before you start sanding, you must select the right type of sandpaper for the job at hand. Generally speaking, three main types of sandpaper are available: aluminum oxide, ceramic aluminum oxide, and zirconia alumina. Each type has unique characteristics and benefits:
- Aluminum oxide is great for general-purpose use.
- Ceramic aluminum oxide is perfect for hardwoods with an open-grain structure.
- Zirconia alumina works well with closed-grain woods such as walnut or cherry.
How To Sand Wood Properly
Once you have selected the right type of sandpaper for your project, it’s time to get down to business! The key here is patience; take your time when doing any woodworking project. Don’t be afraid to go over areas multiple times if necessary.
Start with a coarse grit paper (e.g., 120-grit) and progress through finer grits (e.g., 150-grit and 180-grit) until you are left with an even finish across the entire surface area. Use overlapping strokes when moving across the wood; this will ensure that no sections are accidentally missed or skipped over during the process.
Ensure You Sand Your Hardwoods Correct
Proper sanding can transform any furniture or floor into something special. It takes skill and experience to get it just right, however — which is why so many people turn to Hudson Hardwood when they need help with their projects! Our team specializes in dustless sanding services for both residential and commercial spaces — ensuring customer satisfaction every step of the way! We also offer:
- Hardwood floor refinishing in Philadelphia
- Hardwood floor installation in Philadelphia
- Hardwood floor maintenance services in Philadelphia
Contact us today if you need help bringing your ideas to life! Get a free quote here!",hudsonhardwood
67,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/bamboo-hardwood-flooring/,"Bamboo floors are gaining traction as more homeowners find appeal in them. Changes in style and a growing interest in ecological products have pushed this trend. Let’s go through why bamboo is great for flooring. Discover if getting bamboo hardwood flooring services is best for you.
Sustainability
Sustainability is one of the factors drawing more people to bamboo flooring. Bamboo is a type of grass that can reach maturity in five years. After harvest, it regenerates itself through the root system. The production cycle for this type of wood begins by using either traditional methods or modern technology, depending on the harvesting area.
Bamboo trees are usually cut down after growing about 90 percent of their full height. This allows them to regenerate and provide another crop in as little as four years after being harvested.
Availability
Bamboo has gained popularity in hardwood flooring due to how easily available bamboo is, especially imported varieties from Eastern Asia countries like China and Japan. As demand grew, these became easily available because they were readily accessible within geographical proximity to other major manufacturing centers worldwide.
This availability is also made possible by modern technology, which has created new ways to process bamboo into boards that are stable enough for flooring. Bamboo hardwood floors are now available in different styles, thicknesses, and finishes comparable to traditional wood types.
Advantages
Bamboo also has excellent sound absorption levels comparable to traditional wood ones, such as maple and oak. This important property provides the flooring with noise reduction capabilities while adding comfort underfoot for homeowners against drafty rooms or noisy neighbors.
Bamboo is perfect for high-traffic areas like entranceways, kitchens, and living rooms. Bamboo flooring needs to be refinished less often than several other popular types of substances utilized. Bamboo wood is light in color and has varying grains; this enables it to fit in the design of any room it is placed in.
Bamboo Décor
In addition, bamboo hardwood flooring comes in various styles and finishes so that homeowners can choose one based on their preferences and living environment. Manufacturers also continually create new styles to keep up with the latest interior design trends.
Bamboo flooring also has a rustic feel that appeals to homeowners who like natural elements in their home décor. The highly textured surface of these floors helps reduce slip risks for homes with children, especially during their early years when they are more prone to accidents.
Get Bamboo Hardwood Flooring
Bamboo hardwood flooring is a great option for your house. It’s ecological and brings many benefits to your living spaces. With it, you’ll have a lovely interior design. If you’re interested in getting bamboo hardwood flooring for your home, get in touch with Hudson Hardwood. We offer many services from floor installation to maintenance and repair.",hudsonhardwood
68,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/best-hardwood-flooring-cleaning-tips/,"If you have hardwood floors, then you know that they can get dirty very easily. Dust and dirt can accumulate on the surface and can be difficult to remove without proper cleaning methods.
This blog post will discuss the best ways to clean your hardwood floors, so they look as good as new! Read on here for more.
5 Best Ways To Clean Hardwood Floors
Cleaning hardwood floors can be challenging, but keeping them clean is important to maintain their appearance and durability. Here are the best ways to clean your hardwood floors:
#1 Dust Mop
One of the best ways to clean hardwood floors is with a dust mop. A dust mop will pick up all the dirt and dust that has accumulated on the surface of your floor. Depending on your preference, you can use a damp or dry dust mop.
#2 Buff and Coat Hardwood Floors
Another great way to clean hardwood floors is by buffing and coating them. When you buff and coat your hardwood floor, you’ll protect it from dirt and scratches. You can use a buffing machine, or you can hand-buff your floors.
#3 Hardwood Floor Refinishing
If your hardwood floors start to look dull, you may want to refinish them. Refinishing is the process where you remove the old finish from your floors and apply a new one. This process will give your hardwood floors a fresh, new look.
#4 Vacuum Cleaner
Vacuuming your hardwood floors is another great way to keep them clean. A vacuum cleaner will remove all the dirt and dust accumulated on your floors. You can use a handheld vacuum or a canister vacuum.
#5 Use Vinegar and Water
If you want to clean your hardwood floors naturally, you can use vinegar and water; this solution will help to remove dirt and stains from your floors. You can use a mop or a sponge to apply the solution to your floors.
Hudson Hardwood Offers The Best Hardwood Floor Refinishing Services in Philadelphia, PA!
If you’re looking for hardwood floor refinishing services, look no further than Hudson Hardwood! We offer the best services in town, and we’re sure you’ll be satisfied with our work. We can restore your old, worn-out, damaged wood flooring to its original beauty.
With new hardwood flooring, you’ll give warmth and traditional elegance to your space. Our team of experts will work diligently to refinish your floors and give them a new lease on life. Contact us today to learn more about our services!",hudsonhardwood
69,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/can-i-restore-original-hardwood-floors/,"Are you a homeowner in Philadelphia with older wood floors in need of restoration or refinishing? Look no further!
In this blog post, we’ll provide you with everything you need to know about restoring old, original hardwood floors in your home.
Our experts at Hudson Hardwood are master hardwood floor craftsmen and restoration specialists. For over 20+ years we’ve refinished hardwood in the greater Philadelphia area for many happy customers.
Joe Hudson will guide us through the process of restoring hardwood flooring and offer tips for keeping your floors looking beautiful. From pine floors to exotic hardwoods, we’ll break down what can be restored and what can’t.
So, if you are thinking, “My hardwood floors look terrible!”, don’t worry. Whether you are restoring or refinishing 100 year old wood floors made of oak, maple, or even bamboo floors, keep reading to learn more about how we handle hardwood floor restoration.
What kinds of hardwood can be restored?
Most hardwood floors can be restored, including oak, maple, cherry, walnut, and hickory. The specific type and condition of the hardwood will determine the restoration process and its outcome.
Some factors that affect restoring old hardwood floors may include:
- the age of the floor
- the finish on the floor
- the condition of the floor
Still, wondering how to repair old hardwood floors? Let Hudson Hardware do the job for you. We know the best way to restore hardwood floors.
What is the best way to restore oak or maple hardwood floors?
How to restore old hardwood floors made of oak or maple:
Here are the steps we take to restore white oak hardwood floors and maple floors.
- Clean the floor: Before starting the restoration process, clean the floor thoroughly. Sweep or vacuum the floor to remove any dirt, dust, or debris. You can also use a mild cleaner to clean the floor if it’s necessary.
- Sand the floor: Sanding helps to remove any scratches, stains, or uneven surfaces on the floor. Use a floor sander to sand the floor. Start with coarse-grit sandpaper and move to finer grit progressively.
- Fill the gaps: Do any old wood floor repairs that are needed. If there are any gaps or holes in the oak or maple, fill them with wood filler. Allow the filler to dry, and then sand it smooth.
- Stain the floor: Staining enhances the natural beauty of the maple or oak wood floors. Pick a stain color for the flooring restoration that matches the rest of the house or the desired aesthetic. Stain the floor using a brush or roller, following the instructions on the stain.
- Apply the finish: Apply a finish to protect the stained floor. The finish could either be polyurethane or wax, choose the one that suits your needs. Apply the finish in a thin and even coat, following the instructions on the finish.
- Allow to dry: Lastly, allow the floor to dry, and avoid walking on the floor for the recommended drying period.
What is the best way to restore pine floors?
Refinishing pine floors is another story. Pine floors are milled differently than other kinds of wood. Most likely, pine floors can not be restored or refinished with the same results, as say oak floors.
The reason why is that pine floors were originally meant to be sub-flooring.
In many Philadelphia homes, people still do choose to revive wood floors of pine – much like more traditional hardwood floors. They often have gaps and expansion, which makes it a more difficult process. While some shy away from restoring pine, it can be done.
For example: if your pine floors have already been refinished by a wood floor restorer, then there is a way to give your floors some new life. We can add a finish with a buff and coat. This will add durability and shine. While it won’t make the pine floors look new, it can give your floor a fun “rustic” look. Many customers love the look!
Can you restore bamboo or Brazilian cherry hardwood floors?
Yes, bamboo and Brazilian cherry floors can all be restored. They are all gorgeous woods that can be stunning when restored. The extent of the restoration needed will depend on the condition of the floors.
For minor scratches and dullness, professional cleaning and buffing may be all that is needed. For more significant damage like deep scratches or stains, sanding and refinishing may be necessary.
Brazilian cherry wood floors
Sometimes, clients would prefer a different tone for their Brazilian cherry floors. We understand this and can reduce some of the “redness”. We specialize in altering the color of Brazilian Cherry floors.
Altering coloring on a floor needs to be left to the pros, for sure. It can be quite challenging to get the exact tone. We can do this for you.
Bamboo Floors
Refinishing old wood floors made of bamboo can usually have beautiful results! They usually have a formaldehyde finish on them, which can be harmful and hazardous to your health, though. Hudson Hardware can remove this layer and refinish the floors while using containment methods to protect the air in your home. Definitely do not try redoing floors made of bamboo on your own.
Other Exotic Hardwood Floors
We refinish all exotic hardwood floors, such as Brazilian Walnut, Purple Heart, and Australian Cypress. They give a truly unique look to a home.
Exotic floors are often darker in color. They have natural resins in the wood that can make it more challenging to have the stain and finish adhere for restoration. However, we have specific products and equipment to get this done.
Why it is better to restore hardwood floors, rather than replace
Besides restoring historic charm and beauty, there are several reasons why it may be better to restore your hardwood floor rather than replace it.
- Cost-effective: Restoring or floor refinishing cost is often cheaper than replacing it. This is because the cost of materials and labor required to replace the floor can add up quickly. On the other hand, restoration usually only requires sanding, refinishing, and minor repairs.
- Preservation of character: Hardwood floors can add character and charm to a home. If your home has an older hardwood floor, wood floor refinishers preserve this unique feature rather than replacing it with a new, generic floor.
- Environmental benefits: When you replace a floor, the old materials often end up in a landfill. Restoration, on the other hand, can be done using eco-friendly methods and materials. This reduces waste and the environmental impact of the project.
- Convenience: Restore and repair old hardwood floors can often be done in a fraction of the time it takes to replace them. When you refinish old hardwood floors you have less disruption to your daily routine and a faster completion time.
Overall, restoring old hardwood flooring can be a great option for those looking to give their Philadelphia home a nice update. It’s cost-effective, environmentally friendly, and can preserve the character of your home.
Hudson Hardware is here to come by and give you a free assessment of the best way to restore your hardwood flooring. We can show you incredible images of refinishing hardwood floors before and after.
We specialize in:
- refinishing old hardwood floors
- installing new hardwood floors
- cleaning dull floors
- re-coating tired floors
- floor restoring of difficult exotic woods
- Original hardwood floor repair
We do wood floor repair and refinishing for both your hardwood floors & also your stairs. We take pride in bringing warmth to your home, and appeal to residential, and commercial spaces, with the classic beauty of wood flooring.
We truly love what we do, and our employees are expert craftsmen that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.
Q&A
Q: Should I refinish my hardwood floors?
A: Hudson Hardware will happily help you decide if you should restore or refinish your hardwood flooring.
Q: Does restoring old wood floors take a long time?
A: The duration of restoring old wood floors depends on various factors such as the size of the area, the type of wood, the extent of damage, and the techniques used for restoration. It can take a few days to a few weeks to restore old wood floors.
Q: Does old wood floor restoration last a long time?
A: Old wood floor restoration can last a long time with proper maintenance and care. A well-done restoration can last for up to 20 or 30 years, while some antique hardwood floors that were restored decades ago are still in excellent condition today.",hudsonhardwood
70,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/cleaning-and-recoating-vs-restoration-refinishing-and-repair-2/,"Hardwood floors look beautiful in nearly any house and they are a long-lasting choice. Whatever condition your hardwood floors are in, it should be possible to restore them to their former glory.
Worn-looking hardwood might need to be cleaned and then recoated. If the floor is in a poor condition or damaged, options include restoration, refinishing and repair.
Working with a professional will help ensure your hardwood floors are restored to their original beauty, and will stay like that for a long time.
Cleaning and Recoating vs Restoration, Refinishing and Repair
Before deciding what to do with your hardwood floor, you should first know some of the terms used in the hardwood flooring industry. A professional might inform you that the floors need to be repaired, they should be restored, or they need refinishing. Perhaps they will tell you the floor simply needs cleaning and recoating.
Let’s take a closer look at some of these terms, so you have a better idea about what your hardwood floors might need:
- Repairs: If the hardwood itself is damaged, the floors will need to be repaired. There might be damage in some areas only, such as spills, water damage, mold, pet accidents or fire. In this case, the damaged part will need to be replaced. It is not always easy to locate an exact replacement, and this would depend on the type and age of the floor. However, a professional can locate the right species of wood and stain it so it matches well with the rest of the floor.
- Restoration or Refinishing: These terms are interchangeable. If the hardwood floor is in a reasonable condition but has sun damage, splintering, dents, scratches or buckling, it might be possible to fix those without actually having to replace part of the floor. Restoring or refinishing mean the floors will be sanded down until smooth and flat without leaving any scratches. After this they can be stained with whichever color you like and finished with the sheen of your choice.
- Cleaning and Recoating: If the floor is in good condition but looks rather worn or dull, or has light scratches, a clean and recoat should be all it needs. This is the cheapest option but it is only done when the floor is in good shape. When cleaning and recoating the hardwood floor, your floor will be scuffed lightly in order to remove grime and imperfections that might be caused by normal wear and tear. After this, the floor gets a fresh coat of finish in whichever sheen you prefer.
How are Hardwood Floors Repaired?
As long as the floor hasn’t already been refinished several times, repair can be performed regardless of the age of the floor. Typical repairs would include wall or radiator removal from a remodel, pet stains or deep gauges which are too deep for refinishing.
A large area of damage might mean it is cheaper to invest in new hardwood flooring in that room. A hardware flooring professional will see which planks or boards must be repaired or replaced.
Fixing a Squeaky Hardwood Floor
Any floor squeaks are the result of a gap between the sub floor and the hardwood floor. This gap is caused by poorly acclimated floors or the house settling.
A squeak can be fixed by inserting a wedge or shim between the bottom of the sub floor and the top of the floor joist. Although you can buy special screws to fix the floor from the top surface, these are gimmicky and probably won’t last long if they even work at all.
Hardwood Floor Restoration or Refinishing
It is possible to restore any wooden floor, even old ones, as long as the wood is still thick enough. This type of restoration is done to restore the look of the floor back to its original splendor. It can be hard to tell whether the wood is thick enough but a professional will know if restoration or refinishing is a possibility.
If you can see silver-colored, brushed nail heads on the surface of the wood, that means the floor has been refinished already. Usually these nails are well below the surface and seeing them may mean the wood might not be thick enough to restore any more.
Solid planks of hardwood are typically between 5/16’ and 3/4” inch thick. Refinishing removes some of this thickness, although it is necessary every now and then to ensure the floors stay in good condition.
The refinishing process is needed on average every seven to ten years, for most hardwood floors. Some might need to be refinished more while others might need much less, depending on the care taken to keep the floors looking good and how much foot traffic they have.
How to Clean and Recoat a Hardwood Floor
If your hardwood floors are cleaned and recoated every two years, you should not have to refinish them. Grimy, dull, uneven or lightly scratched floors can be restored to their original beauty with a simple cleaning and recoating.
Complete the process with a fresh coat of finish and the floors should look brand new again, or at least in a very good condition.
Can I Clean and Recoat Hardwood Floors Myself?
If you have a budget or you prefer to DIY when possible, you might be wondering whether you can do your own cleaning and recoating. There are even videos online showing you how to restore, repair, refinish or clean the floors.
However, because you are dealing with an expensive, highly visible and important part of the house and don’t want to risk ruining the floors, it is always recommended that you call an experienced professional.
A DIY floor can be challenging, here are the common hurdles:
Tricky Equipment to Use in the Wrong Hands
It isn’t easy to work on hardwood flooring. The equipment you will need can be hard to use and it is heavy. If you make a mistake with the equipment the flooring could be damaged beyond repair, which is going to cost even more in the long run.
Contaminants in the Floor
Sanding down wood makes dust which is going to spread all over the room and beyond, so it needs to be done carefully. A respirator should be worn when sanding, as well as when applying stain and finish coats.
A professional flooring contractor will use plastic barriers as well as dust containment including HEPA filtration. This can eliminate up to 98.9% of the dust which is inevitable during sanding.
Specialized Tools for Hardwood Repair
You can’t refinish a hardwood floor with a hand sander, because of its sheer size. You need a large sander. You can rent these from big box stores but they are hard to use, have to be brought to and from your house, and they are really heavy as well.
A hardwood floor sanding machine needs to be connected to your electrical panel by an expert since these machines need a high voltage, higher than what a typical wall outlet gives.
If you add up the cost of the tools, rental costs and other supplies, as well as the time it will take you, plus the risk of making an expensive mistake, you will probably want to hire a professional hardwood floor contractor to make sure everything is done well and make the process a hassle-free one.",hudsonhardwood
71,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/cleaning-and-recoating-vs-restoration-refinishing-and-repair/,"Hardwood floors look beautiful in nearly any house and they are a long-lasting choice. Whatever condition your hardwood floors are in, it should be possible to restore them to their former glory.
Worn-looking hardwood might need to be cleaned and then recoated. If the floor is in a poor condition or damaged, options include restoration, refinishing and repair.
Working with a professional will help ensure your hardwood floors are restored to their original beauty, and will stay like that for a long time.
Cleaning and Recoating vs Restoration, Refinishing and Repair
Before deciding what to do with your hardwood floor, you should first know some of the terms used in the hardwood flooring industry. A professional might inform you that the floors need to be repaired, they should be restored, or they need refinishing. Perhaps they will tell you the floor simply needs cleaning and recoating.
Let’s take a closer look at some of these terms, so you have a better idea about what your hardwood floors might need:
- Repairs
If the hardwood itself is damaged, the floors will need to be repaired. There might be damage in some areas only, such as spills, water damage, mold, pet accidents or fire. In this case, the damaged part will need to be replaced.
It is not always easy to locate an exact replacement, and this would depend on the type and age of the floor. However, a professional can locate the right species of wood and stain it so it matches well with the rest of the floor.
- Restoration or Refinishing
These terms are interchangeable. If the hardwood floor is in a reasonable condition but has sun damage, splintering, dents, scratches or buckling, it might be possible to fix those without actually having to replace part of the floor.
Restoring or refinishing mean the floors will be sanded down until smooth and flat without leaving any scratches. After this they can be stained with whichever color you like and finished with the sheen of your choice.
- Cleaning and Recoating
If the floor is in good condition but looks rather worn or dull, or has light scratches, a clean and recoat should be all it needs. This is the cheapest option but it is only done when the floor is in good shape.
When cleaning and recoating the hardwood floor, your floor will be scuffed lightly in order to remove grime and imperfections that might be caused by normal wear and tear. After this, the floor gets a fresh coat of finish in whichever sheen you prefer.
How are Hardwood Floors Repaired?
As long as the floor hasn’t already been refinished several times, repair can be performed regardless of the age of the floor. Typical repairs would include wall or radiator removal from a remodel, pet stains or deep gauges which are too deep for refinishing.
A large area of damage might mean it is cheaper to invest in new hardwood flooring in that room. A hardware flooring professional will see which planks or boards must be repaired or replaced.
Fixing a Squeaky Hardwood Floor
Any floor squeaks are the result of a gap between the sub floor and the hardwood floor. This gap is caused by poorly acclimated floors or the house settling.
A squeak can be fixed by inserting a wedge or shim between the bottom of the sub floor and the top of the floor joist. Although you can buy special screws to fix the floor from the top surface, these are gimmicky and probably won’t last long if they even work at all.
Hardwood Floor Restoration or Refinishing
It is possible to restore any wooden floor, even old ones, as long as the wood is still thick enough. This type of restoration is done to restore the look of the floor back to its original splendor. It can be hard to tell whether the wood is thick enough but a professional will know if restoration or refinishing is a possibility.
If you can see silver-colored, brushed nail heads on the surface of the wood, that means the floor has been refinished already. Usually these nails are well below the surface and seeing them may mean the wood might not be thick enough to restore any more.
Solid planks of hardwood are typically between 5/16’ and 3/4” inch thick. Refinishing removes some of this thickness, although it is necessary every now and then to ensure the floors stay in good condition.
The refinishing process is needed on average every seven to ten years, for most hardwood floors. Some might need to be refinished more while others might need much less, depending on the care taken to keep the floors looking good and how much foot traffic they have.
How to Clean and Recoat a Hardwood Floor
If your hardwood floors are cleaned and recoated every two years, you should not have to refinish them. Grimy, dull, uneven or lightly scratched floors can be restored to their original beauty with a simple cleaning and recoating.
Complete the process with a fresh coat of finish and the floors should look brand new again, or at least in a very good condition.
Can I Clean and Recoat Hardwood Floors Myself?
If you have a budget or you prefer to DIY when possible, you might be wondering whether you can do your own cleaning and recoating. There are even videos online showing you how to restore, repair, refinish or clean the floors.
However, because you are dealing with an expensive, highly visible and important part of the house and don’t want to risk ruining the floors, it is always recommended that you call an experienced professional.
A DIY floor can be challenging, here are the common hurdles:
Tricky Equipment to Use in the Wrong Hands
It isn’t easy to work on hardwood flooring. The equipment you will need can be hard to use and it is heavy. If you make a mistake with the equipment the flooring could be damaged beyond repair, which is going to cost even more in the long run.
Contaminants in the Floor
Sanding down wood makes dust which is going to spread all over the room and beyond, so it needs to be done carefully. A respirator should be worn when sanding, as well as when applying stain and finish coats.
A professional flooring contractor will use plastic barriers as well as dust containment including HEPA filtration. This can eliminate up to 98.9% of the dust which is inevitable during sanding.
Specialized Tools for Hardwood Repair
You can’t refinish a hardwood floor with a hand sander, because of its sheer size. You need a large sander. You can rent these from big box stores but they are hard to use, have to be brought to and from your house, and they are really heavy as well.
A hardwood floor sanding machine needs to be connected to your electrical panel by an expert since these machines need a high voltage, higher than what a typical wall outlet gives.
If you add up the cost of the tools, rental costs and other supplies, as well as the time it will take you, plus the risk of making an expensive mistake, you will probably want to hire a professional hardwood floor contractor to make sure everything is done well and make the process a hassle-free one.",hudsonhardwood
72,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/common-hardwood-floor-challenges/,"Hardwood floors are a beautiful aspect of any room and are great for any business or home. They can last for generations. Therefore you want to take good care of them to keep them in top shape. Still, some people may find some aspects of hardwood floor care challenging. Here are 5 common hardwood floor challenges to look out for.
Water Damage
A few common issues with hardwood floors are water damage, matching existing colors and styles, and maintenance. Pennsylvania weather spans the gamut from hot and humid summers to cold and dry winters. All of this can affect your hardwood floors. Stains, discoloration, and even buckling of individual boards can occur. Hardwood floor refinishing can repair this.
Scratches
Scratching damages the surface of your hardwood, making it visually unappealing and more difficult to clean. Maintaining hardwood floors does take some care and effort. Keeping them clean and free of debris can greatly help reduce scratching. Regularly cleaning and recoating your hardwood floors, also known as a “buff and coat,” will give them life for years to come.
Oxidation
Hardwood oxidation is a process in which hardwood becomes darker, particularly when exposed to the sun. This usually occurs in the first years after installation. Homeowners may find oxidation unappealing since it alters the color of the hardwood. To avoid it, make sure you control the intake of sunlight your hardwood has. You can move around furniture or close curtains.
Loose Or Noisy Boards
Loose or noisy boards can be an annoyance. They can cause people to trip or disrupt your home with noise. Loose or noisy boards can worsen over time, especially if you’re unaware of an underlying cause. A hardwood floor restoration can determine the best way to fix this problem and solve it.
Humidity Changes Affecting The Boards
Humidity changes can affect your hardwood floors, making them expand, contract, or even crack. You might notice this difference in your floor with how they look or feel when you walk on them. A good way to avoid this is by ensuring you get quality hardwood floors and controlling the humidity levels inside your home.
Get A Hardwood Flooring Solution
Pennsylvania residents looking for a hardwood floor installation or other solutions can rely on Hudson Hardwood for their needs. We see many houses that have wear and tear in some areas but don’t need to have all of their hardwood floors replaced. We can match the color and style of existing floors or stairs to keep a consistent look throughout your home.
We offer:
- Hardwood Floor Refinishing
- Hardwood Floor Installation
- Hardwood Floor Restoration
Get your house in top shape today with our hardwood floor services! At Hudson Hardwood, we’re ready to help you out!",hudsonhardwood
73,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/cover-19-service-update/,"At Hudson Hardwood, we have been closely monitoring all updates on COVID-19 issued by the Centers for Disease Control and Protection (CDC) and are maintaining the high safety standards we have had in place for decades.
Your health and safety are our number one priority, so we are working with our clients to make sure everyone is comfortable and satisfied with their flooring services from start to finish.
Virtual Estimates for Hardwood Flooring
For years, our team of experts has been performing no-contact virtual estimates. If you need work done on your commercial or residential floors, upload your photos and room measurements in our virtual estimator, and we will have a quote to you within 24 hours.
Health and Safety Precautions
As always, our hardwood flooring specialists arrive at your home or property wearing the proper protective equipment, including N95 masks, shoe coverings, and gloves.
To maintain your indoor air quality and reduce floor renovation dust by 95%, we perform dustless sanding. We also use environmentally friendly products that are green-rated with low VOC.
Additionally, we will maintain a safe distance from anyone present in the home or building while your floors are being installed, refinished, restored, or cleaned.
Throughout the process, we’ll communicate with you about all the details regarding your project from the health of our hardwood flooring professionals to how long the project will take and more.
When your project is completed, we will thoroughly clean the area and ensure nothing gets left behind.
Hudson Hardwood is proud to serve families and businesses in the Mainline, Philadelphia, Montgomery, Bucks, Delaware, & Chester Counties.
Thank you for your continued trust in Hudson Hardwood.",hudsonhardwood
74,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/dark-or-ligh-flooring/,"When it comes to flooring, homeowners tend to get overwhelmed by the number of choices out there. Most people don’t know what they want until they get to see it first hand. Do you want a light or dark floor in your house? Which one will look better?
It’s no secret that choosing the right flooring for your house is crucial. So, in this blog post, we’ll share with you the pros and cons of light and dark flooring so that you can choose what’s best for your home.
Dark Vs. Light Flooring: Which One Is Best For You
Dark Flooring
The Pros
- It is very noticeable when dirt, dust, or other dark debris gets down into your flooring. A natural dark color, wood floors will hide these bits of ickiness until they are swept up and removed, making it easy to clean and touch up.
- A dark floor creates a great contrast with light-colored walls and furniture, giving your space depth.
- Natural dark flooring is resistant to stains and scratches, so even if you don’t clean it often or thoroughly, your floors will still look beautiful.
- Dark flooring is often used in high-end homes to give them an elegant look.
The cons
- If you have a kitchen with dark cabinets and want to go with a natural dark wood floor, it can be hard to combine them. Besides, it would look monotonous.
- Dark floors tend to make rooms look smaller, so if you’re looking for something that opens up your space, dark flooring isn’t the best choice.
- Light-colored debris can be very noticeable on dark flooring.
Light Flooring
The pros
- Wood light floors look and feel natural, so it’s a great choice if you want to go for an organic style.
- If your home looks dark inside, light flooring can brighten it up and make you feel more comfortable.
- If you’re looking to give the illusion that your room is larger than it is, light flooring might be the way to go.
The cons
- Dark-colored stains may be messy on your light floors if you have pets or kids who like to get creative.
- If you want to enjoy your flooring for a long time or don’t have the budget to give it the proper maintenance, light flooring is not for you since it fades faster than dark ones do.
- If your room is a large open space with plenty of natural light, all that light will bounce off light wood floors, and it will create a washed-out or glaring effect.
Get Help To Choose The Right Flooring For Your Home
When it comes to hardwood floors, Hudson Hardwood is the company you can trust. Hudson Hardwood is a company in Pottstown that specializes in the installation, refinishing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors & stairs. We have 20+ years of experience, so we know how to transform any space from ordinary to extraordinary.",hudsonhardwood
75,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/do-you-need-to-replace-or-refinish-your-hardwood-floors-find-out-here/,"Do you feel like your floor needs some love and care? You’re not alone. Many hardwood floors could use some work to bring them back to their original glory. But how can you tell if your hardwood floor needs to be refinished or replaced?
Over time, hardwood floors may become dull, stained, bowed, squeaky, or chipped. When your hardwood floor begins to look aged, you may refresh it to restore its original appeal or replace it entirely.
In this post, we’ll discuss the differences between wood floor refinishing and replacement. We’ll also provide you with some tips on when to opt for each service. Keep reading this post.
What’s Hardwood Floor Refinishing?
Wood Floor Refinishing is the process that can take your old, tired hardwood floor and make it look new again. It involves sanding down the existing floor until all the finish and sealant are removed.
The hardwood floor refinishing process can take anywhere from a few hours to a few days, depending on the size of your property or home and the condition of your hardwood floors.
What’s Hardwood Floor Replacement?
Hardwood Floor Replacement is exactly what it sounds like – replacing your old hardwood floor with a new one. This process usually takes a few days, as the old hardwood floors need to be completely removed before the new ones are installed.
Differences Between Hardwood Floor Refinishing And Hardwood Floor Replacement
Time
The time it takes to refinish your hardwood floors is significantly shorter than the time it would take to replace them.
Cost
Refinishing your hardwood floors is also a lot cheaper than replacing them. In most cases, you can expect to pay around $.50 – $.75 per square foot for refinishing. For hardwood floor replacement, you’re looking at a minimum of $12 per square foot.
Damage
If your hardwood floors are severely damaged, refinishing them may not be an option. In cases where the hardwood floors are warped, or there are large gaps between the boards, you’ll likely need to replace them.
You Need Hardwood Floor Refinishing When:
- Your hardwood floors are dull or scratched.
- You have minor damage, such as chips or cracks.
- You want to change the color of your hardwood floors.
You Need Hardwood Floor Replacement When:
- Your hardwood floors are severely damaged.
- The boards are warped, or there are large gaps between them.
- You want to change the type of hardwood flooring you have.
Hudson Hardwood Offers Hardwood Floor Refinishing in Philadelphia, PA
Are you looking for wood floor refinishing in Philadelphia, PA, or hardwood floor replacement? Look no further than Hudson Hardwood. We offer hardwood floor refinishing, replacement, and hardwood floor installation in Philadelphia, PA.
What sets us apart from other hardwood flooring companies is our personalized approach. We work with you to find the best solution for your hardwood floors, whether that’s refinishing, replacing, or installing new hardwood floors. Get in touch with us today.",hudsonhardwood
76,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/effective-guide-how-to-repair-floor-scratch/,"Having a scratch on your hardwood floor at some point is inevitable. Scratches are bound to happen, from moving furniture, pets, or everyday wear and tear. But don’t worry, repairing a hardwood floor scratch is much easier than you might think!
This guide will show you how to effectively fix minor scratches on your hardwood floor. Keep reading to learn more.
Tools You’ll Need When Repairing Your Hardwood Floor
When repairing a hardwood floor scratch, you’ll need the following tools:
- Cotton swabs.
- Vinyl putty knife.
- Washing, rubbing alcohol.
- Flooring fix wax in a color to match your flooring.
- Clean cotton fabric on white or an old-fashioned style infant diaper.
6 Wood Floor Restoration Steps
To successfully repair a hardwood floor scratch, follow these steps:
Step #1
Wipe the scraped region with a damp washcloth soaked in a little amount of alcohol. This will clean the surface of grease or other materials that could make repairing your hardwood floor more difficult.
Step #2
After that, use a Q Tip dipped in rubbing alcohol to cleanse the scrape entirely of debris or dirt that may have been pushed to it throughout each day’s wear and tear.
Step #3
Get your floor wax repair kit and follow the directions inside. You can compare the color by comparing a sample to the wax on top of the flooring and seeing how it compares.
Step #4
Take a small amount of the wax and apply it to the plastic putty knife. Push the mixture down with your finger, then press it in place. To remove any extra wax from the floor, push the flat end of the tool to the knife and scrape away.
Step #5
Take the cotton fabric and gently buff the flooring to eliminate any excess material or wax left on the floor. Ensure you’re doing this very, very lightly so that you’re not removing the wax you simply pushed into the scrape on the floor.
Step #6
If these tips and tricks do not give you the result you desired, be sure to get professional hardwood floor refinishing. A hardwood floor refinishing will erase the scratch and make your floors look brand new.
Refinishing starts with sanding and polishing your hardwood until all scrapes, scratches, gouges, & stains are removed, uncovering a like-new wood floor. Then, a hardwood floor coating will give it an updated, fresh look.
Hudson Hardwood Offers Top-Rated Hardwood Floor Restoration in Philadelphia, PA
Are you looking for hardwood floor restoration services? Look no further than Hudson Hardwood! We are a top-rated wood floor restoration company specializing in restoring and refinishing hardwood floors. Our services include:
- Hardwood floor buffing.
- Hardwood floor coating.
- Hardwood floor cleaning.
- Hardwood floor refinishing.
- Hardwood flooring installation.
We have many years of experience in the industry, and our team of experts is dedicated to providing you with the best possible service. Get in touch with us today to learn more!",hudsonhardwood
77,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/floor-installation-how-to-prepare-for-it/,"It can be complicated to know where to start when getting ready for a floor installation. You need to take care of so many things before the process starts, and some homeowners might get nervous about it since they believe it will make them stressed out and their homes will be a complete mess. But, it’s not as bad as you think!
Working with a professional company can take a lot of that stress away from you. Still, there are some steps that everyone should take to make the process even easier on themselves and those installing your new flooring.
In this blog, we’ll share some ways to prepare your home before a floor installation begins so everything goes smoothly and without any trouble at all!
5 Ways To Prepare For Your Floor Installation
1 – Ensure Your Pet’s Safety
Before a floor installation, you need to ensure your pet’s safety is taken into account. Pets can be curious and might get in the way of the workers or try to eat the new flooring, so it’s best to keep them out of the room altogether or put them in another room with a closed door. However, make sure the room is not too small because after being there for too long they can get stressed.
If you’d like to keep your pets in the room, make sure there’s a separate place to go if they get scared or try to interfere with the installation. By doing this, you’ll help everyone stay safe and calm!
2 – Remove Valuable & Delicate Items From The Room
You must remove all valuables and delicate items from the room. This includes anything breakable such as vases, antiques, and electronics since they could get damaged by a worker dropping something heavy on them.
3 – Think About Your Floor Height
When choosing your flooring, think about the height of the new floor compared to the old one. If there’s a big difference, you might need to adjust some things before installation begins. For example, if your old floor was at a lower height and you installed a new floor that is significantly taller, your door frames might need to be adjusted, or you might have to replace the bottom of your doors.
4 – Remove Your Furniture
This one is pretty self-explanatory! You’ll need to remove all of your furniture from the room before workers come in to install your new flooring. This includes sofas, tables, chairs – everything needs to go. You can always put your furniture back into the room once the installation is complete, but it’s best to remove it for the time being.
5 – Prepare For Waste Disposal
Some waste materials will need to go, so make sure you’re prepared for this. If there’s any trash in the room, like broken pieces or ripped-up boxes, that needs to go, be sure you have a place for all of it. This might mean buying extra garbage bags or boxes so that everything can get disposed of on time.
Get Your Floor Installation With Professionals
By following these tips, your floor installation will go smoothly and without any trouble at all! The best you can do is schedule your floor installation with a professional company, like Hudson Hardwood, that can guide you on preparing for the process.
At Hudson Hardwood, we have more than 20 years of experience with flooring services, including installing hardwood floors that will last you a lifetime! We understand that it can be stressful and overwhelming for some homeowners. That’s why our team is always available to answer any questions you might have about getting your new hardwood floors!
Give us a call to schedule your service!",hudsonhardwood
78,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/flooring-trends-2023/,"Hardwood floors are durable pieces that provide a timeless elegance—still, trends and fashion influence people’s preferences for hardwood floorings. From types of wood to colors and finishes, people reflect their tastes and view of trends in their choices. Discover the flooring trends for the next year and how they affect hardwood floorings.
The return to natural materials
There is a trend going back to natural materials. People are interested in products that come from the Earth, which means that there is an increase in the popularity of hardwood flooring over other materials. The variety of colors and textures available with hardwood makes it a desirable option for many people. In addition, because hardwood is a natural product, it will always be in style.
While oak and maple will always be popular choices for hardwood flooring, people are also looking for more exotic woods like Brazilian cherry, tigerwood, and others. These woods offer a unique look that can enhance the appearance of a room. They are also very durable and can withstand any wear and tear.
The Return To Antiquity
This trend can be seen in many things, not just hardwood flooring. People are interested in the styles and designs from centuries ago. This is reflected in the popularity of vintage or antique furniture and the increasing demand for hardwood flooring with reclaimed wood. Reclaimed wood is wood that has been recycled from old buildings or furniture.
Reclaimed wood has a unique look and texture that you cannot find in any other type of wood. If you already have the old flooring, hardwood floor restoration services are ideal to bring back to life an antique hardwood flooring and make it look as good as new.
Colorful Coatings
While many people prefer a natural look for their hardwood flooring, that is not to say that they cannot add a pop of color. There are now a variety of coatings that can be applied to wood floors that will add color and personality. These coatings can match or contrast with the walls or furniture in a room. Hardwood floor refinishing services are great for applying a colorful coat to an already installed floor.
Get The Best Hardwood Floorings Customized To Your Taste
Hudson Hardwood is proud to offer its clients the latest trends in hardwood flooring. From classic styles to more contemporary designs, they have something for everyone. In addition, our team of experts can help you choose the perfect flooring for your home, ensuring that it looks great and lasts for many years.
If you need hardwood floor installation or refinishing, be sure to contact us.",hudsonhardwood
79,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/get-on-trend-hardwood-flooring-kitchen/,"If you’re looking to give your kitchen a makeover, hardwood flooring is one of the hottest trends for 2023. From classic oak to modern walnut, there are so many options when it comes to hardwood flooring and textures that can add warmth and character to your kitchen space. Let’s explore this year’s trends, pros, and cons of having hardwood flooring in your kitchen.
Discover The Latest Trends in Hardwood Floor Trends 2023
Hardwood floors in your kitchen are always a timeless classic, but certain trends come and go each year. For 2023, light wood is all the rage, with shades like white oak, maple, and hickory being especially popular. Warm whites are gaining popularity as an alternative to gray-colored floors.
Dark woods such as walnut and mahogany are also trending—they look great paired with lighter-colored furniture and appliances. Textured hardwoods such as hand-scraped, wire-brushed, or distressed are trendy right now, giving kitchens an extra dimension.
Pros And Cons Of Hardwood Kitchen Flooring
Here are the pros and cons of getting hardwood flooring for your kitchen.
Pros
The primary benefit of installing hardwood floors in the kitchen is that they can last for decades if properly maintained. Wood is also known for being an incredibly versatile material, allowing for easy customization with different colors, shades, and textures. The natural beauty of wood adds a layer of sophistication and charm to any room.
Hardwood flooring provides great value for your money in terms of resale value. It’s also relatively easy to clean and maintain as long as proper care is taken. Spills can be easily wiped off using a damp mop or cloth, while deeper cleaning can involve using a steam cleaner or a wood-safe cleanser.
Cons
One downside to hardwood flooring in the kitchen is that it’s not ideal if you want a low-maintenance solution. Hardwood flooring requires regular maintenance, such as polishing or refinishing every few years. Additionally, spills can cause damage if left unchecked, so you must be vigilant when wiping them up quickly.
Overall, hardwood is an excellent option for kitchen flooring. You can be sure it’s practical, will look great, and will boost your home value. If you’re looking for a hardwood flooring contractor, here’s a great option:
Install A Hardwood Floor In Your Kitchen
Are you considering getting a hardwood floor installation in Philadelphia for your kitchen? You don’t know where to start? At Hudson Hardwood, we offer FREE consultations and FREE quotes. Our team of experts who have decades of experience installing high-quality hardwood floors in kitchens all over New Jersey. We also offer the following hardwood services:
- Hardwood floor refinishing in Philadelphia
- Hardwood floor maintenance services in Philadelphia
Get on trend for 2023 with our expertly crafted hardwood floors – contact us today!",hudsonhardwood
80,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/hardwood-flooring-101/,"Hardwood floors are one of the most popular choices for homeowners looking to improve their homes. And it’s no wonder why – hardwood floors are elegant, durable, and easy to care for. But before you take the plunge and install hardwood floors in your home, you should know a few things.
In this blog post, we’ll discuss the basics of hardwood flooring: what it is, where to install it, and tips to keep in mind! Keep reading for more.
What Is Hardwood Flooring?
Hardwood flooring is a type of flooring that is made from hardwood trees. The most common hardwoods used for flooring are oak, maple, and cherry. Hardwood floors are highly durable and easy to care for, making them popular for high-traffic areas like living rooms and hallways.
5 Spaces To Install Hardwood Flooring
You can install hardwood floors in any room of the house. Here are 5 of the most popular places homeowners usually install hardwood floors:
N°1 Living Room
The living room probably is the most popular place to install hardwood floors.. This type of flooring adds a touch of elegance and sophistication to any space. It’s a great choice if you want to increase your home’s value.
N°2 Kitchen
The kitchen is another popular room to install hardwood floors. These floors are easy to clean and maintain, making them a perfect choice for busy families.
N°3 Dining Room
Hardwood floors can make any dining room feel more luxurious. If you have visited often, hardwood floors are a great way to impress your guests.
N°4 Hallway
Hardwood floors are a great choice for high-traffic areas like hallways. Not only do they look great, but they’re also durable and easy to care for.
N°5 Bedroom
Hardwood floors can give any bedroom a warm and inviting feel. They’re a great choice if you’re looking for a cozy retreat.
Caring Tips For Hardwood Floors
Now that you know where to install hardwood floors, here are a few tips to keep in mind:
- Remove shoes before walking on hardwood floors.
- Place mats at every entrance to collect dirt and debris.
- Use a damp mop to clean hardwood floors as needed.
- Avoid using excessive water since this can damage the wood.
- Sweep or vacuum your hardwood floors regularly to remove dirt and dust.
When your floors need a little extra care, get professional hardwood floor refinishing services. A hardwood floor refinishing will sand-away all imperfections to reveal a new-looking hardwood floor.
Hudson Hardwood: The Most Professional Hardwood Floor Installation Services
Are you looking for hardwood floor restoration or installation? Look no further than Hudson Hardwood. We’re a team of hardwood flooring experts that can help you choose the perfect hardwood floors for your home.
We offer hardwood floor installation, hardwood floor refinishing, and hardwood floor restoration services. Contact us today to learn more!",hudsonhardwood
81,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/hardwood-flooring-trends-for-2021/,"As the new year approaches, so do the resolutions and renovations. With more people hanging out at home during the holidays and the winter season, they are spending more time looking at all of the things they have wanted to fix, upgrade, or change in their homes. For some, this means flooring. If you’re ready to remodel your home or flip that house, you’ll need the latest scoop on which floors are gaining more popularity and recognition.
Hardwood floors are durable and can switch up the aesthetic of nearly any room. They upgrade the look of a room and usually become more interesting and attractive throughout the years. Knowing which trends are around the corner can significantly assist in picking out the floor that is going to elevate the style and look of your home. Continue reading to see what to expect for hardwood flooring trends in 2021.
Larger Planks. Natural Finish
Surveys conducted throughout the industry demonstrate a desire for longer and wider planks that have a natural finish. Almost 45% agree that natural finishes will continue to increase in demand for the upcoming years, while 57% expect a spike in the demand for wider planks. People are moving away from the warmer tones in hardwood floors and moving towards cooler, more natural-looking finishes.
Expect to see a lot of dark-colored woods that add interest and contrast to the room. It is one of the top two stains that homeowners request when installing or refinishing hardwood floors. Along with natural finishes, you can expect to also see more natural textures. Unfinished and textured woods continue to trend upwards, while the demand for exotic varieties is seemingly in favor of domestic woods.
Is the Gray Here to Stay?
Gray-colored floors have been a staple for the past few years. Though hardwood floor trends tend to last for about five years, grays have been a prominent choice for the past 6-7 years. This color seems to go very well with current and popular home décor styles, which is why this design option may have hung around for so long.
While the trend is still here for 2021, gray floors are approaching their final days. They are beginning to wane in popularity, and it is likely that within a few years, they are going to develop a reputation for being tired or outdated. This means that it may be in your best interest to look for something with a little more longevity.
Lighter Styles To Match Décor
Lighter styles are gaining in popularity and are, currently, one of the top two stains selected when installing or refinishing hardwood floors. People are beginning to move away from the dramatics of very dark hardwood floors in favor of simpler and more modern lighter finishes. As the preferred home décor styles continue to move towards more modern and simple designs, the demand for a clean look continues to grow.
As people continue to demand natural and organic-looking hardwood floors, they are willing to play with texture and a lighter degree of scrape. Still, they want their finishes matte, muted, and less imposing. For these options, oak is king. As domestic hardwoods continue to maintain their cost, availability, and quality, expect to see many oak floors being installed – especially white oak.
Changing Perspectives
Something that is getting a surprising boost in hardwood flooring is the use of patterns in new floors. Those remodeling their homes are going for unexpected quirks and subtle unique touches to add character and personality to their home. This is becoming evident in their choices for hardwood floor installation techniques.
As people value the quality of uniqueness, originality, and variety within their homes, this trend is spreading to hardwood flooring choices, as well. Fresh and trendy hardwood flooring patterns provide the desired contemporary good looks with a versatility that has not been seen before, and quite frankly, hasn’t been popular in a long time.
You can expect to see herringbone – a classic that is finding its way back to “trendy” status. This is a nice alternative to straight hardwood planking, which leads to a nice pattern that brings sophistication and timelessness to any room. It’s simply irresistible. Another upcoming trend is laying the floor from a diagonal perspective. Rather than laying the planks at a ninety-degree angle in relation to the wall, the planks are shifted to a forty-five-degree angle. This quick trick gives your home a more contemporary feel. Just know that this can cost more as this design require more labor and more materials are needed as this design produces more waste.
Mixing It Up With Planks
In addition to wider and longer planks, another surprising trend on the rise is the use of mixed plank widths. This unexpected trend is rolling over from 2020 as another quirky, character-filled touch to people’s homes. Alternating different widths of hardwood flooring to a room can add depth and a little more style. Using different widths of the same hardwood flooring gives a subtle but pleasantly unexpected design detail to space. However, it should be noted that the widths aren’t entirely random and require an entire row must be installed using planks with the same width.
The Bottom Line
Hardwood flooring will be taking on more personality as we move into 2021. People are favoring natural and organic styles with more unfinished and unrefined characteristics as home décor styles move in the same direction. As home décor styles continue to trend towards minimalist designs with an emphasis on eco-friendly designs and sources, flooring is going to move in a similar path to match the needs of the home décor trends.",hudsonhardwood
82,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/hardwood-flooring-vs-vinyl-flooring/,"There are many choices to make when it comes to flooring. You must choose the right material, color, and style for your home. Right now, two of the most popular materials on the market are hardwood and vinyl. So, which one should you choose?
This blog post is for you if you’re trying to decide between hardwood and vinyl flooring. We’ll go over some of the pros and cons of each type of flooring so that you can make an informed decision about which one is right for your home.
How To Choose The Right Option For My Home?
When choosing to floor your home, there are a few things you’ll need to keep in mind. To begin with, is my decision cost-effective? Does it increase my property value? And finally, is it easy to take care of and durable? Look at hardwood and vinyl’s pros and cons in these essential categories.
Hardwood Flooring Pros
- Hardwood floors are timeless and classic. They add value to your home; thanks to hardwood floor refinishing, you can restore them multiple times if they become scratched or damaged.
- Hardwood floors are easier to clean than carpets and don’t require special cleaning solutions or vacuums.
- Hardwoods are a natural product and are therefore eco-friendly. The source of most hardwoods comes from sustainably managed forests.
- Hardwood floors can be restored easily with hardwood floor refinishing services if they become damaged, which makes them a long-lasting investment.
- Many people find hardwood floors have a more unique, luxurious look than other types of flooring.
Hardwood Flooring Cons
- Hardwood floors can be expensive, especially if you choose premium wood species like mahogany or walnut.
- Unlike vinyl or laminate floors, hardwoods can’t be installed as a “floating” floor, so they need to be glued or nailed down. This can make installation more time-consuming.
Vinyl Flooring Pros
- Vinyl is one of the most affordable flooring options on the market. It’s also effortless to install, saving you money on installation costs.
- Vinyl floors are water resistant, making them ideal for rooms like kitchens and bathrooms with much moisture.
- Many vinyl floors come in plank form, which gives them a similar look to hardwood floors.
Vinyl Flooring Cons
- Vinyl floors can’t be refinished like hardwood floors, so they’ll need to be replaced when they become scratched or damaged.
- While some types of vinyl contain recycled materials, they’re not considered eco-friendly like some hardwoods because they come from petroleum products.
Choose Hardwood Flooring Over Vinyl For Your Floor
As you can see, there are pros and cons to both hardwood and vinyl flooring. But if we had to choose one over the other, we would recommend hardwood floors for most homes. Hardwood floors are classic and increase your home’s value, while vinyl floors are more affordable but less durable.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer hardwood floor installation, hardwood floor restoration, and hardwood floor refinishing to fulfill your flooring needs in the years to come. We’re a leading provider of hardwood floor services in Philadelphia, PA. Our team would be happy to help you choose the best hardwood option for your home. Get in touch with us to get started.",hudsonhardwood
83,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/hardwood-floors-101-replacement/,"Hardwood floors make any home look elegant and timeless, but long-lasting doesn’t mean indestructible. Even with proper maintenance, the wear and tear of everyday life can take its toll on your hardwood flooring. When the damage is too much, it’s time to replace them with a new hardwood floor installation. Discover here when it’s time to replace a hardwood floor.
5 Signs You Should Replace Your Hardwood Floors
You might wonder how you can know if you need to replace your floor. Here are 5 signs to look for that will tell you when it’s time to get a replacement.
1. Discoloration or Fading
Sometimes hardwood floor refinishing isn’t enough. If you see discoloration or fading in one spot, it could be a sign of deep staining or warping beneath the surface. Sun exposure can also cause discoloration or fading over time if blinds or curtains don’t properly cover windows.
2. Cupping
Cupping usually occurs due to an uneven moisture distribution within the wood itself, causing some boards to cup up while others sink. This creates an uneven surface that can be felt throughout the flooring and makes it uncomfortable to walk barefoot.
3. Cracking
Cracks are caused by various issues, such as extreme changes in temperature and humidity, excessive humidity levels, lack of proper care and upkeep, or even just regular wear and tear over time.
4. Creaking
Loose nails or screws used to attach the boards can cause creaking. Creaking is most common in older homes where the floor may not have been installed properly initially. Still, it can happen with newer hardwood floors due to everyday use and wear and tear on the flooring.
5. Uneven Surface
Uneven surfaces could indicate that your subfloor has become unstable due to moisture seeping underneath. Moisture can enter due to plumbing leaks or water damage from flooding in your home.
Get A Professional New Hardwood Floor Installation in Philadelphia, PA.
No matter what condition your hardwood floors are in, our team at Hudson Hardwoods is ready to help you. We’re the pros of hardwood floor refinishing and installation in Philadelphia, PA! Our business offers a wide selection of colors & styles available for both traditional & modern designs. We’ll help ensure you find the perfect match for your home’s unique style & personality!
Contact us today for more information about how we can help bring new life into your home through our professional installation services!",hudsonhardwood
84,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/hardwood-floors-for-bathrooms/,"Wooden floors are a popular choice for many homeowners. They can be installed in any room of the house, and they come in a variety of colors and styles. When it comes to flooring for bathrooms, there are many reasons why people may choose hardwood flooring.
In this blog post, we’ll discuss the pros and cons of a hardwood floor installation in the bathroom. Keep reading!
Pros & Cons Of Hardwood Floor Installation In Your Bathroom
There are many reasons why hardwood floors are a popular choice for bathrooms. Let’s look at the pros and cons of this material:
Pros
- Warmth: Hardwood floors are warm and inviting. They make the perfect choice for a guest bathroom. This is especially true in the winter months when the floor can be cold to the touch. Earth tones generally make the entire space appear more inviting and pleasant.
- Style: Hardwood floors can give your bathroom a stylish and elegant look. There are a variety of colors and styles to choose from, so you can find the perfect match for your décor. You can also have the floors stained to match your existing hardwood floors.
- Durability: Hardwood floors are very durable and can last for many years. Hardwood flooring has 25-year or longer lifespans. They’re one of the most durable flooring choices, along with stone or ceramic tiles. With proper care, they’ll maintain their beauty and finish for a long time.
Cons
- Cost: Hardwood floors can be expensive to install. If you are working on a budget, feel free to talk to your hardwood floor installation company for a free consultation.
- Maintenance: Hardwood floors require maintenance every so often. Besides the regular sweeping and mopping, hardwood floor refinishing will keep them looking brand new always.
Hudson Hardwood: The Experts In Wood Floor Installation in Philadelphia, PA
Are you looking for the most professional wood floor installation? Look no further than Hudson Hardwood. We have many years of experience in hardwood flooring restoration and installation. We can assure you that your bathroom hardwood floors will look amazing!
We offer free consultations if you’re unsure whether hardwood floors are right for your bathroom. Contact us today to learn more!",hudsonhardwood
85,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/hardwood-vs-carpet-stairs/,"Hardwood vs. Carpet Stairs
There’s a growing trend to change carpet stairs and get a hardwood stair installation. While both options have their advantages and disadvantages, there are many reasons why hardwood stairs are a better choice. Discover the pros and cons of a better choice if you swap your carpet stairs for a wood staircase.
Elegance
One of the biggest advantages of hardwood stairs is that they look great and add character to any space. They provide a clean, elegant aesthetic perfect for modern homes or traditional spaces alike. In addition, hardwood steps are more durable than carpets, making them ideal for high-traffic areas where spills and stains are common.
Cleaning
On the other hand, carpets may be softer on your feet and offer better insulation in colder climates. However, they require regular cleaning and maintenance to keep them looking fresh and attractive over time. And if you have pets or small children in your home, carpet can also be a magnet for dirt, hair, and other debris. Hardwood flooring is always easier to clean.
Durability
Hardwood stairs are also more durable than carpet, meaning they’ll last longer and require less replacement. In addition, hardwood is less likely to show wear and tear, making it ideal for high-traffic areas. Carpets have a shorter lifespan and are more affected by changing trends since the elegance of hardwood floorings is timeless.
Cost
Although hardwood stairs may have a higher initial cost than carpet, they’re often cheaper in the long run, thanks to their durability and ease of maintenance. Hardwood flooring is also a great investment since it raises your home value.
Personal Taste
In the end, the choice between hardwood and carpet stairs comes down to personal preference. But if you’re looking for a durable, low-maintenance option that will look great for years to come. It’s just a timeless, elegant option that will last for generations.
Get The Best Hardwood Floor Installation
If you’re interested in getting hardwood stair installation, contact Hudson Hardwood. We’re pros in every hardwood flooring service you might need. Transform your house by getting a beautiful wood staircase with us. Our services are of top-notch quality and will upgrade any interior space.",hudsonhardwood
86,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-long-does-it-take-to-refinish-hardwood-floors/,"So, you just bought a new (to you) home and you want to keep those beautiful hardwood floors preserved as long as possible. Or maybe you’ve been in your home for years with your floors, and you want to make sure they are there for more years to come. Either way, you want to make a decision on how to do it.
We get it, it’s a big decision. But, luckily you’re doing your research ahead of time to plan for this, rather than going for it without a plan and then having to postpone your project even longer because you weren’t prepared.
You can do it yourself if you’re up for it, or you can have your floors refinished by a professional team with minimal interruption to your home. It really depends on what will work with your timeframe and budget.
So how long can you expect it to take to refinish your hardwood floors? The simple answer is, it depends. We know, not the answer you were looking for.
You have a few things to consider:
- The age of the hardwood.
Newer hardwood floors will be easier to sand down, whereas older floors have had more time to harden, adhere to the sealant, and may have some damages that need to be repaired. So before you start, you need to consider how old your floors are, and what condition they are in to begin with.
- The size of the area.
Obviously the more hardwood flooring you are refinishing, the longer it will take. It is always a good idea to measure out how much total square footage you will be replacing. A general rule of thumb is that a team can sand anywhere between one thousand and two thousand square feet of hardwood per day.
- The type of finish you are putting on the floor.
Oil-Based polyurethanes can take twice as long to dry as water-based. If there is any stain going on the hardwood it can also add an extra day to the project. On average it can take three to five days for oil-based, and up to two days for water-based. There are other finishes that can be done on hardwood floors, but they require timelines unique to them.
There are also other little things to consider like, how much furniture you will have to keep moving, any damage spots in the floor that need to be repaired before the floors can be refinished, and all of the dust being cleaned up before the refinishing process can start.
All in all, it can be a big undertaking. But with some dedication and hardwork, you can have those beautiful refinished hardwood floors be in your home for years to come, looking good as new.",hudsonhardwood
87,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-clean-your-hardwood-floors/,"Isn’t Philly flooring beautiful?
Are you a Philadelphia homeowner with hardwood floors? It’s important to keep them looking their best.
With time and wear, hardwood floors can lose their shine and appeal. But don’t worry – there are ways to bring back that shine!
There are two popular methods for revitalizing and maintaining hardwood floors:
- Buff and coat
- Refinishing
In this comprehensive guide, we’ll explore the benefits and drawbacks of each method and provide instructions for cleaning and re-coating or refinishing your hardwood floors.
We’ll also share some tips and tricks from the pros for maintaining your floors’ cleanliness, and address some common concerns in our FAQ section.
So, when hiring a professional, this guide from Hudson Hardware will help you choose the best floor-cleaning solution for your specific situation.
Let’s get started!
First, let’s define the two methods.
What is the buff and coat method?
Buff and coat, also known as screen and recoat, involves lightly sanding and applying a new coat of finish with a hard floor buffer to the surface of the hardwood floor.
This method is ideal for floors with minor scratches and wear and tear and can be done quickly and affordably. Think of it as a hardwood floor maintenance coat.
- Benefits: The buff and coat method can greatly extend the life of your hardwood floor! It will nicely refresh the top layer of polyurethane – a buffed floor is perfect for cleaning old wood floors without refinishing.
- Drawbacks: The buff and coat method can deep clean hardwood floors, but it can not remove larger issues, like deep gouges, big scratches or large areas of damage from water, heat, and fire, or marks from pets.
Try this method first if you wonder how to get wood floors to shine.
What is the refinishing method?
Refinishing, on the other hand, involves sanding the entire floor down to the bare wood and reapplying stain and finish.
This floor restoration method is best for floors with deep scratches, stains, or water damage, and can significantly enhance the look and durability of your hardwood floors.
- Benefits: The refinishing method can get rid of even the toughest damage. And, it is much cheaper than replacing your flooring.
- Drawbacks: Dust! There is no way to avoid dust, however we use dust containment that contains 90% of the dust. Check out our video on how minimal the dust issue is: How Much Dust Should I Expect.
Things to consider
Before deciding on which method to use, we consider:
- The age and condition of your floors
- Your budget
- Your time constraints
It’s also important to properly prepare and clean the floors before starting any restoration project.
With the right tools and techniques, we can restore the shine and beauty to your hardwood floors for you to enjoy their elegance and durability for years to come.
6 Tips and Tricks for maintaining your floors’ Cleanliness
Wondering how to deep clean wood floors, or how to shine dull wood floors?
To maintain the cleanliness and shine of your natural hardwood floors, there are some tips and tricks that you can follow:
- Vacuum your floors regularly to prevent dirt and dust from accumulating. Don’t sweep your floors, vacuum them with a hardwood floor vacuum. Or a vacuum that has a bare floor/hardwood floor setting. This means the brush roller will not be running.
- The best thing to mop floors with is a flat damp mop with natural wood floor cleaner to clean your floors, but avoid using too much water as it can cause water damage. Be sure to use a flat mop. You should only use as much water/clean or mixture on the floor as you would use on your mirrors.
- Look for the best natural floor cleaner: use a pH-neutral cleaner specifically designed for hardwood floors to remove stains and spills.
- For hardwood floor deep cleaning, avoid using furniture polish, wax, or oil-based cleaners, as they can build up on the surface of the wood and create a dull appearance. Stick to natural hardwood floor cleaners, like silicone cleaners. They include products like mop and glo, orange glo, etc.
- Try having a professional buff your hardwood floors before and after large gatherings in your home. Since only professionals have a buffer we recommend the moping and vacuuming tips above.
- Put protective pads on the legs of your furniture to prevent scratches and dents on the surface of your floors.
- Place rugs and mats in high-traffic areas to protect your floors from wear and tear.
By following these tips and tricks, you’ll be able to keep your hardwood floors looking their best for many years to come!
Further tips
Now that we’ve covered how to deep clean wooden floors, here are some further tips to keep your floor looking pristine:
- Don’t drag heavy furniture across your hardwood floors, as this can cause scratches and dents. Instead, lift the furniture or use furniture sliders to move it around.
- Avoid wearing high heels or cleats on your hardwood floors, as they can leave deep scuffs and scratches on the surface of the wood.
- If you have pets, keep their nails trimmed to prevent them from scratching the floors.
- Consider using a humidifier to maintain a consistent level of humidity in your home, as fluctuations in humidity can cause your hardwood floors to warp or crack over time.
In summary
Taking care of your hardwood floors requires regular cleaning, preventative measures, and being mindful of potential hazards that can damage the surface over time.
By following these tips, you can ensure that your floors remain beautiful and durable for years to come.
Reach out to Hudson Hardwood for all of your hardwood floor needs and concerns:
- We can discuss screen and recoat costs
- Your hardwood flooring coating
- Floor screening methods
- Recoating hardwood floors
- Recoating engineered hardwood floors
- Add beautiful new hardwood flooring to your home
Also, we can show you refinished floors before and afters that will amaze you!
For over 20 years, Hudson Hardwood Floors has been the leader in hardwood flooring Philadelphia. We have used our expertise on commercial and residential flooring projects. We are here to help keep your hardwood floors beautiful!
FAQs
Fact: Did you know that it is recommended that you clean your hardwood floors at least once a week? It ultimately depends on how frequently the floors are used, but once a week is a good benchmark.
Fact: It is not recommended that you use a steam mop on hardwood floors. It can damage the finish and cause warping. Use a damp mop or microfiber cloth instead.
Q: Can scratches and dents be repaired on hardwood floors?
A: Yes, scratches and dents can be repaired on hardwood floors through sanding and refinishing. However, it is more cost-effective to prevent these damages from occurring in the first place.
Q: How do I prevent sun damage to my hardwood floors?
A: To prevent sun damage to your hardwood floors, consider using blinds or curtains to block direct sunlight during peak hours of the day. You can also apply a UV-resistant finish to your floors.
Q: How can I maintain the shine on my hardwood floors?
A: To maintain the shine on your hardwood floors, regularly clean and polish them with a hardwood floor cleaner, hardwood buffer or polish. Be sure to follow the manufacturer’s instructions and avoid using abrasive cleaners.
Q: How to clean hardwood floors without streaks?
A: Use a clean, dry microfiber cloth or mop pad for best results.
Q: Wondering how to remove floor polish buildup?
A: Mop the floor with clean water. Then Mop with a bucket of warm water and ½ cup ammonia. The ammonia should remove wax build-up from the floors.",hudsonhardwood
88,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-completely-change-your-bamboo-floor/,"We can’t deny that bamboo flooring is stunning. However, if you want it to look even better, there are some crucial steps you need to follow. The first step to changing your bamboo floor is starting with the basics: cleaning it. As something that’s made for us to walk over, it’s pretty common that it will get real dirty soon. Floors can get dirty, from mud and dirt to spills and stains.
If you’ve never cleaned a bamboo floor before, don’t worry – we’ll share why it’s important to clean it and how to do so in this blog!
Why You Should Clean Your Bamboo Floor
Bamboo floors are a beautiful and sustainable flooring option. However, they require extra care to keep them looking their best because they’re susceptible to being warped, making them look dull and old. Dirt and dust can get ground into the bamboo flooring, which will wear down the finish over time.
But besides the aesthetic aspect of it, it’s important to clean them since it’s a natural material. If there’s an excess of moisture in your home, it can produce mold growth, which is harmful to you and your family since it can cause severe allergies and other health risks. It’s important to clean your bamboo floor regularly to prevent this from happening.
How To Properly Clean Your Bamboo Floor
Now that you’ve identified why it’s important to clean your bamboo floor, you’re ready to learn how to do it properly. Here are the steps:
- Using a vacuum, broom, or microfiber mop, you should clean the floor from all debris and dust.
- It would help if you got a bamboo floor cleaning solution to clean your floor without damaging it. To remove marks, you can also use white vinegar mixed with water. However, it would be best if you were careful with this technique sparingly; otherwise, the vinegar’s acidity can dull the finish of your floor over time.
- You should spray the floor solution and clean it using a slightly damp mop. By cleaning your floor in circular patterns and making sure you’re adding extra pressure into areas with more dirt or grime, your floor will shine bright like a diamond!
Let Professionals Take Care Of Your Bamboo Floor
If you’re not sure how to clean your bamboo floor or if you want it to be done properly and with the right products, leave it to professionals, like Hudson Hardwood! At Hudson Hardwood, we have years of experience cleaning bamboo floors and know how to get them looking great again in no time.
With our cleaning and recoating services, you’ll have your bamboo floor restored to its original beauty! If you’re interested in our services, don’t hesitate to contact us today!",hudsonhardwood
89,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-convert-carpeted-stairs-to-hardwood/,"How To Convert Carpeted Stairs To Hardwood
Many homes have carpeted stairs, which can be both convenient and stylish. However, over time carpets may become worn or stained, making them difficult to clean and requiring replacement more often than other types of flooring. Hardwood stairs are a more durable and easy-to-maintain option that can last for many years with proper care.
Converting your carpeted stairs to hardwood is a project you can complete on the weekend with some basic tools and materials. Discover here how to do it.
1. Decide On A Type Of Hardwood
The first step in converting your carpeted stairs to a wood staircase is choosing the type of wood you want. The most popular materials for this project are oak, maple, cherry, and walnut. Consider factors such as overall appearance, durability, and cost when deciding.
2. Remove Carpet And Clean
To begin the conversion process, remove any existing carpet or padding from the stair treads and risers. Once these items have been removed, thoroughly clean all surfaces to ensure they are free of dust and debris.
3. Measure And Cut
Once your stairs are clean and dry, measure each riser and tread using a tape measure to determine how much wood you need. Carefully cut your chosen material to fit around corners and banister posts, using a saw or jigsaw for precision cuts.
4. Apply Wood Adhesive And Secure
Once your wood strips are cut to size, use wood adhesive to secure them in place on the risers and treads. Use clamps to hold the pieces firmly in place while the adhesive sets, then add finishing nails or screws to ensure that they remain securely attached.
5. Complete The Project With An Application Of Finish
To complete your hardwood staircase project, apply an appropriate finish to protect against water damage and general wear and tear. Consider a durable polyurethane varnish, wax sealer,
or stain, depending on your desired look and level of protection. Your hardwood stairs will look great for many years to come with proper care!
Best To Contact A Professional For Hardwood Floor Installation
It is possible to convert your carpeted stairs to hardwood stairs on your own. However, it is best to contact a professional. Hardwood floor installation can be tricky, and improper installation can damage your stairs or cause injuries to yourself or others.
At Hudson Hardwood, we have many years of experience with hardwood stair installation. We’ll complete your project safely and correctly. We even work around your schedule!",hudsonhardwood
90,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-create-perfect-flooring/,"Homeowners always want their houses to stand out. One way to do this is by having the perfect flooring, but this can be harder than it seems. We all have seen the same old dark or light flooring designs. So, how can you improve that?
Even though the classic dark or light hardwood floors are good, you can give your house a unique look by trying flooring combinations. But how does this work? How materials or colors should you use? We know it can be overwhelming. But don’t worry!
In this blog post, we’ll share with you some factors you have to consider to mix different flooring in your home so that you can achieve a stunning look.
How To Successfully Mix Different Flooring Materials
Colors Are Key!
When it comes to colors, they are key! You may combine them as much as you like since there are no set-in-stone design standards. However, some colors go well together, while others are used to create strong contrasts. For instance, for a contrasting effect, you can use brown granite, a dark natural stone, with a light-colored hardwood floor, such as pine.
Drop-Down Flooring
Maybe you want to mix specific materials that can be thicker than most materials, such as flagstone. Flagstone can be difficult to work with since the thickness varies because of the inconsistencies of its nature.
Traditional installation methods are ineffective at combining flagstone with other materials such as carpet or hardwood. However, it’s not impossible to achieve. You may use the drop-down floor approach, used by professional flooring services, to create a unique section of the floor made of floor joists that are lower than the rest of the floor.
Consider underlayment
If you’re planning to use different materials for your flooring, then you should use underlayment. Different materials don’t have the same thickness, so they’ll look different. While all flooring materials don’t require underlayment, they may be utilized to raise the height of a floor to match another type.
Use Transition Strips
Transition strips are often employed between materials with different finish heights, resulting in a lip where the two meet. There are various transition strips to choose from, such as T-strips, in which the vertical portion lies between the two materials and the top horizontal section sits on top.
Completely Change Your House Look With Hudson Hardwood
If you’re looking to give your home a unique look by mixing different flooring materials or colors, Hudson Hardwood is the company for you. We specialize in the installation, cleaning, re-coating, refinishing, and restoring hardwood floors in Pottstown. Our 20+ years of experience make us the right choice to give your home a make-over that will make it stand out!",hudsonhardwood
91,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-find-best-hardwood-flooring-company/,"Any home renovation can be a stressful experience. But it doesn’t have to be. If you know what to look for in a hardwood flooring company, you can ensure you complete your project quickly and easily. Here are some things to look out for that will help you find the right hardwood flooring company for your next project.
Reliable Service & Daily Job Updates
First and foremost, ensure that the company you’re working with is reliable. They should keep you updated on the progress of your project every day so you always know what’s going on. Additionally, they should be available to answer questions or address concerns.
Livable Conditions During Renovation
Secondly, you want to ensure your living conditions are tolerable during renovation. The last thing you want is to come home to a construction site every day. Your contractor should take measures to minimize the impact on your daily life. This may include setting up temporary walls or using dustless sanding methods.
Environmentally Friendly Products
Another important consideration is whether or not the company uses environmentally friendly products. You should be able to have peace of mind knowing that the products used in your home are safe for you and the environment.
Furniture Moving
Additionally, you’ll want to ensure that the company you’re working with offers furniture moving services. After all, who wants to move all their heavy furniture before and after a renovation? The right company will take care of everything for you so that you can sit back and relax.
Dustless Sanding
Finally, you’ll want to ensure the company uses dustless sanding methods. Traditional sanding methods can create a lot of dust, which can be dangerous for your health and furniture. Dustless sanding methods eliminate this problem so you can feel safe in your home.
Enjoy Working With A Reliable Hardwood Flooring Contractor in Philadelphia, PA
When looking for a hardwood flooring company that meets all these criteria, Hudson Hardwood is an excellent choice! Our team has been serving customers for over 20 years. We have plenty of experience under our belt! No matter how big or small your project is, we’ll deliver the best results. We offer:
- Hardwood floor refinishing in Philadelphia, PA
- Hardwood floor installation in Philadelphia, PA
- Hardwood floor maintenance services in Philadelphia, PA
With Hudson Hardwood, you can rest assured knowing that your hardwood floors are being handled with skill and care!",hudsonhardwood
92,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-fix-scratches-in-hardwood-floors-from-a-dog/,"Hardwood floors are a fantastic flooring option. They are classic, clean, and beautiful – but they do require a bit of upkeep, especially if you have a beloved furry friend. If you have hardwood floors, then you likely know the sound of your dog’s nails across the wood all too well. Dog scratches on hardwood floors are, at the most, a bit of a nuisance and a little unsightly. However, those scratches are entirely fixable!
Anyone who has hardwood floors knows that every scratch that you notice tends to give you a little sting, kind of like when you buy a brand-new car, and you find the find ding or dent. Hardwood floors are no different, and when it comes to getting rid of those annoying dog scratches on hardwood floors, we are here to help! We know that you want to keep your floors as pristine as possible, which is why we are here to teach you how to keep your hardwood floors looking like new!
Pay Attention To Prevention
Do you know what is cheaper than fixing your hardwood floors? Preventing the damage in the first place. Basic, minimal care and keeping your floors clean are the initial steps to keeping scratches and scuffs to a minimum, even if Fido seems to be tap dancing along with your hardwood all day long.
By keeping your floors clean and well-kept, you will be removing dirt and grime. Because you are spending more time and paying more attention to your floors, you will likely notice any potential scratches or problem areas before the surface gets any worse. Natural hardwood floors are at a higher risk of surface damage and deterioration, so proper prevention is critical in keeping them looking perfect!
The Easy Fix
Fixing small and shallow hardwood floor scratches, and minor blemishes are relatively easy with a few DIY repair techniques. One of the easiest ways to improve a small spot, like dog scratches on hardwood, is to use a color matching marker. These markers are usually fine tip, permanent markers that are specifically designed to cover hardwood floor scratches with a wood stain pen and blending sticks. They are relatively inexpensive and are incredibly easy to use.
This is an excellent option if you aren’t too savvy with home repair, but you notice a few tiny scratches here and there. You don’t need to know any particular technique, and you can keep the marker on hand for quick and easy future repairs. The most essential factor to using these markers is finding one that matches your floor well. If you are unsure of how well the marker will match your stain or finish, try the marker in a very small area that is tucked away in a corner where no one else will see.
Hardwood Floor Scratch Removing
Most of the time, hardwood floor scratches are easy to repair – all you need is some stain, sandpaper, and a bit of elbow grease. This method is a bit more labor-intensive and requires you to work more carefully than you would if using a pen. Those who have dog scratches on their hardwood floor that are a bit deeper may opt for this approach.
With a small can of stain, fine-grit sandpaper, and a cloth, you can easily get started. Using the fine-grit sandpaper, gently sand in the direction of the floor’s grain. Then apply a thin amount of stain, and let it sit for a few minutes. After it has had time to rest and absorb into the floor, use a clean cloth to buff out the stain. If you are nervous about using a hardwood floor stain and you have dark floors, try a walnut. Walnuts have an oily brown dye that can effectively repair scratches on your hardwood floors and even enhance the look of areas that are a bit more worn.
There are many other products that minimize the appearance of scratches and that only require the use of a cloth. These products fill in the scratches on lighter floors, much like walnut stains are used for darker tones. The great thing about repair stains is that they make it nearly impossible for anyone to see the original scratches! If you are a bit nervous to try it out yourself, give your nearest flooring professional a quick call, and they can likely help.
Fixing Deep Scratches
If your dog has done some serious damage, and you need to fix a deeper scratch, then it may require you to have some prior knowledge or skill related to repairing hardwood floors. For deeper scratches or gouges, you’ll need to try a pre-colored latex wood filler. This is a good option for small but deep cuts that can be filled, stained, and finished with relative ease. Larger areas will likely require the guidance or services of a hardwood flooring professional. To protect the look and integrity of your floors, use your best judgment when making this decision.
Taking Care of Your Hardwood Floors in the Long Term
It is easy to forget that hardwood floors are pretty durable and may last throughout many generations. However, just like any other surface, they are prone to a bit of wear and tear, which is why proper cleaning and maintenance routines can keep your floors in tip top shape.
Those with dogs likely notice a bit more damage and scratches to their hardwood floors, but that doesn’t mean you are stuck with unsightly floors. There are many different ways to keep your hardwood looking nice without having to keep your dog locked up or far away. Simply stick to your cleaning and maintenance upkeep and use anyone of the techniques above that suits your problem the best. When all else fails, or you feel you may need more guidance to give a flooring professional a call, and they will have your floors looking good as new in no time.",hudsonhardwood
93,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-refinish-a-hardwood-floor/,"Are you looking to restore your hardwood floors to their natural beauty? You may be considering refinishing them yourself, or you may choose to hire a professional to take care of it for you. Whether you are considering spending the time and energy to do it yourself or the money to hire a professional, it helps to know what to expect.
Refinishing a hardwood floor is a pretty straightforward process. You start by sanding the floor, for which you will need a professional sander. This can usually be rented from a hardware store – either local or a large chain. You will also need to be able to plug your sander directly in to the electrical panel. While sanding, it is essential to wear a dust mask and use plastic or drop cloths to section off the space from the rest of your house. As you sand, the sander will kick up small dust particles into the air that can get into your nose and on your furniture.
Controlling the sander is the most critical part of correctly refinishing the floors. The key is to keep the sander moving at all times. If you stop in one spot, you risk burning, denting, or gouging the floor. The sander creates a tremendous amount of heat and can damage the floor if it is not handled correctly. Another essential thing to remember is that the sander is self-propelled – meaning this, it is going to want to keep moving.
After the floor has been sand and the old finish is removed, it is time to apply the stain and the new finish. There are usually a couple of different steps within this part of the process, including applying both the stain and the finish. If you like the color of your existing floors, you can skip the stain. However, the finish is what seals and protects the floor from any external damage.
Selecting a finish comes down to two unique options. You can choose from oil-based finishes or polyurethane finishes, also referred to as water-based. When deciding which stain to use, it is important to determine what you want your finish to accomplish. If you are looking for a warm finish with a natural glow, oil-based finishes are the way to go. They come in several different finishes, including satin, semi-gloss, and gloss. Water-based finishes don’t always have that same naturally glowing shine, but they do dry much quicker. Water-based finishes are also great at protecting hardwood floors from yellowing.
Regardless of which type of finish you choose, you must let each coat dry completely before applying the next one. If you are refinishing your own floors, default to the manufacturer’s instructions when in doubt. You can usually return your furniture to the room after about 24 hours.
As you can see, refinishing a hardwood floor is a fairly involved process. It requires you to not only know how to complete it correctly, but it also requires a great deal of skill to achieve an even and natural look.",hudsonhardwood
94,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/how-to-refinish-your-hardwood-floors/,"If you have hardwood floors that are starting to show their age, refinishing them is a great way to bring them back to their former glory. Not only does it delete scratches and other imperfections, but it also gives the floors a fresh look. The process of hardwood floor refinishing is not difficult. Still, it is important to do it correctly to achieve the best results.
Here is a guide on how to refinish your hardwood floors:
1. Sand The Floor
You will need to rent a sander from your local hardware store. Start with coarse-grit sandpaper and then move to a finer grit. Sand the entire floor, making sure to get into all corners and crevices. Once you have finished sanding, use a vacuum to clean up all of the dust. Then, wipe the floor with a damp cloth to remove any remaining dirt or debris.
2. Apply The Stain
Now it is time to apply the stain. Make sure to wear gloves and old clothes, as the stain can be difficult to remove from clothing. Apply the stain with a brush or cloth, working in small sections. Once the stain is applied, use a rag to remove any excess. Allow the stain to dry completely before moving on to the next step.
3. Apply The Polyurethane
After the stain has dried, you will need to apply a layer of polyurethane. This will protect the floor and give it a shiny finish. Apply the polyurethane with a brush, working in small sections. Once you have finished applying the polyurethane, allow it to dry completely before moving any furniture back into the room.
Professional Services Might Be Best
While it is possible to refinish your hardwood floors yourself, it is not always the best idea. If you are not experienced in this type of work, it is easy to make mistakes that can damage the floor. It is always best to hire a professional hardwood floor refinishing company. Moreover, flooring contractors are able to detect problems and offer hardwood floor restorations as well.
Get The Best Refinishing Services in Philadelphia, PA
Hudson Hardwood Floors is the premier provider of hardwood floor services in Pennsylvania. For over 20 years, we have provided our expertise to commercial and residential customers. We are dedicated to providing the highest quality hardwood floor installation, refinishing, and restoration. We stand behind our work 100%. Contact us today for a free quote.",hudsonhardwood
95,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/main-differences-hardwood-floor-refinishing-and-hardwood-floor-cleaning/,"When it comes to hardwood flooring, there are two different things that you can do to keep your floors looking new. You could refinish them, or you could clean them.
In this blog post, we’ll be discussing the main differences between hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor cleaning. We’ll also provide some tips on when you might need each of these services.
Hardwood Floor Refinishing Vs. Hardwood Floor Cleaning
Hardwood flooring refinishing is a process whereby the flooring is sanded, polished, and coated with a new finish. This is typically done every few years to keep the floors looking fresh.
Hardwood floor cleaning is also known as “buff and coat” since the process includes a deep clean and re-coat of your hardwood floors.
When to Refinish Hardwood Floors?
Most hardwood floors will need to be refinished every few years in order to keep them looking their best. However, this timeline can vary depending on the type of hardwood floors you have.
When to Clean & Re-Coat Hardwood Floors?
You can perform hardwood floor cleaning more frequently than hardwood floor refinishing. In most cases, it’s recommended that you clean and re-coat your hardwood floors every 2-3 years. However, this timeline can vary depending on the type of flooring and the amount of traffic it receives.
Characteristics Of Hardwood Floor Refinishing
- The process of hardwood floor refinishing is typically done every few years.
- Hardwood floor refinishing involves sanding down the floors and applying a new finish.
- Refinishing hardwood floors can help protect them from damage and wear and tear.
Characteristics Of Hardwood Floor Cleaning
- Hardwood floor cleaning can be done more frequently than hardwood floor refinishing.
- Cleaning hardwood floors can help remove dirt, dust, and other debris from the surface of the floors.
- Cleaning hardwood floors can help remove short-term finishes that cloud and haze.
Main Differences Between Hardwood Floor Refinishing and Hardwood Floor Cleaning
Process
Hardwood floor refinishing is when the flooring is sanded down and then refinished with a new finish. On the other hand, with hardwood floor cleaning, rather than spending a lot of money and time on a full refinishing, you may clean, inspect scratches, and re-coat your hardwood floors for a fraction of the cost and time.
Cleaning and re-coating hardwood floors is a cost-effective alternative to full refinishing that won’t waste time, money, or effort while not removing scratches or changing color.
Frequency
Most hardwood floors will need to be refinished every 7 to 10 years in order to keep them looking their best. On the other hand, you should perform hardwood floor cleaning and re-coating every 2-3 years to extend the life of your hardwood floor.
Appearance
After hardwood floor refinishing, the floors will typically look like they have just been installed. Hardwood floor cleaning helps you improve your current finish with a higher quality and more durable one.
Sometimes, you may think you need refinishing, but you only need a hardwood floor cleaning to bring your floor back to life. Your desired floor looks and appearance depend on the amount of damage your floors have. If you’re not sure which one you need, do not hesitate to ask!
Hudson Hardwood: The Best Flooring Contractors in Pennsylvania
Are you wondering, “how can I find flooring contractors near me“? If you’re looking for hardwood floor refinishing in Philadelphia or hardwood floor cleaning in Philadelphia, look no further than Hudson Hardwood.
We’re the leading provider of hardwood floors services in Pennsylvania, and we’re here to help you keep your floors looking their best. Contact us today for a free consultation!",hudsonhardwood
96,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/preparing-your-hardwood-floors-for-philadelphia-fall-winter/,"As we prepare for the low temperatures that Philadelphia is known for, many of us ensure our homes are ready. A critical part of winterizing your home is preparing your hardwood floors. Although it might seem daunting, with these tips, you can protect your flooring and keep it looking beautiful all season long.
3 Tips To Keep Your Hardwood Flooring Cozy During This Fall/Winter Season
As we all know, the Philadelphia winters and falls can be brutal. Nothing is more comforting than coming into a room with the warm look that hardwood floors bring.
However, to enjoy your hardwood floors during this weather to the fullest, it’s best to follow these tips:
Add Aesthetics & Warmth With A Rug
Rugs are aesthetically pleasing to look at and serve as insulation. They’ll help keep your feet cozy since wood can get cold with poor heating and insulation. You can find a variety of rugs to match any style and budget.
Check Your Home’s Heat Circulation
Before the cold weather hits, it’s essential to have your HVAC system checked by a professional. A functional heating system paired with hardwood flooring can provide a cozy environment for you to enjoy during the cold weather.
Protect Your Hardwood Floor From Damage
One of the best ways to keep your floors looking their best is to prevent damage from happening in the first place. You can do this by placing a shoe rack near your entryway. It’ll encourage everyone at home to take their shoes off before they bring winter salt and snow into your home.
Consider getting your hardwood floor refinishing to return it to its former condition and enjoy its beauty for years to come.
Keep Your Hardwood In TipTop Conditions With Hudson Hardwood
If you want to make sure your hardwood floors are in perfect condition for the colder months, schedule your hardwood floor restoration with Hudson Hardwood. Our services will leave your floors looking beautiful and restored from damage.
We also provide top-quality hardwood floor installation and hardwood floor refinishing in Philadelphia and the surrounding areas. So, if you’re considering installing hardwood flooring for your residence, now is the time to do it. Get in contact with us to get a free quote.",hudsonhardwood
97,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/pros-and-cons-of-oil-based-finish-for-hardwood-floors/,"Are you taking on a hardwood floor refinishing project? One of the big decisions to make before you get started is if you want to use a water-based or oil-based polyurethane finish. In researching the best options, the vital thing to keep in mind is what type of finish will be best for your specific project.
Pros of Oil-Based Polyurethane Floors
Warm finish
For people who are looking for that warm tone that wood floors can provide, you’re going to want to use oil-based polyurethane. When it dries, it gives off that warm, earthy finish that ambers overtime.
Durable
When it comes to durability, oil-based polyurethane will stand up to heavily weighted wear and tear much better than water-based polyurethane.
Fewer coats needed
Because it is thicker than water-based polyurethane, fewer coats of oil-based polyurethane are needed when refinishing hardwood floors. Oil-based polyurethane contains 45-50% solids, which are what creates the protective finish.
More affordable
On average, an oil-based hardwood floor finish is going to cost you less money to purchase. As a bonus, because you’ll need fewer coats when compared to a water-based finish, you won’t need to buy as much, which will also save you money.
Less maintenance
Because it’s much more durable than water-based polyurethane, oil-based polyurethane doesn’t have to be refinished as often. If applied correctly, an oil-based hardwood finish can last longer before needing to be redone.
Cons of Oil-Based Polyurethane Floors
Strong odor
Unfortunately, oil-based polyurethane has a strong odor when compared to water-based polyurethane. If you are sensitive to strong smells or chemicals, then an oil-based finish might irritate you.
Slow dry time
Since it’s thicker, oil-based finishes need to dry for much longer than water-based. Usually, you need to wait about 7-8 hours for oil-based finishes to dry before you can put on another coat. This means that you’ll probably need several days to get the job done and then another day on top of that to wait for it to fully dry before putting furniture on top of it.
More toxic
Oil-based polyurethane contains flammable and toxic solvents. If you’re worried about using harmful chemicals for personal or environmental reasons, then you may need to rethink using oil-based polyurethane.
Hard to clean up
If you spill or drop oil-based polyurethane, you will need a specialized solvent to clean it up. Conversely, water-based polyurethane can be cleaned up with the correct cleaner.
Oil-based polyurethane is a solid choice if you’re looking for something durable that is going to give you that warm, earthy tone that many people look for in hardwood floors. However, it’s essential to weigh all of the pros and cons outlined above to ensure an oil-based finish is the right choice for your project.",hudsonhardwood
98,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/reclaimed-flooring/,"One of the reasons I am such a fan of wood flooring is that it is the only renewable flooring option available on the market. I was shocked when I learned that hardwood floors have a service life of a hundred years and that there are floors in parts of the United States that are over 300 years old and floors in Europe that are over 700 years old! Simply put, hardwood flooring is built to last and comes from a resource that can consistently regenerate itself and continue to produce new raw flooring materials.
The fantastic thing about wood flooring is that it can be recycled, reused, or reclaimed. By reclaiming a wood floor, you can extend the service life of nearly any type of hardwood flooring. What I appreciate most about reclaimed hardwood flooring is that it has a history. A reclaimed hardwood floor’s historical significance is found in the details like where it comes from, during which time it existed, and how its unique texture, patina, and character are entirely unmatched by any other hardwood floor – it simply cannot be replicated.
Reclaimed wood is not just a hot topic or design trend, and it is a historical artifact with its own story to tell. When I began looking into reclaimed hardwood flooring, I wondered how much there was to learn about reclaimed floors. What did I need to know before starting on my journey to find one? One of the most significant pieces of information that I came across was that there are three main types of reclaimed hardwood flooring.
Post consumers recycled or antique reclaimed wood is a wood fiber or wood that was reclaimed after serving its original intended purpose. This wood has likely already served as a floor somewhere else. There is also salvaged wood, which comes from logs that have been salvaged from sources such as waterways, urban trees, or post-agricultural trees. The third and final type of reclaimed wood is pre-consumer recycled wood. This wood or wood fiber is constructed as a by-product from a secondary manufacturing process. This means that it has likely been regenerated from a previous hardwood floor to create a new one.
Besides learning about the different types of reclaimed hardwood, I was also curious about where it is sourced from. I learned that some reclaimed products are sourced from an old building and have quite the story to tell. Some of the most common species of reclaimed wood include American chestnut, maple, longleaf heart pine, oak, elm, cypress, walnut, and even Douglas fir.
It is essential to know precisely where your reclaimed hardwood is coming from, as many who have entered the industry are new and not as knowledgeable about how well-kept the floor was or if there are any potentially dangerous elements, such as lead paint, that were used on the floor. However, I have found that a responsible reclaimed flooring manufacturer knows how to correctly identify and prepare reclaimed hardwood so that you and I have minimal health risks when living with our historical floors.",hudsonhardwood
99,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/refinishing-hardwood-floors-avoid-4-mistakes/,"Are you looking to spruce up your home with DIY hardwood floor refinishing? You need to know the potential pitfalls of doing so. Refinishing your hardwood floors can be a rewarding and satisfying experience. Still, many common mistakes can lead to costly repairs down the line. This blog post will look at 4 major hardwood refinishing mistakes and how you can avoid them.
1. Not Testing for Moisture Levels Beforehand
One of the most common mistakes in hardwood refinishing is not testing for moisture levels before beginning work. Hardwood is sensitive to moisture, and if too much of it is in the air, it can cause warping over time. You’ll need a new hardwood floor installation if this happens. Before staining or varnishing, use a moisture meter on the subfloor and existing wood.
2. Skipping Over Sanding Steps
Another mistake when refinishing hardwood floors is skipping sanding steps or using the wrong sandpaper grits. This will inevitably lead to an uneven finish where some areas are smoother than others, with visible scratches left behind after staining. To ensure an even finish throughout your entire floor, go through all the stages of sanding.
3. Applying Too Much Stain or Polyurethane
Applying too much stain or polyurethane will leave your floor looking overly glossy or darken its color beyond what you originally intended. These two issues can be difficult to reverse without redoing some sections entirely. To get a better idea of how your finished product will look, always use test samples on scrap pieces of wood first.
4. Not Protecting Surroundings from Stains
Before starting any refinishing project, cover nearby walls, cabinets, and other furniture from any potential stains with plastic sheeting or drop cloths as necessary. Otherwise, you could end up causing more damage than you bargained for! It’s also important not to forget about yourself; wear protective clothing, eyewear, and masks.
Avoid All And Any Mistakes With A Pro Solution
With these four tips in mind, you should know better how best to approach your next DIY hardwood floor refinishing project! However, if all this sounds like too much hassle for you, then just remember that our team at Hudson Hardwood has the expertise needed to help you. Our hardwood floor refinishing and installation services are perfect for home and business owners in the greater Philadelphia, PA area!
Get in touch today for more information about our services!",hudsonhardwood
100,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/refinishing-hardwood-floors/,"Refinishing hardwood floors is not the long and arduous task that most people assume. No one likes having their house ripped apart for weeks at a time during their home improvement project. It is stressful and creates a lot of disruption within your home. As this is one of the most common concerns when looking to have work completed in your home, it is easy to understand why it would be a concern for homeowners looking to start a hardwood floor refinishing project.
The timeline is always the first question a homeowner has. The great news is that most professionals can have your wood floor refinishing project completed with minimal interruption to your home or business. To give homeowners an accurate idea of how involved and how long it takes to complete a project, it is essential to know what the process looks like as there are a few different factors that determine the length of a project.
These include:
- The size of the area,
- How quickly the contractor is able to work within that space
- The amount of damage to the old floor
- The contractor’s requirements, and of course,
- Your own specifications.
The two most time-consuming factors regarding your hardwood floor refinishing project are sanding and applying a polyurethane finish to the wood.
Sanding
Sanding is one of the two most labor-intensive parts of wood floor refinishing. Your contractor has to sand every square inch of the floor to ensure that the finish goes on seamlessly and evenly. Typically, a contractor can sand about 1,500 to 2,000 square feet in a single day – naturally, the larger the area, the longer the job takes. The state of your floor can also affect sanding times. For example, if you have a brand-new hardwood that is unfinished, it is much easier and less time-consuming to sand. In comparison, an older floor that has been treated in the past will take more time and effort.
Some of the things that can affect the required time needed to sand a hardwood floor properly are:
- Using Murphy’s Oil or other similar products on your floor. This causes a sticky buildup that makes it difficult for the sandpaper to exfoliate the wood effectively.
- Old polyurethane that has been applied in the past.
- Any previous repair work and patching were previously completed on the floor.
- If a hardwood floor has experienced moisture or another form of damage that has compromised the integrity of the wood. If the wood is warped, cupped, or rippled, it requires extra time to sand it down so that it is flat and even with the rest of the floor.
Polyurethane Finish
Another essential factor that can help determine the time required when refinishing hardwood floors is the polyurethane used to finish the hardwood. The drying time is what affects the length of the project and the majority of homeowners the most. The reason is that nothing, absolutely nothing, can be placed back on the hardwood until it has dried completely. Otherwise, homeowners run the risk of ruining all of the beautiful hard work that was just put into refinishing their floors.
There are two different kinds of polyurethane that contractors can use to refinish a floor – oil-based and water-based. Depending on the polyurethane that you choose to complete your project, drying times can vary a few days. Here is what homeowners need to know about each type of finish.
Oil-Based Polyurethane
Oil-based polyurethane takes longer to dry than water-based. With a dry time of about 3 days from the first to the final coat, it requires 8-10 hours of drying time in between coats. For those looking to have their floors stained, add an extra work day to the project. Weather and humidity can also play a significant role in how long it takes for the polyurethane coats to dry.
After the final coat has dried for a full 8 to 10 hours, pending weather, you and your family can walk across the floor, but only with socks – no shoes or bare feet. At a minimum, you should wait at least 12 hours before moving any furniture back into your room, and 30 days before you bring any area rugs in. This gives the floors the time they need to dry and cure properly. It is also important to try and keep your dog and their nails off the floor for about four weeks after the final coat is applied.
Water-Base Polyurethane
Water-based polyurethane typically dries quicker. Rather than taking 8 to 10 hours to dry like oil based finishes, water-based take about 2 hours each coat. This is a popular option for homes, and even more so stores and restaurants as they need to maintain their foot traffic.
If you are in a particular rush to finish your hardwood floors, water based may be the better option. The best thing to do is to have a discussion with your contractor and listen to their recommendations.
So, How Long Does It Take?
While each project can differ significantly regarding dry times, it is safe to say that your project is going to take at least a week. This doesn’t mean that a home will be completely disturbed for the entire week. However, between sanding and drying times, the length of your project depends on the size of your floor’s area. Larger floors take more time than those taking up less surface area. When talking to a contractor, be sure to discuss your concerns with your timeline, but remember that hardwood floor refinishing is a relatively quick home improvement project completed with little interruption to your home.",hudsonhardwood
101,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/should-you-refinish-your-own-floor/,"Hardwood floors just have a way of adding an elegant touch of nature to a space – everybody loves the look. Whether they’re for a kitchen, living room, or bedroom, hardwood floors have a way of elevating the area. However, if you have original flooring in an older home, it is likely that your floors are scratched, scuffed, and dinged – not exactly the look of a sophisticated floor.
Even if your house has floors that have been under the protection of carpeting for years, there is still a pretty high chance that they need some work! After years of wear and tear, refinishing a floor is usually a necessary option. While refinishing can be perceived as an expensive fix, it is a very involved process that required a great deal of skill and technique.
Refinishing a hardwood floor, in theory, is a simple process. You buy the supplies, sand the floor, apply the stain, and let it dry – if only it were that easy. It is essential to get the proper supplies for sanding the floor, including a drum sander and a belt sander. If you are going to try and tackle this project on your own, you can purchase these tools from most home improvement stores. Be warned, sanding the floor will create tiny dust particles that fly up into the air and get on everything. Anyone refinishing a floor needs to wear a mask and use drop cloths to protect furniture.
The first thing you need to do if you are refinishing your floor is learning how to properly use the sander. The key to getting even and accurate sand is to learn how to get the sander to function smoothly. While the sanders are relatively easy to learn how to use, they are incredibly loud. The most critical thing to remember is that you can’t keep the sander in one spot for too long; otherwise, you run the risk of burning or denting the floor.
After removing the old finish, it is time to apply the stain and the fresh finish. This is similar to painting your nails – first, you take off the old polish, then apply your basecoat, followed by the color, and finally the topcoat. Much like your nails, if you prefer the natural look of the floor, you can skip the stain. The finish is essential to protecting the floor.
After you’ve finished everything else and it is time to apply the finish, you ultimately have two choices. You can get an oil-based finished or a water-based finish. Oils are available in satin, gloss, or semi-gloss finishes. They bring a natural glow to the floor without giving off too much shine. Water-based finishes dry more quickly, dry clearer, and are more resistant to yellowing.
Whichever you choose, it is essential to let each coat dry before applying the next. You can follow the manufacturer’s instructions or use an instructional video. If you’d rather not worry about learning the techniques, your best option may be to hire a professional.",hudsonhardwood
102,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/the-5-advantages-of-solid-hardwood-floors/,"When it comes time to replace your flooring or remove the carpeting and try something new, solid hardwood floors are a great option to consider. Solid hardwood floor, much like the name suggests, is made of solid wood from top to bottom. It is usually made from a hardwood source like maple, walnut, or oak. While solid hardwood floors are not for everyone, there are many advantages to choosing a hardwood floor.
#1 They Contribute To Better Air Quality
Believe it or not, wood floors have an added benefit of improving the quality of the air within your home. Those who suffer from allergies, such as pollen, pet dander, and other irritants will be happy to know that solid hardwood floors don’t absorb dust and other pollutants like a carpet would. If you have trouble with allergies or are just finding that the air quality within your home isn’t optimal, it may be time to make the switch.
#2 Very Easy Maintenance
Many people are under the impression that hardwood floors are difficult to maintain, but this isn’t really the case. Caring for a solid hardwood floor in order to maintain its integrity and beauty is quite simple. All you need to do is sweep the floor to remove any dust or particles that may be laying on the surface. If you spill water or anything else on the surface, simply wipe it up with a cloth – no stain remover or blotting require here!
#3 Grow The Value Of Your Home
Solid hardwood floors receive a higher return on investment. Because they are associated with elegance, higher quality, and lasting longer than other types of flooring, they usually help a house sell fast and for more money. Hardwood floors are a feature that many potential home buyers are willing to pay more for, and this is why many homeowners choose to replace their current floors with hardwood.
#4 There Are Many Different Options
Making the choice to switch to solid hardwood floors is always an exciting process because there are so many different types of wood to choose from, and each one has their own style and spice that they can add to the room. Not only can you decide between many different shapes and types of wood, but there is always an option to choose unique plank sizes – a very effective way to add a substantial amount of character to any room or entire house. Common wood types including oak, walnut, cherry, pine, mahogany, and many others.
#5 They Are Easily Fixed
For some reason, many people are under the impression that if you break or damange your hardwood floor the process to repair it is lengthy, expensive, and even impossible at times. This
simply isn’t true. Restoring or repairing hardwood is very straightforward process. All that has to be done is replace any areas that show damage and apply a layer of fresh finish and you’re good to go!",hudsonhardwood
103,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/the-benefits-of-oil-based-polyurethanes-on-hardwood-floors/,"Oil based polyurethanes are the tried and true option for hardwood floors. They have a consistent track record of durability, giving clarity and richness to the wood floors, while being more cost-efficient as well. They are great options for residential and commercial floors. Let’s take a look at some of the benefits, and what makes oil based polyurethanes stand out as the clear choice for so many people.
Oil based polyurethane gives the “classic” look to the hardwood floors.
A classic looking wood floor never goes out of style. For the majority of hardwoods, oil based polyurethanes will give a nice “shine” to the wood, giving it the timeless look. The oil based also gets an amber hue to it the longer it cures over time, giving the wood a richer look, and will also show more detail in the wood compared to a water based polyurethane.
Oil based polyurethane lasts much longer
Oil based polyurethane is a thicker polyurethane to begin with, so it requires less coats to be applied versus water based polyurethanes, and will last significantly longer also. On average, the oil based polyurethanes last roughly twice as long as water based, and the color also ages better and gets a deeper amber color, versus fading like water based can. It is also naturally stronger once fully cured, so it is much more scratch and dent resistant than water based. This makes oil based polyurethanes a great choice for restaurants and floors with high amounts of traffic.
Oil based polyurethane requires less maintenance.
Just like how oil based polyurethanes last longer than water based, they are also less maintenance due to the organic compounds making them thicker and more durable. Oil based polyurethanes have less of a chance of cracking and chipping like water based can do over time, and they do not require potential “maintenance coats” like water based may require every two years or so. So even though the initial application time can be longer than water based, the long term payoff is more than worth it.
Oil based polyurethane is significantly cheaper.
In addition to lasting much longer than water based, oil based polyurethanes are also much cheaper. While the oil based is cheaper right off the bat, they also require around only three coats due to being a thicker base with a lot of organic compounds, versus water based which requires four to 6 coats. Oil Based Polyurethanes last twice as long as well, also saving money in the long run.
Oil based polyurethanes will always be the look we think of when “wood floors” pop into our head, so they are here to stay for years to come. Even though the “flat” look is popular right now, the shine and detail that oil based polyurethanes provide are still the most popular in the world. There will always be people who prefer the classic look, shine and durability of an oil based polyurethane, and there is no questioning why.",hudsonhardwood
104,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/the-benefits-of-water-based-polyurethanes-on-hardwood-floors/,"Water based polyurethanes have become a more popular option for hardwood floors in recent years, and for good reason. Not only are they more on trend, but they have increased dramatically in quality and benefits. There are now more reasons than ever to use a water based polyurethane, for residential and commercial uses. Let’s take a look at some of the benefits, and what makes water based polyurethanes stand out as the clear choice for so many people.
Water based polyurethane gives the “trendy” raw look to the hardwood floors.
The flat and whitewashed looks are especially popular right now. Oil based polyurethanes are not recommended for these types of woods, as they will leave a yellow tint over time as the polyurethane cures, whereas the water based polyurethane gives a nice clear color to the wood without any shine, and the color won’t fade to a yellow tint over time, as long as you are using a quality polyurethane. It is also nice to know that you can make your floors more “trendy” by just applying a different polyurethane, instead of having to replace the entire floors.
Water based polyurethane dries much faster.
On average, water based polyurethanes dry in about only 2 hours, which allows you to apply more coats in a single day. If you start your day early enough, you could apply the recommended four coats of polyurethane and be done in the same day. This is especially beneficial for restaurants or businesses with wood floors, as it will cut down on the time they have to be closed to redo the floors. Oil based polyurethanes can take anywhere from 3-5 hours per coat, and 12 hours after the last coat. So if time is an issue, water based polyurethanes are the way to go for you.
Water based polyurethane doesn’t smell as much.
If you have ever used an oil based polyurethane, you will know that the smell can almost be too much to handle. This is due largely to potentially toxic chemicals that are a part of the ingredients. Water based polyurethanes tend to have a much more mild smell, if any at all, due to not having as many volatile ingredients.
Water based polyurethane is safer.
Oil based polyurethanes are made with toxic chemicals that are also flammable. There have been records of short-term and long-term health problems as a result of exposure to the strong smells. Water based polyurethanes typically have little to no chemicals that are considered hazardous to your health.
Water based polyurethanes definitely have earned their place on hardwood floors in recent years. With their continuing increase in quality, and benefits listed above, they may soon become the more popular option for hardwood floors. There will always be people who prefer the classic look, shine and durability of an oil based polyurethane, but there is no denying that the water based is a strong contender and is here to stay.",hudsonhardwood
105,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/the-pros-and-cons-of-water-based-finish-for-hardwood-floors/,"When refinishing hardwood floors, there’s a lot of work involved. But some of the work is researching to find out what type of hardwood floor finish will work best. When you do your research, the most important thing to consider is what type of finish will be best for your specific flooring.
Pros of Water-Based Finish for Hardwood Floors
Clear finish
Water-based polyurethane provides a completely clear finish. This means that there is no amber tint that oil-based polyurethane finishes provide. Additionally, it won’t yellow over time, so if you want to make sure your hardwood floors’ color look is preserved, then a water-based finish will work do this best.
Low odor
Because of how water-based finishes are made, the odor is much less potent than if you were to use an oil-based polyurethane. Keep in mind that there is still an odor. It’s simply not as strong. If people who are sensitive to strong odors will be nearby when you’re refinishing hardwood floors, water-based is a better choice.
Dries fast
Water-based hardwood floor finishes usually dry in about two hours. This means your contractor can usually get at least two coats applied on the same day. Since it dries and cures faster than oil based, it is an excellent option for those under tight time constraints.
Environmentally friendly
Because it has a lower amount of VOCs (volatile organic compounds) than oil-based polyurethane, water-based finishes are much more environmentally friendly. As people become more concerned with the environmental impact of their choices, this can be an essential factor to consider.
Cons of Water-Based Finish for Hardwood Floors
Cost
Water-based hardwood floor finishes tend to be quite a bit more expensive than oil-based options. Additionally, you usually need an extra coat of water-based finish than you would with an oil-based finish, to handle heavier traffic.
Maintenance and Durability
Since it doesn’t last quite as long, new coats of water-based finish need to be applied more frequently than oil based. Doing this will bring back the fresh look and durability we typically look for in a hardwood floor.
Water-based polyurethane can be a great choice, depending on what your needs are. Make sure you weigh the pros and cons concerning your project to make sure it’s the right fit.",hudsonhardwood
106,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/top-4-benefits-of-solid-hardwood-flooring/,"Are you considering getting new flooring for your home? If so, you may wonder if solid hardwood flooring is the best option. Solid hardwood floors are made from a single piece of wood, making them extremely sturdy and durable. Solid hardwood is worth considering if you’re looking for an attractive, high-quality flooring option.
Here are 4 benefits of hardwood floors:
1. Solid Hardwood Floors Are Highly Durable
With proper care, a hardwood floor will last for generations, making them an ideal choice for businesses, family homes, and historic buildings. In addition to their longevity, hardwood floors are also easy to care for and repair. Minor scratches can be quickly sanded out, and you can often repair more serious damage by replacing individual boards.
2. Hardwood Floors Provide A Timeless Elegance
For centuries, hardwood floors have graced the homes of the wealthy and the nobility. Their popularity has only increased in recent years. Today, hardwood floors are prized for their classic good looks and incredible durability.
While trends come and go, the classic beauty of hardwood floors always remains in style. Solid hardwood is an excellent choice if you’re looking for a flooring option that will never go out of fashion.
3. Solid Hardwood Floors Are Easy To Care For
When it comes to cleaning and maintaining your hardwood floors, the process is quite simple. Sweeping or vacuuming regularly will remove dirt and debris, and mopping with a damp cloth will remove any remaining dirt and grime. Getting hardwood floor refinishing professionally done from time to time will also protect your floors and keep them looking great.
4. Hardwood Floors Increase The Value Of Your Home
Another great benefit of getting a hardwood floor installation is that it can increase the value of your home. If you’re planning on selling your home in the future, hardwood floors will make it more appealing to potential buyers. Due to their durability and timeless elegance, hardwood floors are a great investment.
Install The Best Hardwood Floors In Philadelphia
When it comes to Philadelphia hardwood floors, there are a couple of different options. Still, at Hudson Hardwood, we’re the best because we have more than 20 years of experience installing and refinishing hardwood floors.
We serve businesses and homes in Philadelphia with the highest-quality flooring solutions. We’d be happy to help you get the perfect hardwood flooring option for your home. Get a free quote here!",hudsonhardwood
107,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/types-of-hardwood-flooring-to-boost-your-homes-value/,"You may not realize it, but your floors are one of the most important parts of your home. They set the tone and mood for every room you step foot in, and they’re a reflection of who you are as a person. There are many types of flooring you can choose from, such as carpet or tile; however, hardwood is by far the best choice because it’s durable and easy to clean.
That’s why choosing a great quality hardwood floor is crucial. You might be wondering why it is important to choose great hardwood flooring for your home. Why not just go with the cheapest option? There are plenty of reasons, but here are some of the most important: durability, quality, and beauty.
Now that you know that hardwood floors play an important role at home, we’ll share the 4 best flooring types to increase home value.
4 Best Types Of Hardwood Flooring
Choosing the right type of hardwood flooring for your home is important. Not only does it affect how your house looks, but it can also boost its value! There are many types of hardwood floors to choose from, and they all have their pros. To help you decide on what type of hardwood flooring will be best for your home, we’ve created a list of the top 4 hardwood floors and pointed out their benefits.
Hickory
- Stronger than oak, ash, and maple.
- Long-lasting and durable
- It can put up with moisture, moisture, high traffic, and damage better than many other hardwoods
- It’s lightweight and may be dyed to any color
- It can also be waxed to improve the look of the coat and enhance moisture resistance
Oak
- There are various types of oak hardwood flooring, which means hardness varies
- It ages gracefully, developing a distinct patina
- This type of hardwood has a lot of color range from white to dark red
- Because of its hardness, it’s very resistant to damage
Ash
- When it comes to hardness, it’s similar to white oak.
- This hardwood floor is very flexible and is capable of adapting to changes in temperature and humidity
- It’s long-lasting and does not splinter.
- This hardwood floor is comfortable to walk on and is shock-absorbing
Maple
- Maple is greater than ash and white oak in terms of hardness
- Due to its lightweight texture and exposed grain design, it is a popular choice for contemporary properties
- This hardwood floor is resistant to minor damage, such as scuffs and scrapes from chair legs
Get Your Hardwood Services With Hudson Hardwood
The right flooring can add value to your home, but without the proper care, you will not be able to get full use out of it for years or even decades. If you are thinking about adding hardwood flooring to your home, you must choose the right company to do it.
We, Hudson Hardwood, provide you with the best flooring services that you can find. With our team of professionals and high-quality flooring materials, you can rest assured that your flooring will be done right.",hudsonhardwood
108,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/water-based-vs-oil-based-polyurethane-floors-a-guide/,"When refinishing hardwood floors, it is essential to understand the difference between water-based and oil-based floors. While many try to determine which is better, the truth is that it depends on your needs and overall goals. There is no hardwood floor refinishing that is better than the other, but if you choose one that does not match what you are looking for, then you may be disappointed. Keep reading to learn more about what each floor has to offer and which may be the best one for you when you plan on refinishing your hardwood floors.
Refinishing Hardwood Floors With Water-Based Polyurethane
While both water-based and oil-based floors offer a good amount of protection, the main difference is the appearance of each. Water-based polyurethane may look milky in the container but will go on clear and won’t yellow over time. If you are looking for a neutral color and tone, this may be the best option as oil-based finishes tend to give a warmer, more yellow tint.
Regarding the durability of water-based finishes, they are mostly in line with oil-based polyurethane. They resist scuffing, UV exposure, water, corrosion, and mar. If you are short on time, or do not wish to wait any longer than you have to when refinishing hardwood floors, then water-based is the best option as it takes less than half of the time to dry in relation to oil-based finishes. In addition to a shorter dry time, water-based finishes contain little to no hazardous ingredients.
Refinishing Hardwood Floors With Oil-Based Polyurethane
Oil-based finishes offer a warmer or amber hue when applied to a hardwood floor refinishing project. Keep in mind this yellow color will intensify over time, but oil-based polyurethanes will give your wood a softer feel. In terms of durability, when refinishing hardwood floors, you can expect both water- and oil-based finishes to provide the same level of protection. While oil-based finishes take more time to dry – at least a couple of days. However, it will require less maintenance over time.
If you are worried about dry times or toxic solvents, oil-based polyurethane may not be the best choice as it does contain quite a bit of exposure to highly flammable and toxic elements. These solvents allow the finish to cure into a protective film, which allows the polyurethane to better protect the wood underneath. With oil-based polyurethane, you may get a bit more bang for your buck as you will need fewer coats to achieve the same desired results as you would with multiple coats of a water-based finish.
Final Thoughts
Both finishes have their fair share of both advantages and disadvantages. What matters most is finding something that fits your needs the best. Water-based finishes are best for those who prefer a wood with a cooler or neutral finish, short wait and dry times, and doesn’t contain any hazardous or flammable solvents during application. Oil-based polyurethanes offer a warmer, amber color with a more protective finish and less maintenance after refinishing.",hudsonhardwood
109,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/what-to-expect-during-the-hardwood-floor-refinishing-process/,"Are you looking to revitalize your home or office space? Refinishing your hardwood floors can breathe new life into any space.
In this article, Joe from Hudson Hardwood will take you through the step-by-step process of refinishing hardwood floors, from the initial consultation with your flooring contractor to the final touches on your newly restored floors.
Whether you’re a homeowner or business owner in the Philadelphia area, this guide is perfect for anyone looking to refinish their hardwood floors. Get ready to transform your space with our comprehensive A-Z guide.
Meeting with your flooring contractor and creating a plan for your floors
The first step in refinishing your hardwood floors is to hire a reputable flooring contractor. Hudson Hardwood has excellent online reviews from our past customers, and we will ensure that we deliver the results you want.
Once you have chosen your contractor:
Schedule your initial consultation to discuss your vision for your floors
Ask any questions you may have and review the contractor’s credentials and experience
Discuss any repairs that need to be made and decide on a finish for your floors
During the consultation, your contractor from Hudson Hardwood will examine your hardwood floors to assess their current condition and determine the best course of action.
At this point, you and your contractor will create a detailed plan for the entire refinishing process, including a timeline for completion and a cost estimate. Once you are both satisfied with the plan, it’s time to move on to the next step in the process.
Finalizing your flooring plan with your contractor
Now that you are settled on a plan for your hardwood flooring with your contractor, it’s time to go over the details of your contract.
Things to consider:
Cost to refinish hardwood floors
Start date
Completion date
The steps to refinish hardwood floors
Details of specific issues with your planned flooring project
Any hardwood floor repairs needed
To refinish or replace hardwood floors if too damaged
Have your contractor show you photos of unique flooring parts so that you are on the same page with your plan and how the process will be going forward.
How to prepare your flooring and space for your contractor
Before refinishing your hardwood floors, your contractor will need to prepare the room adequately. Here are some hardwood floor refinishing steps they will follow:
Step 1: Clearing the Floors
Before work begins, your floors should be cleared of all furniture, rugs, and personal belongings, including items in closets. The floors must be evident for the refinishing process to proceed. *This is the only step you will potentially help with. Your contractors will take care of the following steps.
Step 2: Sealing Off Work Areas
Areas not being worked on should be sealed off from the work area with tape and plastic. This protects the rest of your property and your health during the refinishing process.
Step 3: Covering Vents
Vents should be covered with plastic and tape to protect your HVAC system from dust and debris.
Step 4: Bringing in Equipment
Sanding equipment and dust containment equipment are brought in to prepare for the refinishing process.
Preparing the room adequately for your flooring project with your contractor ensures that the refinishing process goes smoothly and that your property is protected from any damage.
Now, Hudson Hardwood is ready to get started on the sanding of your flooring.
Sanding your floor 3-4 times
Sanding is the first step in the refinishing process. It involves removing the existing finish and exposing the bare wood. There are several steps to sanding hardwood floors.
Sanding hardwood flooring is done using our specialized equipment that removes the top layer of the wood, including any scratches or dents. When sanding, we use several different levels of grit, depending on the condition of your floors.
This involves sanding a hardwood floor approximately three to four times thoroughly. This ensures a smooth surface that is ready for the next step: applying your chosen stain, dye, or finish.
During the sanding process, the floor is visually inspected by a trained hardwood specialist to ensure that all of the scratches have been removed. Final sanding uses a specialty hardwood floor sander with LED lights to highlight any remaining imperfections and remove them. This specific hardwood sander was created to create smooth, flat, even floors.
Applying stain, dye, or finish with a customized blend of colors
After sanding, the next step for finishing wooden floors is staining your hardwood flooring.
Staining
Staining (applying dye) helps to add color and depth to your wood. You can choose from various stain colors, depending on your preference. This will be planned out beforehand. Hudson Hardwood can customize colors with unique blends to match other areas of hardwood or an image you have of what you’d like in your home.
Staining is typically done using a brush, roller, or sprayer, and it’s essential to apply it evenly to achieve a consistent finish.
Finishing
Hardwood floor finishing is our final step in the refinishing process. It involves applying a protective coating to the wood to enhance its durability and protect it from future wear and tear.
You can choose from various finishes, including oil-based, water-based, and polyurethane finishes. Finishing is typically done using a brush, roller, or sprayer, and it’s essential to apply it evenly to achieve a consistent finish. We know the easiest way to refinish hardwood floors.
How long does it take to refinish hardwood floors, completely?
How long to refinish hardwood floors depends on several factors, but typically it takes about 2-3 days.
Avoiding mistakes
When floor resurfacing, it’s easy to make mistakes that can ruin the entire process. There is no easy way to refinish hardwood floors. This is why it’s important to hire professionals.
Here are some common mistakes homeowners make on their own:
Skipping the sanding process
Using the wrong grit level during sanding
Applying too much stain leads to an uneven finish
Not allowing enough drying time between coats of finish
Failing to ventilate the room adequately
Hudson Hardwood can take the heartache out of refinishing hardwood floors for beginners. We can help you to avoid making these mistakes. We will ensure that your hardwood floor refinishing process is successful and achieves your desired results.
Allowing floors to dry and cure before returning furniture and area rugs
As part of the process for refinishing hardwood floors, it’s very important to make sure that your old wood floors are given the proper amount of time to dry and cure, before moving back your furniture and rugs.
The length of your curing process depends on your unique space, as well as the types of finishes you used. We look at things like the humidity levels in your environment, your indoor temperature, and what types of airflow you have.
Hudson Hardwood will take care of this concern for you and let you know when you can settle back into your space.
Some tips:
Wait a minimum of 24-48 hours before walking on your newly finished floors
We suggest wearing socks only for a few days
We love pets, too…but we suggest that you keep pets off your floors for a few days
Your beautiful floors
Hardwood floor refinishing is an essential process that helps to restore the beauty and value of your property. If your floors are full or scratched, that’s when to refinish hardwood floors.
How to refinish old wood floors:
Whether you choose to do it yourself or hire Hudson Hardwood, it’s essential to follow the proper steps to avoid common mistakes to achieve the desired results.
By refinishing your hardwood floors with us, you can enjoy your like-new floors for years to come.
If you’re ready to take on the refinishing hardwood floors process with excellent results, contact Hudson Hardwood today to schedule an appointment. Our team of professionals will ensure that your hardwood floors are refinished to perfection, adding value and beauty to your property.
FAQ
Q: How long does hardwood floor refinishing take?
A: Hardwood floor refinishing takes an average of three to five days. However, this can vary depending on the size of the room, the extent of damage to the floors, and the type of finish used.
Q: Can you refinish engineered hardwood floors?
A: Yes, engineered hardwood floors can be refinished. If you are wondering how to refinish engineered hardwood floors, consider this: the process is more delicate than refinishing solid hardwood floors, and it’s essential to hire a professional to do it.
Q: Will refinishing my hardwood floors remove deep scratches?
A: Yes, refinishing your hardwood floors can remove deep scratches. However, the extent of damage will determine the level of sanding required. Repairing hardwood floors is always possible.
Q: How often to refinish hardwood floors?
A: This depends on your specific flooring and any damage it may or may not have, but typically we’d say every 7-10 years.
Q: How much does it cost to sand and refinish hardwood floors?
A: There are many things to consider to properly answer the question of how much to refinish hardwood floors. Reach out today and we will happily give you a consultation and free quote.",hudsonhardwood
110,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/what-to-look-for-in-a-flooring-company-in-pennsylvania/,"What To Look For In A Flooring Company In Pennsylvania
Flooring companies are a great resource to have in hand, and for this, you should pick the best. There are a couple of things to look out for to be sure you have the best choice. This will ensure the hardwood floor restoration services you get are the best. Here, we’ll discuss the signs you should look out for in a flooring company.
They Go The Extra Mile
The best flooring companies are always willing to go the extra mile for their clients. This might be about offering different services like hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor installation, or even just being available when you need them. They should be willing to answer any questions and help you out with whatever you need.
They’re Knowledgeable
One of the most important things to look for in a flooring company is knowledge. They should know what they’re talking about, from types of materials to installation processes and everything in between. If they don’t have the answers to your questions, it’s not likely that they’ll be able to provide you with the service you need.
They’re Affordable
You must find a flooring company that is both knowledgeable and affordable. You don’t want to break the bank when getting your floors done, but you also want to ensure that you’re getting quality work. There are a lot of companies out there that offer affordable services without compromising on quality – Hudson Hardwood is one of them.
They Offer Livable Conditions During Renovations
Hardwood floor restoration services can be disruptive, especially when they involve your flooring. A good flooring company will work with you to ensure the process is as smooth and painless as possible. This might mean working around your schedule or even taking care of the clean-up once the job is done.
They Are Environmentally Responsible
The best flooring companies are also environmentally responsible. They use materials that are sustainable and non-toxic, and they take measures to recycle and reduce waste. If you’re looking for a company that cares about the environment, Hudson Hardwood is a great choice.
Get The Best Flooring Services & Hardwood Floor Restorations
Hudson Hardwood is the best option in Pennsylvania when it comes to flooring companies. We offer everything mentioned above and more, so you can be sure that you’re getting the best service possible. If you need hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor installation be sure to contact us.",hudsonhardwood
111,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/which-is-better-oil-based-vs-water-based-polyurethane-floors/,"When doing hardwood floor refinishing, you might have some challenges choosing between oil and water-based polyurethane materials. Both products are suitable to refinish hardwood floors, but some differences might help you decide which product is suited for your preferred hardwood floor refinishing outcome.
Here is all the information you need to choose to decide which of our two products is better to refinish hardwood floors. It can be simple to choose, but different customers who come to us have different needs for their hardwood floor finishing. Thus it is our role to give a perfect experience.
When used to refinish hardwood floors, oil-based polyurethane gives more depth as it is shiny and looks the way we expect hardwood to look. On the other hand, water-based floors have duller colors and duller finishes.
When Wood floor finishing is done using oil-based polyurethane materials lasts longer than one done using water-based materials. On the other hand, water-based polyurethane has less VOC’s which is more friendly to the environment.
If you choose to use water-based polyurethane for refinishing hardwood floors, remember that you will require four to five coats to match the durability of three coats of oil-based polyurethane. This is because water-based polyurethane is thinner.
We have also noted that most customers who call us for refinishing hardwood floors call again after five to six years in cases of water-based polyurethane and around ten years for oil-based polyurethane. The water-based wood floor refinishing looks terrible; actually, they have started peeling, and the hardwood floor is turning grey.
Always bear in mind that refinishing your hardwood floor might be a bit cumbersome, especially if you live there because you need to move all your furniture and you might need to move away for some days. Thus if you decide you are going through the hassle of refinishing your hardwood floor, do it right for more durability.
Refinishing your hardwood floors using water-based polyurethane will be more expensive compared to oil-based polyurethane. On top of that cost, remember you will be required to redo it again sooner.
Water-based is also an excellent option for others for some circumstances. Wood floor finishing done using water-based polyurethane dries faster. It can be done in two days, and you can walk on the same night. This advantage is ideal, especially for commercial businesses such as hotels, restaurants, and stores.
Furthermore, water-based polyurethane doesn’t smell bad compared to oil-based polyurethane that your neighbors won’t be uncomfortable with water-based polyurethane. Water-based polyurethane also has less volatile organic compounds; thus, it is more environmentally friendly. Oil-based polyurethane has more volatile organic compounds; therefore, it is likely to interfere with the ecosystem.
However, from another perspective, hardwood floor finishing done using water-based polyurethane doesn’t last long. Thus the need to redo them more often means they will still emit more volatile organic compounds, thus canceling their benefit.
I hope you won’t be stuck again when choosing which polyurethane is better for your circumstances; with the above info, I bet you will make a perfect decision.",hudsonhardwood
112,https://hudsonhardwood.com/blog/why-leave-hardwood-floor-installation-to-pros/,"Installing hardwood flooring in your home can be one of the most rewarding and satisfying projects. It can completely transform a space in terms of beauty and value – with minimal effort! However, it always pays to leave hardwood floor installation to the pros.
Here’s why investing in professional hardwood floor installation services is worth it!
Avoid A Time-Consuming Process
Hardwood floor installation is a time-consuming process. It requires precise measurements and cutting boards at precise angles and often involves removing existing floors or subflooring. In addition to being time-consuming, it also requires special tools that may not be available for rent or that you may not have access to otherwise.
Unless you have the tools needed to install a hardwood floor, you won’t be able to begin DIYing this task. Professionals are experienced in installing hardwood floors in no time. They have the tools needed to do the job right. Professionals can also help you with hardwood flooring refinishing solutions.
Protect Your Home And Wallet
Mistakes during hardwood floor installation can be costly and difficult (and sometimes impossible) to fix. Even if you have experience working with wood, unforeseen issues may arise. Warping boards due to improper acclimation and uneven seams due to a lack of experience with cutting joints are just two mistakes that can happen during hardwood floor installation.
There is simply no substitute for professional-quality results when installing hardwood floors. Professionals deliver high-quality installation services that are protected by warranties. With a professional installation service, you’ll get the best results for your home! You can also get a free quote upfront without any surprises later.
Improve Your Property With A Professional Hardwood Floor Installation in Philadelphia, PA.
At Hudson Hardwood, we understand that DIY projects can be tempting, but we strongly recommend leaving this job up to our professionals. We have over 20 years of experience providing Philadelphia, PA homes and businesses with professional hardwood floor refinishing and installation services. You can rest assured that your project will be completed quickly, efficiently, and, most importantly – correctly!
Contact us today for more information about our services!",hudsonhardwood
113,https://hudsonhardwood.com/contact-us/,"We’d love to hear from you. If you’d like a quote, please fill out our Free Quote form. If you need to reach us for any other reason, please contact us at (215) 694-7296.",hudsonhardwood
114,https://hudsonhardwood.com/employment-join-the-team/,"Position available for a hardwood floor refinisher and installer.
40 hours minimum per week.
Requirements:
- Minimum 5 years experience in floor refinishing.
- Must know how to edge with zero scratches, scrape risers and ability to roll or t bar water and oil finish in a timely manner.
- Must have a reliable vehicle.
- Must have a clean and valid drivers license – will be verified with DMV.
- Drug testing.
Pay based upon experience.
Subcontractors wanted.
Minimum ten years experience in installation and refinishing of floors and steps. Must be able to roll and t bar finishes.
Subcontractors are required to wear, provided, Hudson Hardwood shirts. Job quality and apparel will be randomly checked on.
You must have dust containment on all edgers and buffers. Areas not being worked on must be covered with a plastic barrier.
On staining jobs, subcontractor will provide three samples with finish that the client will choose from, allowing the client to see the final look.",hudsonhardwood
115,https://hudsonhardwood.com/employment-join-the-team/application-for-employment/,"Name* First Last Address* Street Address Address Line 2 City AlabamaAlaskaAmerican SamoaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaGuamHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaNorthern Mariana IslandsOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaPuerto RicoRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahU.S. Virgin IslandsVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyomingArmed Forces AmericasArmed Forces EuropeArmed Forces Pacific State ZIP Code Email* Phone*Years experience in floor refinishing*012345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031323334353637383940Do you know how to edge with zero scratches?* Yes No Do you know how to scrape risers?* Yes No Do you have the ability to roll or T-bar water and oil finish in a timely manner?* Yes No Do you have a reliable vehicle?* Yes No Do you have a clean and valid drivers license?* Yes No Are you available 40 hours minimum per week?* Yes No Tell us about your previous employment.*Do you have photos or examples of your work to share? Drop files here or Select files Accepted file types: jpg, jpeg, png, gif, Max. file size: 128 MB, Max. files: 10. Please upload up to 10 photos. Accepted file formats: jpg, png, or gif.",hudsonhardwood
116,https://hudsonhardwood.com/employment-join-the-team/subcontractor-application/,"-
Please provide:
Please upload a copy of your insurance. Accepted file formats: jpg, gif, png, pdf.
Accepted file types: jpg, gif, png, pdf, jpeg, Max. file size: 16 MB.
Please upload up to 10 photos. Accepted file formats: jpg, png, or gif.
Accepted file types: jpg, jpeg, png, gif, Max. file size: 128 MB, Max. files: 10.
Drop files here or
- Please provide three references:
Please upload a copy of your resume. Accepted file formats: jpg, gif, png, pdf.
Accepted file types: jpg, gif, png, pdf, jpeg, Max. file size: 16 MB.
This field is for validation purposes and should be left unchanged.",hudsonhardwood
117,https://hudsonhardwood.com/flooring-services-bucks-county-pa/,"Bucks County, PA
Bucks County, Pennsylvania, is located in the southeast part of the state. It is the fourth most highly populated county in Pennsylvania. Doylestown is the county seat. The county is part of what is known as the Delaware Valley, a group of towns and cities in the Philadelphia, Camden, and Wilmington Metropolitan Statistical Area.
Bucks County makes up some of the border of Philadelphia and New Jersey.
History of Bucks County
Bucks County, created by William Penn in 1682, is named after Buckinghamshire where he once lived in England. Penn had a country estate called Pennsbury Manor in Bucks County.
The county initially covered a larger area than it does today. Northampton County and Leigh County were later formed from parts of Bucks County. Covering approximately 622 square miles, Bucks County is adjacent to Lehigh, Northampton, Warren County (NJ), Philadelphia, and Montgomery counties.
Industry in Bucks County
Bucks County is a combination of the beautiful countryside combined with pockets of industry and growth. The area has seen growth in the biotechnology industry and biopharma. Top businesses that call Bucks County home include 21st Century Media, eGames, Inc., Lehigh Defense, Rita’s Italian Ice, and Windowizards.
Recreation in Bucks County
Popular destinations in Bucks County are New Hope, Peddler’s Village, Washington Crossing Historic Park, and the New Hope Railroad.
The area is home to many parks and recreation areas for residents to enjoy. These include six state-owned parks – Delaware Canal State Park, Tyler State Park, Ralph Stover State Park, Nockamixon State Park, and Neshaminy State Park.
Education in Bucks County
Bucks County is home to the following colleges and universities:
- Strayer University
- Delaware Valley University
- Bucks County Community College
- Cairn University
- Holy Family University
- Lasalle University
Public school districts in Bucks County include:
- Bensalem Township School District
- Bristol Borough School District
- Bristol Township School District
- Centennial School District
- Central Bucks School District
- Council Rock School District
- Morrisville Borough School District
- Neshaminy School District
- New Hope-Solebury School District
- Palisades School District
- Pennridge School District
- Pennsbury School District
- Quakertown Community School District
- Souderton Area School District (also in Montgomery County)
Bucks County Today
The population of Bucks County is just over 628,000, with a median age of 44 years old. The household income averages nearly $89,000.
Hardwood Flooring in Bucks County
Bucks County is a historic area with beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods mixed with industry and newer construction. From older homes to new construction, residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase home values. Trust Hudson Hardwood’s experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Bucks County homes.
Hudson Hardwood
We take great pride in being reliable and finishing on time and within budget. Hudson Hardwood’s services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We utilize a dustless sanding technique that significantly reduces the mess caused by traditional sanding methods. Without too many disruptions to your daily schedule, we can refinish and restore your hardwood floors.
Our Projects
Please look through our past projects and see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our customers. We’d be happy to do the same for your hardwood floors!
Hudson Hardwood Free Quotes
If you are a resident of Bucks County who is thinking of refinishing hardwood floors or installing new hardwood floors, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. It would be our pleasure to provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
118,https://hudsonhardwood.com/flooring-services-chester-county-pa/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Chester County, PA
Are you tired of constantly looking at old and dingy floors in your home? Well, it is time to consider getting some new hardwood flooring. There are many different ways to go about this sort of project, but the best way is to contact Hudson Hardwood in Chester County, PA. We’ll give you the best hardwood floor refinishing in Chester County, PA.
Proud To Serve Chester, PA
Chester County is home to parts of Valley Forge National Historical Park. The Park played an important role in the American Revolution and is where George Washington stayed with his troops. The Brandywine Battlefield also took place in Chester County. Valley Forge Park is a national protected area.
Hardwood Flooring in Chester County
Chester County is a historic area with beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods mixed with a boom in construction and new houses. From older homes to the latest construction, residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home.
High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase the value of a home. You can trust Hudson Hardwood’s experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Chester County homes. We can ensure you’ll get the best hardwood floor installation in Chester County, PA.
Hudson Hardwood
We take pride in being reliable, and we finish on time and within the budget. Hudson Hardwood’s services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We utilize a dustless sanding technique that significantly reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home. Without significant disruptions to your daily schedule, we can refinish and restore your hardwood floors.
When you look at our projects, you’ll see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our customers. We’re a great asset to raise the curb appeal of your home. We’d be happy to do the same for your hardwood floors!
Get A Hudson Hardwood Free Quote
If you are thinking of getting wood floor refinishing in Chester County, PA or installing new hardwood floors, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. When it comes to dealing with floors, we’re the best. If you are ready to upgrade your home’s interior, give us a call today. We’ll help get started creating something beautiful for your Chester County home!",hudsonhardwood
119,https://hudsonhardwood.com/flooring-services-montgomery-county-pa/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Montgomery County, PA
Welcome to Hudson Hardwood, a business dedicated to hardwood flooring services in Montgomery County, PA. We are your local business serving the area for over 30 years. Hudson Hardwood offers a wide variety of services, including hardwood floor installation, repair, and refinishing. Get the best wood floor refinishing in Montgomery County, PA with us today!
Proud To Serve Montgomery
Montgomery County, Pennsylvania, is a geographically diverse area located northwest of Philadelphia. The terrain ranges from farms and open-lands in the north to dense suburban neighborhoods in the south. Montgomery County has been named a great place to raise a family with good school districts, shopping, and recreational areas, and lower crime rates.
Hardwood Flooring in Montgomery County
Montgomery County is a historic area with a diverse infrastructure from beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods to modern homes and businesses. Residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase the value of a home.
Such a historic place needs a good hardwood flooring contractor to cover its needs. At Hudson Hardwood, we’re proud to be that reliable option. You can trust Hudson Hardwood’s experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Montgomery County homes. We also offer hardwood floor refinishing in Montgomery County, PA.
Hardwood Flooring in Montgomery County
Montgomery County is a historic area with everything from beautiful old homes and well-established neighborhoods to modern homes and businesses. Residents understand and appreciate the craftsmanship and durability that hardwood floors bring to a home. High-end finishes like hardwood floors almost always increase the value of a home. Trust Hudson Hardwood’s experience and knowledge to restore and refinish old hardwood floors or install new, modern hardwood floors in Montgomery County homes.
Hudson Hardwood
Hudson Hardwood is reliable, and we finish projects on time and within the budget. Our services include hardwood floor refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. We employ a dustless sanding technique that significantly reduces the mess caused by sanding inside your home. We can refinish and restore your hardwood floors without significant disruptions to your daily schedule.
If you look through our projects, you’ll see the exceptional upgrades and improvements we have achieved for our customers yourself. We’d be happy to do the same for your hardwood floors! Our standard of excellence will guide our team toward giving you the best hardwood service you need.
Get A Free Quote
If you are a resident of Montgomery County who is thinking of refinishing hardwood floors or new hardwood flooring installation in Montgomery County, PA, please contact Hudson Hardwood today. We’re experts in offering top-notch hardwood services. We also offer a wide selection of hardwood floors, including solid wood and engineered wood. We’ll gladly provide you with a Free Quote.",hudsonhardwood
120,https://hudsonhardwood.com/flooring-services-philadelphia-pa/,"Hardwood Flooring Services in Philadelphia, PA
Major corporations like Comcast, Aramark, and Urban Outfitters call Philadelphia home. Hudson Hardwood also calls Philadelphia home. We have been installing and refinishing hardwood floors in residential and commercial properties located all around Philadelphia. Whether the wood floors need refinishing, or a completely new installation, Hudson Hardwood can help.
Our team of expert craftsmen can bring old floors back to life and preserve the old world charm and historical details in many homes and businesses in Philadelphia. Our services include refinishing, installing, cleaning, recoating, and restoring. Our team is reliable, and we’ll get the job done on time and with the least amount of interruption to your home or business. We use dustless sanding and environmentally friendly products to minimize unhealthy air quality.
Hear what Andrew R. from the Brewerytown section of Philadelphia had to say about work we did for him:
“I used Hudson Hardwood to refinish about 1200 square feet or original pine floors and a staircase in my 100-year-old home in Brewerytown. The floors turned out great and the crew was easy to work with. The quality and service offered by Hudson is as high as any contractor I’ve ever worked with, which says something as I’ve been working as a General Contractror for over eight years. I would highly recommend Hudson Hardwood for any wood flooring work you have, especially refinishing of old flooring. They know their stuff!”
What We Offer:
We offer reliable service and daily job updates, the optional service of moving your furniture, environmentally friendly products, dustless sanding, and 20+ years’ experience.
Contact us today to see why many individuals love Hudson Hardwood floors in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. Consequently, you will be glad you invested your time with Hudson hardwood floors.
We proudly offer our flooring services in these Philadelphia, PA boroughs:
Center City, South Philadelphia, Southwest Philadelphia, West Philadelphia, Lower North Philadelphia, Upper North Philadelphia, Bridesburg, Kensington, Richmond, Roxborough, Manayunk, Germantown, Chestnut Hill, Olney, Oak Lane, and Northeast Philadelphia
Fun Facts About Philadelphia, PA
Philadelphia is the largest city in Pennsylvania and the 6th largest city in the United States with a population of nearly 1.6 million. The city acts as the economic and cultural center of the Delaware Valley, an area loosely defined by the Delaware and Schuylkill rivers.
Originally inhabited by Lenape Indians, then later settled and fought over by the Dutch and the Swedes, Philadelphia eventually came into the hands of William Penn. In 1682 it was charted to him by the king to pay a debt. Penn felt the right thing to do was to pay the Lenape Indians for their land. This act went a long way in keeping peace with them and contributing to the growth of the city.
Philadelphia was one of the first 13 colonies and is home to Independence Hall where both the Declaration of Independence and the U.S. Constitution were written. It played an important role during the Revolutionary War and is home to the first congressional congress, the Liberty Bell, and the Battle of Germantown.
A prominent citizen, Ben Franklin, helped develop many new programs in the city which made Philadelphia a better place to live. This included a fire company, library, and hospital. Philadelphia was also home to the first medical school, stock exchange, zoo, and business school.
In 1776 the Declaration of Independence was signed in Philadelphia and the city continued to grow as a cultural hub with the creation of scholarly institutions like the Academy of Natural Sciences, Franklin Institute, and the Philadelphia Society for Promoting Agriculture.
Philadelphia’s central location close to New York, Washington D.C, New Jersey, Delaware, Maryland, and other states, made it an easily accessible place by land, sea, and river. The city’s population quickly grew with an influx of German and Irish immigrants.
During the 19th century, railroads made Philadelphia a desirable location for many industries, textiles being the most prominent. Major corporations flocked to Philadelphia where the Pennsylvania Railroad provided easy access to transportation.
Between approximately 1940 – 1980 there was a mass exodus from the city. Racial unrest and riots led people to escape to the suburbs and businesses moved elsewhere. It was not until 2007 that the city saw its population finally begin to increase to the almost 1.6 million it is today. The rebuilding of historic areas like Center City, Old City, University City has been bringing residents back.
Today, Philadelphia is home to many prestigious universities and colleges – Temple University and Drexel University being among them. Residents enjoy a wide variety of cultural and outdoor destinations including Fairmount Park, The Philadelphia Museum of Art, Independence National Historical Park, Reading Terminal Market, Elfreth’s Alley, and many more.
Philadelphia is home to major sports teams and arenas including Citizen’s Bank Park, Lincoln Financial Field, and the Wells Fargo Center. The area’s transportation infrastructure includes SEPTA Regional Rail and Philadelphia International Airport.",hudsonhardwood
121,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwoo-flooring-contractor-pottstown-pa/,"Hardwood Flooring Contractor In Pottstown, PA
If you’re a homeowner, you have most likely thought about making some renovations to your home. Many homeowners do renovations to increase property value or create a more conducive space for living and entertaining. Which reason resonates with you?
Whatever reason you choose, renovations are crucial for homeowners to make their houses look stunning and feel at ease when they get home from work.
If you’re looking to do renovations but don’t know where to start, flooring is a great place to start! At Hudson Hardwood, we’re professionals at hardwood flooring renovation in Pottstown, PA. Our 20+ years of experience make us the right choice to make your house look amazing again! If you want to find out more about our services, don’t hesitate to contact us!
Learn How We Can Help You
At Hudson Hardwood Flooring, we want to help our customers to transform their houses by giving their floors a makeover. That’s why we help them with hardwood flooring renovations in Pottstown, PA. We know that every home has different needs and styles. That’s why we provide many services to make your house renovation project stress-free!
If you want to renovate your home, this is how we can help you:
- Refinishing: Bring back the new look of your old floors with our refinishing services. This service is recommended for floors that are not severely damaged.
- Installing: This service will help you get rid of your old flooring and replace it with a new hardwood floor. We offer different colors and styles to match your home style:
- Cleaning: This service will clean your hardwood floors so they can look like new again.
- Re-coating: This is a good option for worn-out, dull, and damaged flooring surfaces because it provides them with a protective coating to prevent future damages.
- Restoring: Fix the damage on your wooden floors by restoring their natural beauty without changing your floor.
Make Your Renovations With Professionals
If your flooring needs an update or change of style, Hudson Hardwood is the best choice! With our wide array of options, you’ll find what you’re looking for! You can trust we’ve been certified by the NWFA since 2008. So, if you want to do hardwood flooring renovations in Pottstown, PA, don’t hesitate to contact us to get a quote!",hudsonhardwood
122,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwood-floor-installers-pottstown-pa/,"Hardwood Floor Installers In Pottstown, PA
We understand that all homeowners want to make their houses look stunning with high-quality, easy to maintain, and durable materials. One crucial thing is the flooring since it lets you move around your house. Hardwood floors are beautiful and elegant. They provide a classy look that will never go out of style.
So, do you need to make some renovations to your home? Do you need hardwood floor installers in Pottstown, PA? If you’re looking for someone that can help you with hardwood floor installation for your home, then Hudson Hardwood is the right place to call. We offer full-service hardwood floor installation that is tailored to your needs.
Why It’s Important To Have Professional Flooring Installers
You might wonder, why is it important to hire professional flooring installers? Well, homeowners can do hardwood flooring installation themselves, but there are some risks involved, such as cracks, dents, and scratches, which will make your floor lose that new and amazing look.
Also, if you hire unprofessional, not certified roof installers, things can go wrong pretty quickly. You might want to hire unprofessional floor installers because you might think you’ll save some money, but it might be more expensive in the long run since you might have to do some repairs.
Professional hardwood floor installers in Pottstown, PA, are experienced enough to do the job correctly so that your hardwood floor looks great for years to come! You can have peace of mind knowing that there will be no damage done by hiring professionals. Also, you don’t need to worry about durability or appearance since they know what to do to make it look good for longer!
We recommend going with professional hardwood floor installers in Pottstown, PA, like us, Hudson Hardwood. We have 20+ years of experience, and we’re certified by the National Wood Flooring Association (NWFA), so we know what we’re doing.
Let Your Roof Installation To Hudson Hardwood
At Hudson Hardwood, we’re certified hardwood floor installers in Pottstown, PA. Our team has years of experience working with different materials, and we know how important your decision is when choosing the right company to do this job for you! With our tools and knowledge, we can make your floor look incredible!",hudsonhardwood
123,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwood-floor-restoration-for-older-floors/,"Hardwood Floor Restoration For Older Floors
Hardwood flooring is meant to last, but it requires maintenance to keep it in good shape. At Hudson Hardwood, we’re experts in hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood floor repairs for older floors. Restore and preserve the floors of historic buildings with our flooring services. Give them new life and bring them back to their best look.
Restoring Historic Flooring
Historic homes, buildings, and landmarks across Pennsylvania have beautiful hardwood floors that require maintenance and renovation from time to time. At Hudson Hardwood, we specialize in restoring, maintaining, and preserving these kinds of historical pieces and other custom projects. We also offer to replace wood floors for old floors and houses or commercial buildings.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer hardwood flooring services to restore, preserve, and maintain the beauty of your floors. Our professional refinishing treats your floors with care so that weather elements will not affect them. Keep your historic building’s hardwood floors will remain beautiful and intact for many more generations.
Hardwood Floor Refinishing For Older Floors
If done without proper knowledge, remodeling attempts can permanently damage hardwood floorings. That’s why it’s best to contact professionals like our expert team at Hudson Hardwood. We provide refinishing services for historic hardwood floorings. Our refinishing will protect the hardwood and make it shine like the beautiful piece of craftsmanship it is.
Refinishing a historic building’s hardwood floors leaves the floor in much better shape. Our experts in refinishing and restoring hardwood floors are ready to handle these projects. They provide the best hardwood flooring services to preserve your flooring.
Best Hardwood Services In Pennsylvania
At Hudson Hardwood, we are experts in refinishing hardwood floorings to restore them to their former glory. Our professional team is adequately trained to preserve beautiful pieces of craftsmanship by applying the proper techniques when restoring these types of historic building pieces.
We understand how important it is for you to keep hardwood flooring looking good so that next generations can enjoy them. This is why we have an expert team who knows exactly how to treat unique pieces so they’ll remain intact and beautiful for years to come.
Historic Flooring Restoration and Maintenance Services
Contact our experienced team at Hudson Hardwood today if you have a historic building! We offer all kinds of services in what concerns hardwood flooring. Our excellent refinishing skills will make an old piece shine again, bringing back its beauty and making it look new.
Give your historic flooring a new life with our professional refinishing services. We can handle all kinds of wooden floors, including hardwood floors in houses, buildings, and monuments across the state.",hudsonhardwood
124,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwood-flooring-company-in-philadelphia/,"If you’re thinking about upgrading your floor in the Philadelphia metro area, your best option is Hudson Hardwood.
With more than 20 years of experience serving residential and commercial clients, Hudson Hardwood is a hardwood flooring company in Philadelphia committed to providing the highest quality service to its clients.
Our Experience
Hudson Hardwood is a 20-year experienced company in Hardwood flooring. Best known for delivering the best services in the industry for both residential and commercial projects. We are dedicated to bringing your commercial and residential spaces the desired appeal with our work.
Services We Offer
As we have been serving both residential and commercial properties, our experienced team specializes in:
- Refinishing
You can restore your hardwood floors to their original color or a new one by refinishing them.
- Installation
Installation is the most exciting part of the process as you can choose your wood floor species and color for that new fresh look.
- Cleaning & Recoating
For a cost-effective process, cleaning and recoating is the best option for your hardwood floors to increase your home’s value instead of a full refinishing.
- Restoration Services
If you don’t need to replace your floor to bring it to life, this restoring service can help you make your old damaged floor look brand new.
- Stairs
We offer refinishing and installation services for your stairs, you will have access to them during your renovation.
- Commercial hardwood flooring services
Here at Hudson Hardwood, with our experienced team, we help Philadelphia business owners improve their commercial properties’ appearance and durability on a budget and adjust our work to their schedule.
Why Us?
We are an experienced hardwood flooring company in Philadelphia. We offer reliable services with daily updated communication about the process of the project. We offer livable conditions during the renovation. We offer environmentally friendly products and use Dustless sanding techniques to maintain indoor air quality and reduce the mess while doing our work.",hudsonhardwood
125,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwood-flooring-contractor-in-philadelphia/,"Whether you’re looking for residential or commercial hardwood floor contractors in Philadelphia, Hudson Hardwood is the ideal choice for your next flooring project. With more than 20 years of experience providing the best services for property owners, they will ensure a high-quality project with daily updates about the process.
Hudson Hardwood has worked with many Philadelphia business owners and homeowners to help them improve their floors with a new look and durability, within budget and on schedule, This way even their businesses can be still running during the process.
Looking for the most committed contractors in Philadelphia? Get to know Hudson hardwood!
Hardwood flooring services
We serve residential and commercial properties, ensuring the best possible results and experience.
Residential / Commercial hardwood flooring services:
- Refinishing:
With our refinishing service, you can restore your hardwood floors to their original beauty and select the stain and sheen of your choice.
- Installation:
During the installation process, you will be able to choose your preferred stain, sheen and wood species for that desired look.
- Cleaning and Recoating:
Cleaning and Recoating is a more cost-effective process than refinishing, and it also will increase your property’s value.
- Stairs:
At Hudson Hardwood, we provide refinishing and installation services for stairs offering access to them during the renovation process.
- Restoration:
If you’re thinking about bringing your old floor to life without having to replace your old floor, this restoration service would be the ideal solution.
Commercial properties we have served.
At Hudson Hardwood, we have worked with almost any kind of commercial property such as:
- Hotels
- Restaurants
- Old Buildings
- Schools
- Offices
- Breweries
- Gymnasium and Racquet Ball Courts
Why Hudson Hardwood is the best choice for your next hardwood flooring project
With more than 20 years of experience serving residential and commercial properties in Philadelphia, we know how to get the job done right here at Hudson Hardwood. We offer a reliable service, adjust to your family or business schedule, livable conditions during the process, and use high-quality materials.",hudsonhardwood
126,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwood-flooring-experts-in-philadelphia-pa/,"Hardwood Flooring Services That Will Simplify Your Life
Residential and commercial property owners often tend to ignore issues and postpone fixing them. However, not giving the proper importance to those damaged areas of your home or business can result in major problems. For those cases where the structural integrity of your floors are damaged, it is recommended to have a hardwood flooring expert on hand.
As the visual foundation of your home or business, floors need to be in optimal condition. An expert with experience in flooring services like flooring inspection, flooring repair, flooring installation, and flooring restoration can restore your floors back to their original beauty
Hudson Hardwood has the flooring experts that your home and business need. We are hardwood flooring experts in Philadelphia, PA, always ready to provide solutions for your flooring needs.
Discover What Makes Us Hardwood Flooring Experts
We understand that trust is something that must be earned, and our team of flooring experts are ready and willing to come to your home or business and provide you with customized flooring services. These are some of the reasons why our clients consider us the best hardwood flooring experts in the Philadelphia area.
- Knowledge
You might be wondering how you can measure the knowledge of flooring companies. Well, there is one way. The National Wood Flooring Association (NWFA) sets the flooring industry technical standards.
Hudson Hardwood has proudly been part of the NWFA since 2008.
- Experience
We all know that experience is something you get after years and years in the business. A company with less than 10 years of experience might not have all the answers and reliable solutions you expect. If you want excellent service, you should look for companies with more experience. Hudson Hardwood has 20+ years of experience in the field, making us a well-known and professional hardwood flooring company.
Hudson Hardwood Is Your Solution!
Our team includes professionals who know how to deal with every flooring service you might need. Whether you require refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, or restoring hardwood floors and stairs, our hardwood flooring experts can handle everything. Get in touch with us for a Free Estimate!",hudsonhardwood
127,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwood-flooring-installation-for-restaurants/,"Hardwood Flooring Installation For Restaurants
Hardwood flooring is a great addition to a restaurant. It adds timeless elegance and classic appeal to your business. At Hudson Hardwood, we offer the best hardwood floor installation service in Pennsylvania. Our installation services are highly convenient. Discover why ours is the best hardwood floor installation “near me”.
Overnight Installation
Hudson Hardwood offers overnight wood floor installation. This means that you can have your flooring done without disrupting your business. Our work does not interfere with your schedule or operating hours, so you can continue your daily routine at your restaurant while we do the dirty work at night.
This procedure will minimize installation time and guarantee the safety of your staff and business. Hudson Hardwood offers the best and friendliest services. We guarantee that you won’t find a better hardwood floor for restaurants anywhere in PA. Discover here some of the many benefits of getting hardwood flooring installation for your restaurant with us.
Durability And Cleanliness
Hardwood floors are better suited for commercial restaurant flooring than other flooring options. They are more durable than carpet and laminate. This makes it a better choice for restaurant owners that want the best possible longevity for their investment. With Hudson Hardwood, you can get a flooring option that will last a lifetime.
Hardwood floorings are also cleaner than other types of flooring for restaurants and are easy to maintain. When it comes to protecting your restaurant from the elements, hardwood flooring is an excellent solution because of its resistance to water and oil stains. Hardwood also provides benefits such as heat retention saving on heating costs.
Detail Oriented Installation
Hardwood is a highly durable material, and at Hudson Hardwood, we work with the best providers. With us, you’ll get the best hardwood floors. To increase its durability and cleanliness, at Hudson Hardwood, we also work with dust containment and green finishes to keep the air quality of your business clean and enjoyable.
Hardwood floorings are the best flooring for restaurants since they create a rich and cozy atmosphere for relaxation and leisure. Additionally, multiple colors are available that will seamlessly match into any décor theme. The wide variety of designs allows you individualized tailoring according to what works best for various restaurants’ locations and atmospheres.
Hardwood Floorings For Your Restaurant
Hudson Hardwood Flooring has provided Pennsylvania with the best hardwood floor installation services for over 20 years. We offer professional hardwood floor installation ”near me” to meet your restaurant’s demands. Our overnight wood floor installation for restaurants is ideal to guarantee your business’ operations will suffer no delays. At Hudson Hardwood, we accommodate our clients’ needs!",hudsonhardwood
128,https://hudsonhardwood.com/hardwood-stairs-services-that-can-change-your-home/,"Stairs are one of the most important features in any home. When you walk into your home, the first thing that grabs your attention is the staircase. It’s the focal point of any room, and it can make a statement about who lives there. Stairs can make a small space feel larger, or they can create an entrance to your house that is both elegant and stylish.
Stairs come in many different shapes, sizes, and materials, so it’s important to find the best ones that suit your needs. Hudson Hardwood is the best option when it comes to hardwood stairs!
We’re a flooring company that can assist you in making the best decisions for your home, from installing new hardwood stairs to finding more cost-effective options for refinishing your current stairs. Contact us to get our help!
4 Most Popular Types Of Stairs
1 – Straight Stairs
Straight stairs are the most common type of stairs. They’re simple and easy to build, making them a popular choice for homes and businesses. Some of their benefits are:
- They’re easy to go up and down
- No intermediate supporting structure is needed
- They look great in minimalist homes
2 – L-Shaped Stairs
L-shaped steps are a variant of straight stairs with a bend in some areas. This bend is generally achieved by adding a landing at the transition point. Some of their benefits are:
- They’re perfect for small spaces
- They’re visually more interesting
- The landing point provides a place to remain at while ascending or descending
3- U-Shaped Stairs
U-shaped stairs comprise two parallel flights of straight stairs connected by a landing, making the walk line a full 180 degrees. Some of their benefits are:
- They’re easy to include in an architectural plan
- The landing space offers a resting point
- They’re naturally captivating
4 – Winder Stairs
Winder stairs are a sort of L-shaped stair with pie-shaped or triangular steps at the corner transition rather than a flat landing. Some of their benefits are:
- It requires less space than other types of stairs
- They create a seamless transition, making it more interesting than other stair types
Improve Your Home’s Appearance By Installing New Stairs
If you’re looking to improve your home’s appearance, installing new stairs is a great way to do it. Hudson Hardwood can help you choose the best type of hardwood stairs for your home. With our stair installation and hardwood flooring services, your stairs will look great and last for years.",hudsonhardwood
129,https://hudsonhardwood.com/joe/,Joe Hudson Hudson Hardwood Floors (215) 694-7296 Visit our Project Gallery Member,hudsonhardwood
130,https://hudsonhardwood.com/making-your-home-look-astonishingly-fresh-new/,"Renovations can be a great solution to make your house look and feel brand new. Whether you just bought an old home and want to renovate it, so it looks stunning, or you want to increase your home’s value so you can sell it later on, renovations will help.
If you don’t know what type of renovations you can do to your home to make it come back to life, Hudson Hardwood can help you! We’ve provided homeowners with various upgrade options that make their homes look amazing.
Get To Know Our Services
Floor & Stair Installation
For several years, we’ve been providing flooring services and stair installations. We have a wide variety of flooring options to choose from, the most popular being hardwood. Also, we have many stair design options that will perfectly match your home’s aesthetics.
Refinishing
If your floor or stairs are looking dull and lifeless, then you might need some refinishing to bring your hardwood floors back to their original beauty. Hudson Hardwood offers refinishing services that can bring back the former glory of your floors in no time!
Cleaning & Recoating
Most homeowners don’t realize the importance of cleaning their floors correctly. If you don’t clean your floors regularly, the dirt and dust will start to accumulate, and this can cause your flooring to look tedious and wash out. At Hudson Hardwood, we offer cleaning & recoat services that take care of all the nitty-gritty details.
Restoration
If you’re on a budget and can’t replace your floors, then scheduling a floor restoration is the answer! If your flooring is drab and has endured years of dings, dents, and scratches, it’s time to restore it. Through restoration, our team of professionals strive to improve the appearance and durability of your hardwood floors.
Hudson Hardwood: Bringing Your Home Back To Life!
If you’re looking for quality home renovations, Hudson Hardwood is the perfect company for you! We provide you with services that will make your house look stunning. With over 20+ years of experience, we know whether you need hardwood floor refinishing, hardwood floor installation, or wood floor sanding!
Contact us to request a quote today so that we can help you renovate your home!",hudsonhardwood
131,https://hudsonhardwood.com/ourreviews/,Joe Hudson Hudson Hardwood Floors (215) 694-7296 See What Our Clients Have To Say About Working With Hudson Hardwood Check out our Reviews and discover what to expect from Hudson Hardwood.,hudsonhardwood
132,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project-category/cleanrecoat/,"Project Description Commercial Buff and Coat of Gym Floor | Roxborough, PA A charter school in Roxborough reached out to…
Project Description Cleaning and Recoating | Rittenhouse, Philadelphia, PA A couple moving into the Rittenhouse section of Philadephia contacted Hudson…
Project Description Residential Cleaning & Re-coating | Wallingford, PA This project was in a lovely remodeled rancher in Wallingford in…
Project Description Residence | Pennsport South Philadelphia, PA A regular client of Hudson Hardwood is an entrepreneur and house flipper.…",hudsonhardwood
133,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project-category/commercial/,"Project Description Commercial Hardwood Floor Refinishing Maple Floors | Museum District, PA A business owner in Museum District was looking…
Project Description Commercial Buff and Coat of Gym Floor | Roxborough, PA A charter school in Roxborough reached out to…
Project Description Coffee House | Havertown, Philadelphia, PA Local business owner decided to start another business in town. Client had…
Project Description Sheraton Hotel |Society Hill, Philadelphia, PA Client had carpeted area surrounded by American walnut. Wood need a complete…",hudsonhardwood
134,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project-category/installation/,"Project Description Residential Prefinished Floor Installation | Paoli, PA A young homeowner reached out to us looking for help with…
Project Description Residential Hardwood Floor Installation | Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA A gentleman reached out to us because he was…
Project Description Residential Red Oak Refinishing and Installation | Old City, Philadelphia, PA A homeowner in Old City, Philadelphia was…
Project Description Residential Carpet Removal and Pre-finished Hardwood Oak Installation | Society Hill, Philadelphia, PA A couple in Society…
Project Description Residential White Oak Parquet and Plank Floors and Steps | Washington Square West, Philadelphia PA A new…
Project Description Installation & Stairs | Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA The homeowners on this project were dealing with an upstairs…
Project Description Refinishing and Installation | Rittenhouse Square, Philadelphia, PA This project was at a newly purchased three-story home in…
Project Description Residential Installation and Refinishing | Bella Vista Philadelphia, PA A first time home buyer in the Bella Vista…
Project Description Residence | Blue Bell, PA The client was looking to get rid of the extra-large beveled edges off…
Project Description Residence | Villanova, Main Line, PA Client had old carpet in the living room and dining room. They…",hudsonhardwood
135,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project-category/refinishing/,"Project Description Commercial Hardwood Floor Refinishing Maple Floors | Museum District, PA A business owner in Museum District was looking…
Project Description Residential White Oak Floor Refinishing with Walnut Inlay | Conshocken, PA A new homebuyer in Conshocken, PA reached…
Project Description Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing of Heart Pine Floors and Stairs | Phoenixville, PA A young lady reached out to…
Project Description Residential Red Oak Refinishing and Installation | Old City, Philadelphia, PA A homeowner in Old City, Philadelphia was…
Project Description Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing & Repair | Wayne - Main Line, PA A client in Wayne, PA had…
Project Description Residential Refinishing | Kensington, Philadelphia, PA A local architect reached out to Hudson Hardwood looking for expert advice…
Project Description Refinishing and Stairs | Roxborough, Philadelphia, PA A lovely couple from the Roxborough section of Philadelphia contacted…
Project Description Refinishing and Stairs | Manayunk, Philadelphia, PA This customer decided to have her floors done while she was…
Project Description Refinishing and Installation | Rittenhouse Square, Philadelphia, PA This project was at a newly purchased three-story home in…",hudsonhardwood
136,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project-category/residential/,"Project Description Residential White Oak Floor Refinishing with Walnut Inlay | Conshocken, PA A new homebuyer in Conshocken, PA reached…
Project Description Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing of Heart Pine Floors and Stairs | Phoenixville, PA A young lady reached out to…
Project Description Residential Prefinished Floor Installation | Paoli, PA A young homeowner reached out to us looking for help with…
Project Description Residential Hardwood Floor Installation | Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA A gentleman reached out to us because he was…
Project Description Residential Red Oak Refinishing and Installation | Old City, Philadelphia, PA A homeowner in Old City, Philadelphia was…
Project Description Residential Carpet Removal and Pre-finished Hardwood Oak Installation | Society Hill, Philadelphia, PA A couple in Society…
Project Description Residential White Oak Parquet and Plank Floors and Steps | Washington Square West, Philadelphia PA A new…
Project Description Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing & Repair | Wayne - Main Line, PA A client in Wayne, PA had…
Project Description Residential Refinishing | Kensington, Philadelphia, PA A local architect reached out to Hudson Hardwood looking for expert advice…",hudsonhardwood
137,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project-category/stairs/,"Project Description Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing of Heart Pine Floors and Stairs | Phoenixville, PA A young lady reached out to…
Project Description Residential White Oak Parquet and Plank Floors and Steps | Washington Square West, Philadelphia PA A new…
Project Description Refinishing and Stairs | Roxborough, Philadelphia, PA A lovely couple from the Roxborough section of Philadelphia contacted…
Project Description Installation & Stairs | Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA The homeowners on this project were dealing with an upstairs…
Project Description Refinishing and Stairs | Manayunk, Philadelphia, PA This customer decided to have her floors done while she was…
Project Description Refinishing and Installation | Rittenhouse Square, Philadelphia, PA This project was at a newly purchased three-story home in…
Project Description Residence | Gladwynne, Philadelphia, PA Lovely Australian couple just moved into the country. They were looking to get…",hudsonhardwood
138,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/100-year-old-maple-brewery-floors/,"Project Description
Brewery | Northern Liberties, Philadelphia, PA
Hudson Hardwood was hired to restore the 100 year old, heavily damaged maple wood flooring for a new brewery. Part of the hardwood floor was salvageable and refinished, another section needed to be replaced. New maple flooring was installed and stained to match.",hudsonhardwood
139,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/ambler-pa-residential-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential Refinishing | Ambler, PA
Refinishing pine hardwood floors that are painted is always a challenge. Pine hardwood floors are very soft and tend to expand and contract more than other hardwood floors. We had to dig deep on these pine hardwood floors remove all of the paint. We then removed all of our dig and scratch marks so the sanding equipment could properly remove the paint with our fully dust contained systems. We got lucky with a set of oak hardwood steps, treads, and risers that had no paint. Three coats of polyurethane at a very low sheen of Matte and everything came out great. Our clients (and now our new friends), Mary and Steve from Ambler, were thrilled and were nice enough to express their happiness on Google.",hudsonhardwood
140,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/bella-vista-beveled-wood-floors-trap-grime/,"Project Description
Residence | Bella Vista, Philadelphia, PA
Client did not like their outdated, dark, Brazilian Cherry floors with large beveled edges that trapped grime in the bevel.
Hudson Hardwood sanded the floors, removing beveled edges, giving the home a bright and fresh look.",hudsonhardwood
141,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/bella-vista-pa-hardwood-floor-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residence | Bella Vista Philadelphia, PA
When new homeowners moved into this house, they did not like the amber overtones of the original polyurethane on the floor. Instead, they wanted a more natural look with a slight gray undertone. They were also worried about dust accumulating during the project. After assuring the homeowner that we have the best dust containment in the area and tinkering around with stain combinations, Hudson Hardwood came up with the perfect solution.",hudsonhardwood
142,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/bella-vista-philadelphia-pa-residential-installation-and-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential Installation and Refinishing | Bella Vista Philadelphia, PA
A first time home buyer in the Bella Vista section of Philadelphia bought a cute row home, but she didn’t like the laminate flooring downstairs, or the painted treads of her oak steps. Upstairs had solid oak hardwood floors that needed a basic hardwood floor refinishing. We replaced all the laminate flooring in the living room, dining room, and small office space upstairs with matching solid oak hardwood floors. We refinished the oak steps and added new trim and molding to tie everything together. It turned out to be one of the nicer homes in the Bella Vista section thanks to the freshly refinished and installed hardwood floors.",hudsonhardwood
143,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/berwyn-main-line-pa-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing | Berwyn – Main Line, PA
A new home buyer in Berwyn, PA called wanting to have his floors replaced with new hardwood floors. He had been told that his current wood floors were at the end of their life and could not be refinished. We came out for an estimate and were pleasantly surprised to see that the first floor was going to be able to be refinished instead of installing a new hardwood floor. On the second floor, the wood was in such good condition we agreed to do a deep cleaning and recoating (Buff and Coat). The client was thrilled with the savings!
We worked with our client on stain and finish selections. He liked the character of the original floors but thought they were a bit drab. He wanted to lighten up the space. After refinishing the floors, we kept them natural and coated with clear finish.",hudsonhardwood
144,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/bleached-hardwood-flooring/,"Project Description
Residential | Chestnut Hill, PA
This Hudson Hardwood client had two types of flooring, pine and oak. They wanted all their hardwood floors and steps to be as white as possible, while maintaining allure of the wood grain.
Our expert hardwood flooring craftsmen used a custom mix of bleaching and staining to achieve this deep white look. We topped the floors with a strong water borne finish, that prevents wood floors from yellow, and provided a satin sheen.",hudsonhardwood
145,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/blue-bell-hardwood-floor-consultation-and-refinish/,"Project Description
Residence | Blue Bell, PA
This charming rancher located in Blue Bell wanted brand new floors. Hudson Hardwood consulted with the client and showed them that the floors could be refinished to display their full beauty, for much less than the cost of a new installation.",hudsonhardwood
146,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/blue-bell-pa-hardwood-floor-refinishing-installation/,"Project Description
Residence | Blue Bell, PA
The client was looking to get rid of the extra-large beveled edges off his pre-finished factory floors. Hudson Hardwood came in eliminated all the beveled edges while giving a more improved and better-looking finish with all beveled edges removed so dirt and grime can no longer collect in the edges. At the same time, they changed the color and sheen to something more appealing to the designer’s eye.",hudsonhardwood
147,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/center-city-cigar-bar-hardwood-floor-refinishing/,"Project Description
Cigar Bar | Center City, Philadelphia, PA
The project manager of this regional cigar bar wanted a strong, industrial wood floor with a commercial grade finish.
Hudson Hardwood Floors was brought on to consult and refinish the wood floors to withstand commercial foot traffic.",hudsonhardwood
148,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/center-city-lobby-hardwood-floor-restoration/,"Project Description
Office Building Lobby | Center City, Philadelphia, PA
A Philadelphia Commercial Developer approached us with a lobby wood floor that was in bad shape with limited wood left for refinishing. We were able to successfully refinish the current hardwood for much less than a new floor installation.",hudsonhardwood
149,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/commercial-developer-office-hardwood-floors/,"Project Description
Commercial | Philadelphia, PA
Developer called Hudson Hardwood for a consultation on wood floors. After examining the hardwood buckling and cupping, we determined that the floors could be refinished. This optimized the developers overhead, maintained the character of the floor and provided the new office building with a profession yet rustic look.",hudsonhardwood
150,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/commercial-retail-space-in-philadelphia/,"Project Description
Commercial – Retail | Philadelphia, PA
This new Center City phone store wanted to brighten up their hardwood floor’s 15 year old finish.
Hudson Hardwood met their needs with a custom blended stain and a high traffic commercial grade finish.",hudsonhardwood
151,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/conshocken-pa-residential-white-oak-floor-refinishing-with-walnut-inlay/,"Project Description
Residential White Oak Floor Refinishing with Walnut Inlay | Conshocken, PA
A new homebuyer in Conshocken, PA reached out to us with questions about hardwood floor refinishing. After addressing his concerns, we scheduled to go to his house that same day to give him a proper estimate . Although the floors weren’t in great condition, we assured him that a complete flooring installation would not be necessary and that we could certainly make his wooden floor beautiful again. After three days of floor refinishing, we were able to turn his home into a masterpiece. The walnut feature strip really pops on this white oak floor giving the room a unique and decorative touch. Our client was very pleased with the finished work and the promptness of our response in comparison to other flooring companies in the area.",hudsonhardwood
152,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/cost-efficient-whole-house-wood-flooring/,"Project Description
Residence | Vorhees, NJ
Hudson Hardwood worked with this client to be as cost efficient as possible. We carefully inspected the wood floors and chose several floors to gently buff and re-coat with polyurethane, also know as a hardwood cleaning and re-coating. The rest of the wood floors in this home needed to be fully refinished.",hudsonhardwood
153,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/fairmount-restoration/,"Project Description
Residence | Fairmount, Philadelphia, PA
Hudson Hardwood restored the old oak floors of this Fairmount, Philadelphia row home to their original beauty.
Residence | Fairmount, Philadelphia, PA
Hudson Hardwood restored the old oak floors of this Fairmount, Philadelphia row home to their original beauty.",hudsonhardwood
154,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/fairmount-wood-floor-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residence | Fairmount, Philadelphia, PA
Newly married couple who just moved to Philadelphia wanted museum quality hardwood floors. They hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to refinish their original wood floors, restoring them to their original beauty.",hudsonhardwood
155,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/gladwynne-pa-hardwood-floor-stairs-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residence | Gladwynne, Philadelphia, PA
Lovely Australian couple just moved into the country. They were looking to get their Brazilian cherry floors and stairs refinished. They did not like the red tint that Brazilian cherry come with. We did two coats of true black stain and 3 coats of a very low matte finish for a more natural look and they couldn’t of been more happy.",hudsonhardwood
156,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/havertown-coffee-house-hardwood-floor-refinishing/,"Project Description
Coffee House | Havertown, Philadelphia, PA
Local business owner decided to start another business in town. Client had highly damaged pine floors that were covered in black mastic from layers of old vinyl flooring. We were able to remove all the black mastic and restore the original hearth Pine sub floors, achieving a rustic beauty, while avoiding the extra cost and overhead of a new installation.
.",hudsonhardwood
157,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/kensington-section-of-philadelphia-pa-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential Refinishing | Kensington, Philadelphia, PA
A local architect reached out to Hudson Hardwood looking for expert advice on refinishing hardwood floors. He was nice enough to point out that our company ranked high when he searched under “hardwood floor refinishing near me.” We discussed some ideas about dark hardwood floors versus gray hardwood floors. We offered our opinion that gray hardwood floors have run their course. Natural and very low sheen hardwood floors are our personal favorite. They stand the test of time even as styles and trends change.
The client had prefinished hardwood floors with a large beveled edge which we were eager to sand and give his newly refinished floors a more natural look. As you can see by the pictures, everything turned out beautifully and the client couldn’t have been happier.",hudsonhardwood
158,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/king-of-prussia-pa-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing | King of Prussia, PA
A client referral called. They wanted to update their dark, fading, prefinished wood floors. They disliked the texture of their current floors, they could feel the tiny grooves below their feet.
We consulted with the client on color (stain) and finish (the amount of shine). They wanted a light and low shine floor. We refinished their existing floors, flattened the grooves, and stained a very natural color. Then we topped it with a low VOC, quick drying, water based finish. They were thrilled.",hudsonhardwood
159,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/manayunk-section-of-philadelphia-pa-refinishing-and-stairs/,"Project Description
Refinishing and Stairs | Manayunk, Philadelphia, PA
This customer decided to have her floors done while she was in Brazil. She searched hardwood floor refinishing in the Philadephia area. To our delight, she said she had noticed that Hudson Hardwood came up first in several searches regarding her hardwood floors. We did a lot of FaceTime during this project and tried to take the best angles as much as possible to get this job done right.
The client wanted to improve her heart pine floors to increase the value of her home before she put it on the market. We refinished the hardwood floors and hardwood stairs. Sanding hardwood floors is not an exact science as we explained to her and we typically like to have clients on-site. However, she said she read all of our reviews and had the utmost trust in Hudson Hardwood, especially after a few conversations. The job went really well and she sold the house right away.",hudsonhardwood
160,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/marlton-nj-refinishing-and-stairs/,"Project Description
Refinishing and Stairs | Marlton, NJ
This customer wanted to put his house on the market and thought he could get a better return on his investment by refinishing his hardwood floors. His realtor advised him that wood floors add more value to a house than carpeting. There’s no overhead except sandpaper and finish as opposed to the demo of carpet and installation of actual new floors. The homeowner had all the furniture and carpet removed from the entire second floor and from the hardwood stairs. The job was completed with no issues.
Hudson Hardwood applied three coats of polyurethane which is a basic hardwood floor refinishing service that we do. It is one of our most popular services. To finish the floors nicely we installed primed quarter round along the edges of the baseboards where the carpet had been. The customer was very satisfied with the results.",hudsonhardwood
161,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/matching-different-wood-floors/,"Project Description
Residence | Cherry Hill, NJ
This local sports hero’s wood floors were damaged by water during a kitchen remodel. The contractor mistook the original pre-finished American walnut floors for maple.
Hudson Hardwood fully refinished the kitchen hardwood floors using a custom dye along with some staining. We were able to refinish the entire home to match wood species throughout.",hudsonhardwood
162,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/museum-district-commercial-refinishing-maple-floors/,"Project Description
Commercial Hardwood Floor Refinishing Maple Floors | Museum District, PA
A business owner in Museum District was looking to renovate their office space and sought our help with making the floors look like new. He was worried that with the condition of the pre-existing floors a complete hardwood floor installation would be necessary. We assured him that we could restore the planks of wood back to their original condition and color by carefully sanding down and refinishing their maple floors. We were able reveal the new layer of glossy maple hardwood floor. The business owner was extremely pleased with the finished look and how seamlessly the job got done, especially in the midst of other renovations that were being made to the office!",hudsonhardwood
163,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/newly-built-home-in-graduate-hospital/,"Project Description
Residence | Graduate Hospital, Philadelphia, PA
Client needed wood floors refinished after the furniture was moved in. Hudson Hardwood moved the furniture to one side of this Graduate Hospital home, then stained and refinished the hardwood floors to a rich dark gray. We then moved the furniture to the second half of the home, marrying the two sides together.",hudsonhardwood
164,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/northern-liberties-factory-to-office-wood-floors/,"Project Description
Office Building | Northern Liberties, Philadelphia, PA
A Philadelphia Commercial Developer reached out to us wanting to salvage the old maple wood factory floors and use them for their converted office space. We refinished the dirty, grimy, and heavily worn wood floors to a flat, stain free, beautiful hardwood restoration.",hudsonhardwood
165,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/northern-liberties-pa-hardwood-rehab/,"Project Description
Office | Northern Liberties Philadelphia, PA
An entrepreneur from the Northern Liberties section of Philadelphia was looking to rehab his 3rd floor to create an office and pool table area to entertain clients. He wanted something that stood out from all the other houses. I suggested we install a site sanded oak herringbone pattern with a boarder to accentuate the pool table, desk, client chairs area. The room design was a challenge, but we coordinated with the furniture to make it work. It was a success.",hudsonhardwood
166,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/old-city-residential-red-oak-refinishing-and-installation/,"Project Description
Residential Red Oak Refinishing and Installation | Old City, Philadelphia, PA
A homeowner in Old City, Philadelphia was looking to refresh their home and and replace their aged hardwood floors. We did a complete hardwood floor installation and refinished it in red oak to give his home a more elegant touch. Our client was pleased with how much the hardwood floor refinishing spruced up their home and how promptly we completed the job. Another satisfied client!",hudsonhardwood
167,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/paoli-pa-residential-prefinished-floor-installation/,"Project Description
Residential Prefinished Floor Installation | Paoli, PA
A young homeowner reached out to us looking for help with hardwood floor installation before his new furniture arrived. After carpet removal on subfloor preparation, we installed Bruce pre-finished solid oak floors. It came out wonderful and our client couldn’t have been more pleased! He had said flooring companies near him never returned any of his calls, and that we not only returned his call that same day, but were out measuring the job by the next. We’re glad we were able to provide a high-quality and timely service to this new homebuyer.",hudsonhardwood
168,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/pennsport-philadelphia-commercial-install-refinishing/,"Project Description
Commercial | Pennsport, Philadelphia, PA
Philadelphia’s largest deck installer, City Decks, was looking to update their office floors. The client purchased European white oak character grade. They were looking for Hudson Hardwood to install it. They weren’t sure what kind of finish to go with to keep it as natural and raw as possible. I suggested going with Loba Invisible finish, an extremely transparent finish that holds up extremely well. It’s my current favorite.",hudsonhardwood
169,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/pennsport-south-philadelphia-pa-hardwood-floor-re-coating/,"Project Description
Residence | Pennsport South Philadelphia, PA
A regular client of Hudson Hardwood is an entrepreneur and house flipper. She picked up a new home in the Pennsport South Philadelphia area. We refinished the first and second floors and one flight of steps. She chose natural with three coats of polyurethane to help with cost. She was happy with polyurethane as an economical choice for both protection and cost.",hudsonhardwood
170,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/philadelphia-pa-residential-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential and refinishing | Philadelphia, PA
The new homeowners of a split level in Manayunk had old, tired top nail oak floors that looked like a DIY’er or someone with little experience had tried to fix them. My team had some old dredger marks, chatter, and some old wax to sand up. We put down three fresh coats of polyurethane. The clients insisted we used all oil-based products and they weren’t worried about the dry times. My guess is that their grandma or grandpa was in their ear telling them it has to be oil-based. Either way, both polyurethane and water-based finishes, are an excellent choice – provided you choose the correct products, and, of course, Hudson Hardwood Floors to lay down the correct sauce. Even with longer drying times, we finished well ahead of deadline.",hudsonhardwood
171,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/philadelphia-restaurant-wood-floor-refinishing/,"Project Description
Restaurant | Midtown Village, Philadelphia, PA
Restaurant owner wanted to have the hardwood floors restored with no downtime during business hours. Hudson Hardwood worked overnight to refinish the hardwood floors to their original beauty. Since we were on a time restraint, we used a quick try stain and water borne finish to help meet our deadline.",hudsonhardwood
172,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/phoenixville-pa-residential-refinishing-of-heart-pine-floors-and-stairs/,"Project Description
Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing of Heart Pine Floors and Stairs | Phoenixville, PA
A young lady reached out to us to see how quickly we could refinish the hardwood floors in her house. Having multiple crews, we were able to meet her deadline to refinish hardwood floors in record time with top quality. She mentioned that flooring companies near her would not have given this a second glance with the urgency that she needed it, but was so pleased with our ability to meet the deadline and get the hardwood floor refinishing done to her liking. Another satisfied customer!",hudsonhardwood
173,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/queen-village-section-of-philadelphia-pa-refinishing/,"Hudson Hardwood was called in to refinish the white oak hardwood floors in a home in the Queen Village area of Philadelphia. This job was the result of an insurance claim. A pipe burst in the bathroom on the third floor and water leaked onto the entire second floor, damaging the hardwood floors.
Hudson Hardwood was able to make the necessary repairs to the hardwood floors and apply four coats of the best finish the industry has to offer. The hardwood floors look as good as new and are durable enough to last for years.",hudsonhardwood
174,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/queens-village-pa-hardwood-floor-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residence | Queens Village, Philadelphia, PA
A local landlord, whom uses Hudson Hardwood often, had another tough project for us. He had just bought a property with heavily damaged wood floors. He brought us in to restore the original hearth Pine subfloors.
Hudson Hardwood was able to carefully restore the original floors and avoid the cost of a new installation.
.",hudsonhardwood
175,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/rehab-stain-and-restore-hardwood/,"Project Description
Residence | King of Prussia, PA
This clients rancher needed some love. The original hardwood floors were damaged, the kitchen was covered in linoleum.
Hudson Hardwood Floors restored existing hardwood floors throughout the home and installed new kitchen wood flooring. Finished with with stain and polyurethane for a fresh, updated look.",hudsonhardwood
176,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/rittenhouse-hardwood-floors/,"Project Description
Residence | Rittenhouse, Philadelphia, PA
Clients wood floors were damaged by a leak from the tenant above. The hardwood floors buckled from the water.
After a careful assessment, Hudson Hardwood was able to sand the floors flat and keep original wood. The client took the opportunity to change the floor color from their dingy, yellowed natural floors, to a more natural espresso look.
Like most center city projects, this home was done in two phases. Furniture was moved, by Hudson Hardwood, to one side of the home as the floors were refinished. Then Hudson Hardwood moved the furniture and refinish other side of this homes wood floors.",hudsonhardwood
177,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/rittenhouse-section-of-philadelphia-pa-cleaning-and-recoating/,"Project Description
Cleaning and Recoating | Rittenhouse, Philadelphia, PA
A couple moving into the Rittenhouse section of Philadephia contacted Hudson Hardwood and mentioned they were happy with the way the hardwood floors looked, but they were looking for somebody to come in and deep clean and spruce them up a bit. Hudson Hardwood recommended our “Clean and Re-coat” service. The Clean and Re-coat service is perfect for people who like the look of their hardwood floors, but want to decontaminate them with a deep clean and a single re-coat of a finish of the client’s choice.
When Hudson Hardwood was finished with the clean and re-coat, the clients were thrilled. This is a quick and affordable option for great-looking hardwood floors. Hudson Hardwood completed the job in under 24 hours and the clients were able to move in the next day.",hudsonhardwood
178,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/rittenhouse-square-section-of-philadelphia-pa-refinishing-and-installation/,"Project Description
Refinishing and Installation | Rittenhouse Square, Philadelphia, PA
This project was at a newly purchased three-story home in the Rittenhouse Square section of Philadelphia. This family was looking to have their hardwood floors changed from natural, prefinished hardwood floors, to customized wood floor refinishing by Hudson Hardwood Floors.
We put down several colors on their actual floor so they could see exactly what each one would look like before making their choice. After the selection was made we got to business on the hardwood flooring installation part of the job, along with some hardwood floor refinishing and hardwood stairs as well. Mission accomplished.",hudsonhardwood
179,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/rittenhouse-wood-floor-installation/,"Project Description
Residence | Rittenhouse, Philadelphia, PA
A Philadelphia builder called with a unique project. The couple who owned this Rittenhouse home wanted each wood floor to have an individual look without being too drastic.
On the first floor we used white oak wood, run diagonally to get away from the “rectangular” look. On the second floor we created a herringbone layout with a wenge (hardwood species) inlay. Finally on the third floor we refinished the wood to match the stain of the first and second floors.",hudsonhardwood
180,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/rittenhouse-wood-floors/,"Project Description
Residence | Rittenhouse, Philadelphia, PA
Client was a couple who had just moved from New York to Rittenhouse. They wanted to change the color of their pre-finished cherry wood floors. They believed they needed to install a new wood floor. After Hudson Hardwood’s inspection, we discovered their wood floor had enough veneer to allow us to sand, stain and finish their floor in the color and sheen of their choice. The clients were thrilled that this would shorten the length of their hardwood floor project.",hudsonhardwood
181,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/roxborough-commercial-buff-and-coat-of-gym-floor/,"Project Description
Commercial Buff and Coat of Gym Floor | Roxborough, PA
A charter school in Roxborough reached out to us asking for helping in restoring their worn-out gym floors. They were worried the hardwood floor buffing and coating would interfere too much with school activities and schedule, but we assured them we could complete the project in record time to ensure minimal inconvenience. The school was really pleased with our efficiency and with the finished work. The old gym floors were left new and glossy for their upcoming games!",hudsonhardwood
182,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/roxborough-section-of-philadelphia-pa-refinishing-and-stairs/,"Project Description
Refinishing and Stairs | Roxborough, Philadelphia, PA
A lovely couple from the Roxborough section of Philadelphia contacted me and mentioned they researched “hardwood floor refinishing” and noticed Hudson Hardwood ranked high on Google. They were looking to elevate their prefinished floors to the next level and have all of the bevels removed. Over the years the bevels collect dirt and grime.
It takes a bit more sanding than normal, but the extra effort pays off. Prefinished hardwood floors have a beveled edge since there is no sanding required. This is necessary for these types of floors. When Hudson Hardwood was finished the floors were completely free of bevels and have a consistent solid appearance throughout. The clients chose a light gray stain with three coats of commercial-grade finish that will endure for many years to come.",hudsonhardwood
183,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/society-hill-residential-carpet-removal-and-pre-finished-hardwood-oak-installation/,"Project Description
Residential Carpet Removal and Pre-finished Hardwood Oak Installation | Society Hill, Philadelphia, PA
A couple in Society Hill reached out to us with questions about removing their carpet floors from their home and replacing them with hardwood. They wanted to make the change, but were a little hesitant because of how complicated the process might be. We took them through the different steps, spoke to them about what they could expect and helped them feel more comfortable with the process. The very next day we went to inspect their floors in more detail and give them an estimate. The clients felt like they could rely on us for the job and chose to replace their carpet flooring with a pre-finished hardwood floor installation in oak to add a little more elegance to their home. The couple was very pleased with the finished work and said they were happy with how seamless we helped make the entire process.",hudsonhardwood
184,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/society-hill-sheraton-hotel-hardwood-floors/,"Project Description
Sheraton Hotel |Society Hill, Philadelphia, PA
Client had carpeted area surrounded by American walnut. Wood need a complete overhaul. Hudson Hardwood sanded down to raw wood to remove all the years of traffic. Topped off with a heavy duty, commercial grade, water borne finish, that was near odorless and dried quickly, so they could return to business in a timely manner.
.",hudsonhardwood
185,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/university-city-pa-residential-installation/,"Project Description
Residential Installation | University City Philadelphia, PA
These clients are first-time homeowners in the University City section of Philadelphia. The oak hardwood floors in their new home also doubled as the subfloors, and these were out of life as far as being refinished. The clients were looking for new hardwood floors in a short timeline. I suggested Bruce prefinished oak hardwood floors which do not need any kind of finishing. I also took a moisture reading of all the subfloors, as we do before we do any installations. In this case, the floors did not need to acclimate since they were within the range of each other enough for proper installation.
Since the current floor was a subfloor this job was very straight-forward. We installed the new prefinished oak hardwood floors on top of the current subfloor and install prime quarter round for the edges. We got done the job in record time! The client was shocked that we were able to get 1000 ft.² down in one day. In addition, we handled moving all the furniture at the beginning and end of the job.",hudsonhardwood
186,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/villanova-hardwood-floor-installation-and-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residence | Villanova, Main Line, PA
Client had old carpet in the living room and dining room. They hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to recommend and install a budget conscience wood floor in the living room and dining room.
Residence | Villanova, Main Line, PA
Client had old carpet in the living room and dining room. They hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to recommend and install a budget conscience wood floor in the living room and dining room.",hudsonhardwood
187,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/villanova-natural-wood-floors/,"Project Description Residence | Villanova, Main Line, PA Clients wanted a raw, natural look on their new hardwood floors. Hudson Hardwood installed new solid white oak flooring and finished with a matte, water borne finish to achieve a natural look.",hudsonhardwood
188,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/wallingford-pa-residential-cleaning-and-recoating/,"Project Description
Residential Cleaning & Re-coating | Wallingford, PA
This project was in a lovely remodeled rancher in Wallingford in Nether Providence Township. The home has oak floors and stairs that were in pretty good shape and just needed a clean and recoat. The homeowner had done his research and wanted the most durable finish available that would not yellow over time. The current floors had polyurethane which has yellowed.
Hudson Hardwood refinished the entire house and put down three coats of a two-component, high traffic waterborne finish guaranteed to not yellow over time. The client was thrilled with the project and happy to have all the scratches and imperfections gone after the last hardwood floor refinishing which was mediocre at best. He also wanted to know how to repair a hardwood floor scratch if it happened down the road. I was able to leave him with a very user-friendly detail kit to handle minor scratches and gouges due to normal traffic.",hudsonhardwood
189,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/walnut-hill-section-of-philadelphia-pa-repairs-and-refinishing/,"Project Description
Repairs and Refinishing | Walnut Hill, Philadelphia, PA
This was an interesting job. The homeowners called Hudson Hardwood looking for hardwood floors refinishing services. When we walked into their home, we noticed the hardwood floors were close to the end of the road as far as sanding the floors. There were also a lot of pet stains.
After further assessment, we took it upon ourselves to take on this project and felt confident we could refinish these hardwood floors one more time, along with completing some repairs.
The finished results were significantly better than our team expected. The clients were as happy as we were!",hudsonhardwood
190,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/warrington-pa-residential-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential and Refinishing | Warrington, PA
A family from Chicago moved into the Warrington area. They found Hudson Hardware through Google and were impressed we had so many good reviews and mentioned that I was popular on Yelp as well. They wanted to change the orange amber color of their floors and go with a warm brown. I gave them five samples to choose from and recommended a lower sheen finish, which is more forgiving with normal foot traffic. They took my advice and are happy with the floors. They said next year we’ll do all the bedrooms since now the downstairs look so great they have to do the rest of the house. After 20 years I hear this every single time a client can only do half the house due to budget or other reasons.",hudsonhardwood
191,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/washington-square-residential-hardwood-floor-installation/,"Project Description
Residential Hardwood Floor Installation | Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA
A gentleman reached out to us because he was having trouble locating hardwood floors that would match the ones he already has in his home. From our arrival to his house we were able to determine what type of wood floors we would need to match and got on to completing the hardwood floor installation promptly. Our client was happy to hear that we would handle all of the furniture moving during the flooring installation, which certainly took some of the angst off of his worries during this project. Project was a success and he couldn’t have been happier!",hudsonhardwood
192,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/washington-square-section-of-philadelphia-pa-installation-and-stairs/,"Project Description
Installation & Stairs | Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA
The homeowners on this project were dealing with an upstairs bathroom pipe that burst and caused damage to their bamboo floors downstairs. They wanted to take advantage of the insurance money coming in and change up the bamboo to some prefinished white oak hardwood floors. Demolition went smoothly considering all of the surrounding damage to the walls. The subfloor looked good and had no signs of molding. The bulk of Hudson Hardwood’s business is refinishing hardwood floors, but this time around hardwood flooring installation was called for and the project went smoothly. The project also included refinishing their hardwood steps.",hudsonhardwood
193,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/washington-square-west-residential-white-oak-parquet-and-plank-floors-and-steps/,"Project Description
Residential White Oak Parquet and Plank Floors and Steps | Washington Square West, Philadelphia PA
A new homeowner in Washington Square West was looking to period-correct their floors to better match the mid-century style of their home. After discussing different options with her, the client decided to go for parquet wood flooring, a unique type of hardwood floor installation that was traditional of the era. We assured her we could complete this unique and bold installation which consisted of tiles that are made by arranging wooden pieces in repeating patterns. Pleased with the end result, the homeowner also wanted a white oak hardwood installation of her stairway to match the newly-installed white oak parquet floors. Our client was extremely pleased with the end result and how it transformed the look of her home!",hudsonhardwood
194,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/water-damaged-hardwood-floors/,"Project Description
Residence | Bala Cynwood, Main Line, PA
This 80 year old Victorian home had a roof leak which found it’s way to 1st floor causing significant damage. Hardwood on the second and third floors was cupping and buckling.
Hudson Hardwood repaired the living room floors, and refinished the rest of the wood floors with a super matte sheen.",hudsonhardwood
195,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/wayne-hardwood-floor-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential Hardwood Floor Refinishing & Repair | Wayne – Main Line, PA
A client in Wayne, PA had wide plank, heart pine floors that were yellowing from age, with a few damaged spots. They wanted to give the floor more depth and refresh the room ambiance.
We consulted with our client, put down a few stain and finish options and helped them select the right tone (stain) and finish. Then we sanded and repaired their floors, stained the selected color, and topped with a satin finish.",hudsonhardwood
196,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/west-chester-pa-refinishing/,"Project Description
Residential Refinishing | West Chester, PA
A retired couple called Hudson Hardwood with a basic question about how to clean hardwood floors. We are always happy to answer questions about hardwood floors. After giving them the low down on hardwood floor refinishing, they seemed interested in Hudson Hardwood coming in to take a look at their job and give them a professional opinion.
The couple mentioned that no other flooring companies near them were as quick to respond to them. By the end of the estimate, they were ready to book and have us work some magic on their parquet floors. As you can see in the photos, everything turned out great and they were gracious enough to write five star reviews on Google, Yelp, and Facebook.
The client had prefinished hardwood floors with a large beveled edge which we were eager to sand and give his newly refinished floors a more natural look. Everything turned out beautifully and the client couldn’t have been happier.",hudsonhardwood
197,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/white-parquet-floors/,"Project Description
Residence | Queens Village, Philadelphia, PA
Client wanted a non-yellowing white hardwood floor that she had seen a sample of in a local hardwood store. The original wood floors used polyurethane, which gives yellowing amber effect, that client did not like.
Using a series of custom based colors and a water borne finish to prevent yellowing, Hudson Hardwood created our clients dream white wood floors.",hudsonhardwood
198,https://hudsonhardwood.com/project/whole-house-wood-floor-refinish-in-washington-square/,"Project Description
Residence | Washington Square, Philadelphia, PA
Client owned a lovely little condo in Washington Square that had hardwood water damage from the dishwasher. Hudson Hardwood was able to salvage the wood floor and avoid the need for any new wood while refinish the whole first floor.
When client saw client the sanded wood floors, they request we refinish the rest of the house.",hudsonhardwood
199,https://hudsonhardwood.com/projects/,"AllCleaning & Re-coatingCommercialInstallationRefinishingResidentialStairsMuseum District • Commercial Refinishing Maple FloorsRead moreConshocken, PA • Residential White Oak Floor Refinishing with Walnut InlayRead morePhoenixville, PA • Residential Refinishing of Heart Pine Floors and StairsRead morePaoli, PA • Residential Prefinished Floor InstallationRead moreWashington Square • Residential Hardwood Floor InstallationRead moreOld City • Residential Red Oak Refinishing and InstallationRead moreSociety Hill • Residential Carpet Removal and Pre-finished Hardwood Oak InstallationRead moreRoxborough • Commercial Buff and Coat of Gym FloorRead moreWashington Square West • Residential White Oak Parquet and Plank Floors and StepsRead moreWayne • Wide Plank Wood Floor Repair & RefinishingRead moreBerwyn • Main Line, PA • RefinishingRead moreKing of Prussia, PA • RefinishingRead moreWest Chester, PA • RefinishingRead moreKensington section of Philadelphia, PA • RefinishingRead moreRoxborough section of Philadelphia, PA • Refinishing and StairsRead moreWashington Square section of Philadelphia, PA • Installation and StairsRead moreManayunk section of Philadelphia, PA • Refinishing and StairsRead moreRittenhouse Square section of Philadelphia, PA • Refinishing and InstallationRead moreMarlton, NJ • Refinishing and StairsRead moreWalnut Hill section of Philadelphia, PA • Repairs and RefinishingRead moreRittenhouse section of Philadelphia, PA • Cleaning and RecoatingRead moreQueen Village section of Philadelphia, PA • RefinishingRead moreWallingford, PA • Residential Cleaning & Re-coatingRead morePhiladelphia, PA • Residential RefinishingRead moreBella Vista Philadelphia, PA • Residential Installation and RefinishingRead moreAmbler, PA • Residential RefinishingRead moreUniversity City, PA • Residential InstallationRead moreNorthern Liberties, PA • Hardwood RehabRead morePennsport South Philadelphia, PA • Hardwood Floor Re-coatingRead moreWarrington, PA • Residential RefinishingRead morePennsport, Philadelphia • Install and RefinishingRead moreBella Vista, PA • Hardwood Floor RefinishingRead moreBlue Bell, PA • Hardwood Floor Refinishing & InstallationRead moreGladwynne, PA • Hardwood Floor & Stair RefinishingRead moreQueens Village, PA • Hardwood Floor RefinishingRead moreHavertown, PA • Coffee House Hardwood Floor RefinishingRead moreSociety Hill, PA Sheraton Hotel Hardwood Floor RefinishingRead moreCenter City Cigar Bar Hardwood Floor RefinishingRead moreFairmount Wood Floor RefinishingRead moreVillanova Hardwood Floor Installation and RefinishingRead moreNorthern Liberties Factory to Office Wood FloorsRead moreCenter City Lobby Hardwood Floor RestorationRead morePhiladelphia Restaurant Wood Floor RefinishingRead moreRittenhouse Wood Floors InstallationRead more100 Year Old Maple Brewery FloorsRead moreRittenhouse Wood FloorsRead moreCommercial Developer Office Hardwood FloorsRead moreWhole House Wood Floor Refinish in Washington SquareRead moreNewly Built Home in Graduate HospitalRead moreBella Vista Beveled Wood Floors Trap GrimeRead moreFairmount RestorationRead moreBlue Bell Hardwood Floor Consultation and RefinishRead moreCommercial Retail Space in PhiladelphiaRead moreWater Damaged Hardwood Floors Main Line, PARead moreRehab, Stain and Restore HardwoodRead moreMatching Different Wood FloorsRead moreBleached Hardwood FlooringRead moreWhite Parquet FloorsRead moreCost Efficient Whole House Wood FlooringRead moreRittenhouse Hardwood FloorsRead moreVillanova Natural Wood FloorsRead more",hudsonhardwood
200,https://hudsonhardwood.com/request-a-quote/,"How can we help?*Please selectContact UsRequest a quoteName* First Last Project Address Street Address Address Line 2 City AlabamaAlaskaAmerican SamoaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaGuamHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaNorthern Mariana IslandsOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaPuerto RicoRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahU.S. Virgin IslandsVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyomingArmed Forces AmericasArmed Forces EuropeArmed Forces Pacific State ZIP Code Phone NumberEmail* Photos or video of your projectPlease upload photos of unique features: stairs and repairs are particularly important. Accepted file formats: jpg, gif, png, pdf, jpeg, heic, mov, mp4, wmv, avi, mpg, ogv, 3gp, and 3g2. Drop files here or Select files Accepted file types: jpg, gif, png, pdf, jpeg, heic, mov, mp4, wmv, avi, mpg, ogv, 3gp, 3g2, Max. file size: 100 MB, Max. files: 5. Approximate Measurements of your space(s):Total square footage without the breakdown of rooms is welcomed. Please click the plus sign at the end of the row to add additional spaces. Exact footage is not needed. A general approximation of square footage will make your quote more accurate. Room nameLengthWidth Please describe your project:*When would you like your project to start? How did you hear about us?*Please selectGoogleFacebookYelpReferralWord-of-mouthOtherReferralPlease let us know who referred you! OtherPlease let us know how you heard about us. How can we help?*CAPTCHACommentsThis field is for validation purposes and should be left unchanged.",hudsonhardwood
201,https://hudsonhardwood.com/residential-flooring-services-in-philadelphia-pa/,"Residential hardwood can be a great addition to increase your property’s value, regardless of your home’s location. If you’re considering adding hardwood or your existing floor needs to be refinished, Hudson Hardwood is the best option. We’re experts in hardwood floor installation, refinishing, cleaning, and coating. We work with your budget to get you the best results.
Hudson Hardwood’s process begins with an on-site consultation where we’ll assess the condition of your subfloors. We’ll then provide a quote for the project, and once you’ve given us the green light, we’ll get to work! Our team will take care of everything from start to finish; contact us to get started.
Superior Workmanship, Outstanding Results
Whether you have an old home and want to install hardwood for the first time or you want to upgrade the existing flooring, we have the right services for you.
Installation
Hudson Hardwood is your best bet if you’re looking to install hardwood flooring in your home. Our clients have chosen us for our reliable service, daily job updates to clients, and moving all of their furniture while giving them livable conditions during the installation.
Refinishing
If your home has hardwood floors that need a deeper repair, Hudson Hardwood’s hardwood floor refinishing in Rittenhouse, PA, is the one for you. Get rid of deep scratches, and fix uneven buckling, cupping floors, and unsightly stains. Our service allows you to restore your hardwood floors to their original beauty or change the color and sheen for a fresh new look.
Cleaning & Recoating
If your hardwood floors need a little TLC, our cleaning and recoating service is perfect for you. Our process involves sanding the floors to remove any dirt or grime and then applying a new coat of protective finish. We can extend your hardwood flooring lifespan for decades, keeping a shiny new look in the process.
Get To Know Our Projects
Hudson Hardwood takes great pride in the results we deliver to our clients. Check out one of our latest projects to get an idea of what we can do for you.
The Most Reliable Residential Hardwood Services In PA
If you’re looking for reliable hardwood services in PA, look no further than Hudson Hardwood. We’re the most reliable and professional business for your hardwood floor restoration needs. We offer various services, including hardwood floor refinishing in Rittenhouse, PA.
At Hudson Hardwood, we believe wholeheartedly in providing high-quality services at the best rates. Our team comprises the most qualified and experienced individuals passionate about their work. If you’d like to know more about our residential services, don’t hesitate to contact us!",hudsonhardwood
202,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/,"Hudson Hardwood Floors has been serving both residential and commercial properties throughout the Mainline, Philadelphia, Montgomery, Bucks, Delaware, & Chester Counties for over 20 years. Our team specializes in refinishing, installing, cleaning, re-coating, and restoring hardwood floors and stairs. We analyze your floor to determine which service best fits your situation and expertly execute your project. Whether we are updating an existing floor or starting from scratch, Hudson Hardwood is dedicated to bringing warmth and appeal to your space through the classic beauty of wood flooring.",hudsonhardwood
203,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/cleaning-recoating/,"For a fraction of the cost and time of a full refinishing, you can clean and re-coat your hardwood floors and increase your home’s value.
Cleaning and re-coating are also sometimes called a “buff and coat”. It removes short-term finishes that cloud and haze wood floors. Products like mop & glow, and murphy oil soap, cause clouding and hazing that can only be removed by professionally cleaning the hardwood, and re-coating it.
While not removing scratches in the wood, or changing color, cleaning and re-coating is a cost-effective way to refresh your hardwood floors without the hassle, expense, and time, of a full refinishing. During the cleaning our expert craftsmen perform a light abrading of the top layer of your finish without touching the actual wood. This repairs fading and fine scratches in the surface of the finish only. It also allows you to improve your current finish with a higher quality and more durable one, that lasts longer and better protects your floors.
Cleaning and re-coating should be performed every 2-3 years to extend the life of your hardwood floor.
We offer:
- Reliable service and daily job updates
- Our hardwood flooring experts get your project done right, and on schedule.
- Furniture moving
- We offer the optional service of moving your furniture.
- Livable conditions during renovation
- We work around your family’s schedule, so you can stay in place.
- Dustless sanding
- We will leave your property as clean as possible. Cleaning and re-coating is no mess/dust situation.
- Environmentally friendly products
- Low VOC, green rated finishes available.
- 20+ years experience
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
204,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/commercial-hardwood-flooring-services/,"Old damaged floors can be restored, keeping the character of the wood. This cost-effective method allows for a budget-friendly, fast turn around, while creating a durable wood floor.
Vacuums, brooms, and mops just don’t cut it when it comes to keeping your floors in pristine condition. Our commercial hardwood floor cleaning professionals have the proper equipment to deep clean your floors and remove all dirt and debris. After every cleaning, we recoat your hardwood as well to ensure it lasts longer and is better protected. Annual cleaning and recoating protect your floors and lengthens the time needed between total floor refinishings.
Hardwood floors can elevate the appearance of your business because they are stylish and classic. They also improve the air quality in your building and can increase your property value. Our hardwood flooring experts can match your existing look or install a brand new custom floor.
If your business has stairs, our craftsmen can install new steps or refinish your existing treads to update your look with minimum inconvenience. Wood staircases add value to your property and enhance your business’s overall appearance. When your stairs and floors effortlessly flow together, they create cohesion throughout your space.
Hudson Hardwood serves a variety of businesses in Philadelphia including:
Update your office building with a hardwood floor installation. If you already have hardwood floors, refinishing them makes the space feel fresh.
Hardwood flooring keeps a brewery looking clean and industrial. Refinish or install hardwood in your brewery for flooring that is durable and low maintenance.
Hotels with hardwood floors are luxurious and stylish. Hudson Hardwood can make your floors stand up to the wear and tear of heavy foot traffic that hotel lobbies experience day after day.
In Philadelphia, there are many old buildings undergoing renovations. Hudson Hardwood transforms these spaces, to meet the client’s desired look while keeping in mind budget constraints.
Food and foot traffic make it difficult for restaurants to address their flooring issues. Hudson Hardwood works with restaurants by using dust containment and green finishes to keep the air quality clean. We work overnight, so your restaurant can maintain business and not lose a day.
Schools can’t close to get their floors done. Hudson Hardwood uses dust containment, eliminating 98.9% of airborne dust, and finishes that are environmentally sound, drying quickly. We do these projects on days school is closed, so students can hit the floors as soon as they return.
Gymnasiums and Racquet ball courts require a highly durable finish with non-slipping properties. Special care must be taken with painted lines and logos on the floor. Hudson Hardwood are specialists in maintaining these unique wood floors.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer reliable service, daily job updates, furniture moving, dustless sanding, environmentally friendly products, and a team of commercial hardwood flooring specialists that follow the NWFA guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
205,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/hardwood-floor-cleaning/,"Hardwood Floor Cleaning
This service is available for our previous customers who have a hard-wax oil floor applied by us to their wood floor. Hard wax oil products such as Rubio monocoat and Pallman Magic Oil are easily refreshed within a few hours. This is a good service to also consider if you have a DuChateau floor and it needs a refreshing. It may be possible to walk on the floor within a 12 hour period after the procedure is completed.
With these products, it is possible to leave your furniture in place and do a cleaning and refreshing of the high traffic areas. It is ideal to do this quick form of maintenance approximately every 1-2 years for a residential situation.
This process does not generate dust at all. A very ideal time to do this procedure is just before a holiday weekend or while on vacation. It will provide additional floor protection and wow your guests.
Hudson Hardwood only uses the highest quality products for hardwood floor cleaning.
Cleaning Hardwood Flooring information
Regardless of if you’re building a house, or purchasing an existing house, odds are you’ll need to have exquisite floors installed to elevate the value of their home. People who need beautiful floors in their houses should possess Brazilian Cherry Flooring, or other types of quality hardwood, installed. This type of flooring is very attractive to many people all across the nation. The one thing which individuals need to consider with this type of flooring is the way to look after it to allow your hardwood to last a lengthy time. You need to be certain these floors are cared for right after they’re installed so the lifetime of the flooring can be increased. So proper hardwood cleaning service by Hudson hardwood Floors is your answer
Anyone who’d like to possess Brazilian Cherry Flooring, or other types of hardwood, will want to ensure you know about the substances that went into making the flooring. When Hudson Hardwood Floors comes to install the hardwood floors at your house, it is a great practice to ask the Hudson Hardwood Floors about the substances and the finish applied to your hardwood floors. Doing so will let you know just what to avoid for waxes and finishes whenever you need to clean up the flooring later on. When you know about the substances on the floor, you’ll know how to appropriately take care of the flooring when cleaning, or having Hudson Hardwood Floors cleaning services.
Proper care includes on a regular basis sweeping or vacuuming the floor, cleaning up spills once they occur, and applying wax to the ground if the substances on the floor don’t get damaged by the wax. As well as every so often hiring Hudson Hardwood Floors to clean your floors professionally It’s significant to look after the floor in order that it doesn’t get stains or scratches in it. Nobody wants their Brazilian Cherry Floors, or other types of quality hardwood, in their own home to be worn down, however, floors can be fixed through buffing and application of finish with the other services Hudson Hardwood Floors offers. These hardwood floors are very durable, and hardwood flooring, if cared for properly will make your hardwood flooring look great. It’s about creating an effort to make these flooring look great. You will then be able to enjoy the beauty of hardwood floors in your home. So, spend some time to keep the flooring looking wonderful and contact Hudson Hardwood Floors for your hardwood flooring project
Hire a professional like Hudson Hardwood Floors to get your hardwood floors refinished",hudsonhardwood
206,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/hardwood-floor-refinishing/,"Refinishing starts with one of our expert craftsmen sanding and polishing your hardwood until all scrapes, scratches, gouges, & stains are removed, uncovering a like-new wood floor. We then coat your hardwood with the finish of your choosing, giving you an updated, fresh look.
Hudson Hardwood Floors are experts in repairing and restoring old wood.
We offer:
- Reliable service and daily job updates
- Our hardwood flooring experts get your project done right, and on schedule.
- Furniture moving
- We offer the optional service of moving your furniture.
- Livable conditions during renovation
- We work around your family’s schedule, so you can stay in place.
- Dustless sanding
- Using our dustless sanding equipment we keep your project as clean as possible. Maintaining indoor air quality and reducing floor renovation dust by 95%.
- Environmentally friendly products
- Low VOC, green rated finishes available.
- 20+ years experience
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
207,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/hardwood-flooring-breweries/,"Hudson Hardwood serves a variety of businesses in Philadelphia including:
Update your office building with a hardwood floor installation. If you already have hardwood floors, refinishing them makes the space feel fresh.
Hotels
Hotels with hardwood floors are luxurious and stylish. Hudson Hardwood can make your floors stand up to the wear and tear of heavy foot traffic that hotel lobbies experience day after day.
Old Buildings
In Philadelphia, there are many old buildings undergoing renovations. Hudson Hardwood transforms these spaces, to meet the client’s desired look while keeping in mind budget constraints.
Restaurants
Food and foot traffic make it difficult for restaurants to address their flooring issues. Hudson Hardwood works with restaurants by using dust containment and green finishes to keep the air quality clean. We work overnight, so your restaurant can maintain business and not lose a day.
Schools
Schools can’t close to get their floors done. Hudson Hardwood uses dust containment, eliminating 98.9% of airborne dust, and finishes that are environmentally sound, drying quickly. We do these projects on days school is closed, so students can hit the floors as soon as they return.
Gymnasium and Racquet Ball Courts
Gymnasiums and Racquet ball courts require a highly durable finish with non-slipping properties. Special care must be taken with painted lines and logos on the floor. Hudson Hardwood are specialists in maintaining these unique wood floors.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer reliable service, daily job updates, furniture moving, dustless sanding, environmentally friendly products, and a team of commercial hardwood flooring specialists that follow the NWFA guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
208,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/hardwood-flooring-hotels/,"Hudson Hardwood serves a variety of businesses in Philadelphia including:
Update your office building with a hardwood floor installation. If you already have hardwood floors, refinishing them makes the space feel fresh.
Hardwood flooring keeps a brewery looking clean and industrial. Refinish or install hardwood in your brewery for flooring that is durable and low maintenance.
Old Buildings
In Philadelphia, there are many old buildings undergoing renovations. Hudson Hardwood transforms these spaces, to meet the client’s desired look while keeping in mind budget constraints.
Restaurants
Food and foot traffic make it difficult for restaurants to address their flooring issues. Hudson Hardwood works with restaurants by using dust containment and green finishes to keep the air quality clean. We work overnight, so your restaurant can maintain business and not lose a day.
Schools can’t close to get their floors done. Hudson Hardwood uses dust containment, eliminating 98.9% of airborne dust, and finishes that are environmentally sound, drying quickly. We do these projects on days school is closed, so students can hit the floors as soon as they return.
Gymnasiums and Racquet ball courts require a highly durable finish with non-slipping properties. Special care must be taken with painted lines and logos on the floor. Hudson Hardwood are specialists in maintaining these unique wood floors.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer reliable service, daily job updates, furniture moving, dustless sanding, environmentally friendly products, and a team of commercial hardwood flooring specialists that follow the NWFA guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
209,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/hardwood-flooring-offices/,"Hudson Hardwood serves a variety of businesses in Philadelphia including:
Hardwood flooring keeps a brewery looking clean and industrial. Refinish or install hardwood in your brewery for flooring that is durable and low maintenance.
Hotels
Hotels with hardwood floors are luxurious and stylish. Hudson Hardwood can make your floors stand up to the wear and tear of heavy foot traffic that hotel lobbies experience day after day.
Old Buildings
In Philadelphia, there are many old buildings undergoing renovations. Hudson Hardwood transforms these spaces, to meet the client’s desired look while keeping in mind budget constraints.
Restaurants
Food and foot traffic make it difficult for restaurants to address their flooring issues. Hudson Hardwood works with restaurants by using dust containment and green finishes to keep the air quality clean. We work overnight, so your restaurant can maintain business and not lose a day.
Schools
Schools can’t close to get their floors done. Hudson Hardwood uses dust containment, eliminating 98.9% of airborne dust, and finishes that are environmentally sound, drying quickly. We do these projects on days school is closed, so students can hit the floors as soon as they return.
Gymnasium and Racquet Ball Courts
Gymnasiums and Racquet ball courts require a highly durable finish with non-slipping properties. Special care must be taken with painted lines and logos on the floor. Hudson Hardwood are specialists in maintaining these unique wood floors.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer reliable service, daily job updates, furniture moving, dustless sanding, environmentally friendly products, and a team of commercial hardwood flooring specialists that follow the NWFA guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
210,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/hardwood-stairs/,"When it comes to your hardwood stairs, there are a range of option to fit every budget. From installing new steps, to the more cost-effective option of refinishing your treads, Hudson Hardwood Floors can guide you in making the right choices for your project.
Updating your staircase causes minimum inconvenience. You will still have access to the stairs during your renovation.
We can match your stairs to your existing floors or change your design giving you an updated look. Wood stairs are organic and naturally appealing. They add value to your property.
While updating your stairs, consider adding iron or wood spindles to your current handrail. You can change the entire banister as well.
We offer:
- Reliable service and daily job updates
- Our hardwood flooring experts get your project done right, and on schedule.
- Furniture moving
- We offer the optional service of moving your furniture.
- Livable conditions during renovation
- We work around your family’s schedule, so you can stay in place.
- Dustless sanding
- Using our dustless sanding equipment we keep your project as clean as possible. Maintaining indoor air quality and reducing floor renovation dust by 95%.
- Environmentally friendly products
- Low VOC, green rated finishes available.
- 20+ years experience
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
211,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/harwood-flooring-for-gymnasiums-and-racquetball-courts/,"When it comes to gymnasiums and racquetball courts, hardwood floors are the best flooring option. Hudson Hardwood installs, cleans, restores, and refinishes commercial hardwood flooring in Philadelphia gymnasiums and racquetball courts to ensure that your athletic center is both safe to operate on and visually appealing.
Gymnasiums and racquetball courts require a highly durable finish with non-slipping properties. Additionally, special care must be taken when it comes to the painted lines and logos on the floor. The team at Hudson Hardwood are specialists in maintaining these unique wood floors.
Choose hardwood for your gymnasium or racquetball court because:
- It’s durable. The floors in any gym or racquetball center experience a daily beating due to the foot-traffic and equipment. Hardwood flooring can withstand heavy weights and traffic and can last for a long time.
- It’s attractive. You want to retain your members and keep them happy. This can be achieved both by what you offer and what your space looks like. Your patrons spend their free time at your facility, so it needs to be somewhere they feel at home. Hardwood floors are warm and welcoming.
- It’s low maintenance. If someone spills their water on the floor, you can quickly mop or wipe it up.
- It’s healthier. With hardwood floors, there’s nowhere for dust and debris to cling to. This creates better air quality in your space, which is great for members who have allergies.
Our team analyzes your floors to come up with the best flooring solution for your gymnasium or racquetball court. We work to complete your commercial flooring project on time, on schedule, and with minimal disruption to your members.
Hudson Hardwood serves a variety of businesses in Philadelphia including:
Update your office building with a hardwood floor installation. If you already have hardwood floors, refinishing them makes the space feel fresh.
Hardwood flooring keeps a brewery looking clean and industrial. Refinish or install hardwood in your brewery for flooring that is durable and low maintenance.
Hotels with hardwood floors are luxurious and stylish. Hudson Hardwood can make your floors stand up to the wear and tear of heavy foot traffic that hotel lobbies experience day after day.
Old Buildings
In Philadelphia, there are many old buildings undergoing renovations. Hudson Hardwood transforms these spaces, to meet the client’s desired look while keeping in mind budget constraints.
Restaurants
Food and foot traffic make it difficult for restaurants to address their flooring issues. Hudson Hardwood works with restaurants by using dust containment and green finishes to keep the air quality clean. We work overnight, so your restaurant can maintain business and not lose a day.
Schools can’t close to get their floors done. Hudson Hardwood uses dust containment, eliminating 98.9% of airborne dust, and finishes that are environmentally sound, drying quickly. We do these projects on days school is closed, so students can hit the floors as soon as they return.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer reliable service, daily job updates, furniture moving, dustless sanding, environmentally friendly products, and a team of commercial hardwood flooring specialists that follow the NWFA guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
212,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/harwood-flooring-for-schools/,"At Hudson Hardwood, we know that The School District of Philadelphia is fully committed to supporting clean, safe, and welcoming learning environments. When it comes to your floors, we check all three of those boxes and more.
Hardwood floors are the best flooring option for schools because:
- It’s easy to clean. At any given time, spills or crumbs can be found in your cafeteria. With hardwood, you can quickly sweep, mop, or wipe up any messes that occur. It’s not just the cafeteria that benefits from hardwood’s low maintenance, the teacher’s lounge, gymnasium, and classrooms do too. Dust, debris, and other allergens have nowhere to cling to when you have hardwood flooring, which means there’s better air quality in your space.
- It’s environmentally-friendly. Because the health of your students and faculty are top of mind, we use dust containment, eliminating 98.9% of airborne dust, and environmentally sound finishes that dry quickly.
- It’s inviting. Hardwood is one of the most visually appealing options for a school because it provides a warm and welcoming atmosphere for your students and teachers.
- It’s durable. It’s no shock that schools experience foot traffic at all hours of the day. Hardwood flooring is strong, durable, and can withstand the constant traffic saving you from having to worry about frequent replacements.
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood?
Our team analyzes your school’s current flooring situation to figure out the perfect solution, whether that’s restoring, refinishing, or installing a brand new hardwood floor. We know you can’t close the school to get your floors done. So, we work closely with your administrators to ensure that we can complete flooring projects on days your school is closed. Students can hit the floors as soon as they return!
Hudson Hardwood serves a variety of businesses in Philadelphia including:
Update your office building with a hardwood floor installation. If you already have hardwood floors, refinishing them makes the space feel fresh.
Hardwood flooring keeps a brewery looking clean and industrial. Refinish or install hardwood in your brewery for flooring that is durable and low maintenance.
Hotels with hardwood floors are luxurious and stylish. Hudson Hardwood can make your floors stand up to the wear and tear of heavy foot traffic that hotel lobbies experience day after day.
Old Buildings
In Philadelphia, there are many old buildings undergoing renovations. Hudson Hardwood transforms these spaces, to meet the client’s desired look while keeping in mind budget constraints.
Restaurants
Food and foot traffic make it difficult for restaurants to address their flooring issues. Hudson Hardwood works with restaurants by using dust containment and green finishes to keep the air quality clean. We work overnight, so your restaurant can maintain business and not lose a day.
Gymnasiums and Racquet ball courts require a highly durable finish with non-slipping properties. Special care must be taken with painted lines and logos on the floor. Hudson Hardwood are specialists in maintaining these unique wood floors.
At Hudson Hardwood, we offer reliable service, daily job updates, furniture moving, dustless sanding, environmentally friendly products, and a team of commercial hardwood flooring specialists that follow the NWFA guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
213,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/installation/,"Located in Philadelphia, PA, Hudson Hardwood has worked as a commercial and residential flooring company for over two decades. We have shown our reliability and expertise on every project that we have performed.
We believe in the beauty and the importance behind every floor we install for every single customer. Also, throughout the process, we consider all of your needs and desires to make sure we install the floor of your dreams, and you get to enjoy staying at home and decorating your space!
Hardwood Flooring Installation: The Benefits You Deserve
We are a flooring installation contractor in Philadelphia, PA. With a new floor installation you will enjoy:
- Property Value Increase
Floors are one of the most important aspects of a property, and having them in pristine condition will increase its value. If you are preparing for a resale process, you will make more money because home buyers prefer to buy a house with beautiful hardwood flooring rather than a faded floor or old carpet.
- Better Air Quality
Hardwood flooring does not collect pollen, particulate matter, dust, animal dander, or other common allergens the way carpet does. This means you will experience better air quality with hardwood flooring, making it feel fresh and clean.
- Longer Life Span < Lower Cost
Hardwood flooring has a longer duration than carpets; you can use it for generations and still take advantage of its bright new look. Also, its maintenance is not time-consuming or expensive, making it cheaper and easier to keep.
Hardwood Flooring Installation: What to Expect From Us?
At Hudson Hardwood, our clients have chosen us for our reliable service, daily job updates to clients, moving all of their furniture while giving them livable conditions during the installation, using environmentally friendly products, and keeping all the spaces free from dust. All this plus:
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.
- We use dustless sanding equipment, so we keep your project as clean as possible.
- Environmentally friendly products with low VOC, green-rated finishes available.
- We maintain indoor air quality and reduce floor renovation dust by 95%.
- We work around your family’s schedule so that you can stay in place.
- We get your project done right and on schedule.
Get Your Hardwood Flooring Installation from the Best Contractors in Philadelphia, PA!
Do not doubt any longer! We are the best flooring installation contractors in Philadelphia, PA and all of our clients speak for us. We will deliver the best floors for your property, and you will enjoy the look and all the benefits. Do not waste the opportunity to give your house the look it deserves!",hudsonhardwood
214,https://hudsonhardwood.com/services/restoration-services/,"If you want professional hardwood floor restoration, look no further than Hudson Hardwood. For over two decades, we have been restoring hardwood floors in the Montgomery, Bucks, Delaware, and Chester Counties as well as the Mainline and Philadelphia.
Why Choose Hudson Hardwood as Your Professional
Hardwood Floor Restoration Company
We offer:
- Reliable service and daily job updates
- Our hardwood flooring experts get your project done right and on schedule.
- Furniture moving
- We offer the optional service of moving your furniture.
- Livable conditions during renovation
- We work around your family’s schedule, so you can stay in place.
- Dustless sanding
- Using our dustless sanding equipment we keep your project as clean as possible. Maintaining indoor air quality and reducing floor renovation dust by 95%.
- Environmentally friendly products
- Low VOC, green-rated finishes available.
- 20+ years of experience
- Certified by the NWFA since 2008, our employees are hardwood flooring specialists that follow the National Wood Flooring Association guidelines.",hudsonhardwood
215,https://hudsonhardwood.com/testimonials/,"Would highly recommend!!!
I hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to sand down and refinish the hardwood floors at my house. They look beautiful!! Additionally, Joe was very communicative and the work was completed as scheduled. Would highly recommend!!
I hired Hudson Hardwood Floors to sand down and refinish the hardwood floors at my house. They look beautiful!! Additionally, Joe was very communicative and the work was completed as scheduled. Would highly recommend!!",hudsonhardwood
216,https://hudsonhardwood.com/wood-floor-refinishing-in-philadelphia-pa/,"Floor Refinishing The Smartest Choice to Restore Your Wood Floor
You look at your floor, and it seems to be old, scratched, worn and the color has faded; this means it’s time to refinish your floors.
Floor restoration includes repairs, refinishing, and staining. . Floor refinishing is done when your floor has lost its luster, and you want to restore it to its original beauty. Getting your floor refinished is a smart choice to make. Hudson Hardwood offers the best wood floor refinishing services in the Philadelphia area, to restore the look, surface, and color of your floors.
Hudson Hardwood has over 20+ years in the flooring business. We understand floors, wood, repairs, and restorations and work with your schedule. We will work with you to bring your floor back to life.
Signs That Your Floors Need a Refinishing Service!
Hardwood floors have a longer lifespan than other natural flooring materials. However, overtime floors wear out and lose their luster. If you are not sure if your floors need a refinishing service, here are a couple of signs shared by our professional wood floor refinishing company that indicate your floors definitely need to be restored:
- Scratches and dents
These are common, especially if you have kids, pets or you continually move furniture. Our refinishing service eliminates all those awful scratches and gives your floors a fresh look.
- Discoloration and fading
Through time your floor might be experiencing discoloration due to sunlight, water, improper cleaning, or even rugs. Yeah, rugs! When you place a rug, rugs block light which can cause uneven fading on your floors. Remove stains and discoloration on your floors with our floor refinishing.
Remove Stains & Eliminate Gaps With A High-quality Refinishing Service!
Hudson Hardwood will provide you with professional, high-quality, and prestigious wood floor refinishing service in Philadelphia, PA. We address gaps, cracks, stains, scratches, and fix uneven buckling and cupping floors. Get a restoration of your home’s floors and increase its value.",hudsonhardwood
